CHAPTER I.
Confess his frailtysay he was ashamed
Of that for which no man was ever blamed.
'Twas Heaven's own hand that had bestowed on him
The slight misfortune of a crooked limb:
Yet to his mind, to keep the balance even,
Each splendid gift and shining grace was given.
Burnside
.
Pope was a good poet but a bad philosopher.
He says that health, peace and competence,
are all that can be necessary for a reasonable
man's happiness. He is mistaken. There are
many other things necessary. I shall mention
but onethe fulfilment of duty.
For some years before the breaking out of
the American Revolutionary War, the
Reverend
Hezekiah Norwood possessed all these in
addition to some other ingredients, not
necessary
to mention, that tend to sweeten the cup
of human enjoyment. He resided on the banks
of the Susquehanna, in one of the flourishing
settlements of Wyoming. Those settlements, at
that time, constituted within themselves, a kind
of independent commonwealth, having a
governor
,
councils, and laws of their own making.
They formed the most western frontier of
white population, being separated from all other
abodes of civilization by an extensive and
unopened
forest. Although the nearest
neighbours
to the Indians, whose hostility was then
the source of so many calamities to such of our
hardy forefathers as ventured, like them, to
become the pioneers of the woods, their
peaceable
and conciliating dispositions, together with
the prudent policy of the public measures
adopted in their intercourse with the
neighbouring
tribes, gained them the confidence and
friendship of the savages, and more effectually
secured their safety and tranquillity than could
have been done by armed bands and
fortifications
.
They were a prudent people, however,
and did not altogether neglect the precaution
of erecting strong-holds; but in doing so, they
had the art not to excite the jealousy of their
fierce and revengeful neighbours.
The virtue, prosperity, and happiness of the
inhabitants of Wyoming, at that period, are
topics on which not only historians have
delighted
to dwell, but from which poets have
drawn inspiration as from the only example, in
modern times, of a society flourishing in
primeval
innocence, and affording, in their
unsophisticated
manners, upright morals, simple
habits, uniform hospitality, and patriarchal
polity
,
a pleasing image of the
golden age!
Separated
,
as before observed, from the
corrupting
influences of artificial society, and, at the
same time, elevated by education, habit, and
feeling, far above the ignorance, coarseness,
and barbarity of savage life, they seemed to
have adopted the virtues of both, without the
vices of either. Such, at least, is the picture
which historians have given us of these
interesting
people. As for the poets, their views of
their innocence and happiness may be
ascertained
from the following stanza of Campbell's
well known poem of Gertrude of Wyoming.
Delightful Wyoming! beneath thy skies,
The happy shepherd swains had nought to do,
But feed their flocks on green declivities,
Or skim perchance thy lake with light canoe,
From morn till evening's sweeter pastime grew,
With timbrel, when beneath the forests brown,
The lovely maidens would the dance renew:
And aye those sunny mountains half way down
Would echo flageolet from some romantic town.
Mr. Norwood was the religious instructer of
a congregation whose members resided in one
of the most pleasant spots in this peaceful region.
The name of Wyoming was that of the whole
settlement, comprehending a considerable
extent
of country on both sides of the
Susquehanna
;
but, as it is one familiar to the public,
we shall, in this work, apply it also to the village
in which Mr. Norwood resided. This village
was situated on the western bank of the great
river, at the junction which it formed with a
small meandering stream, which, as the name
by which it is now known, is not very
euphonous
,
we shall call Sharon. On either side of
this stream, a gradually ascending ridge of
forest-covered
hills arose about a mile apart, and
stretching from the river for about a mile and
a half, began to approach each other, until, at
the distance of nearly two miles, they were
separated only by the gap through which the
stream of Sharon flowed. It was on the
northern
bank of this stream, at the western
extremity
of the village, that Mr. Norwood's mansion
raised its modest, but tasteful front,
embowered
amidst a grove of sycamores and poplars.
In the year 1776, at the time our history
commences, Mr. Norwood had been, for some
time, a widower. He was the father of only
one child, a daughter, named Agnes, now in
her eighteenth year. But such a daughter!
She was in reality, as she was often called,
the Rose of Sharon. Every eye admired her
beauty; her goodness was the theme of every
tongue. She was refined, intelligent, and
affable
.
Her father, by both precept and
example
,
had implanted in her mind a thorough
faith in Christian doctrines, and a strong
reverence
for Christian virtues. In her, his earthly
affections were centred; and the most fervent
filial piety rewarded his parental love. As
perfect equality reigned among the inhabitants
of Wyoming, all the maidens of the village
were her companions; but there was one to
whom she was particularly attached, whose
mind, manners and principles harmonised
entirely
with her own, and produced a
reciprocity
of confidence which united them to each
other in the strictest bonds of friendship. This
friend of Agnes was named Mary Watson.
Her father and mother were both dead. But
their loss was supplied by the kindness of an
only brother, a young man who had been
educated
for the medical profession, and practised
as the physician of the district.
This youth was possessed of a strong and
well-informed mind, but of feelings too
sensitive
for happiness. In his childhood he had
received an injury in one of his legs, which
deformed
it, and produced an incurable lameness.
This deformity preyed more keenly on his
mind than his philosophy should have
permitted
.
But what are the suggestions of
philosophy
to the feelings of an ardent heart? Have
they power to restrain the aspirations of
ambition
or the longings of love? If not, how can
they render deformity, which is so great a bar
to these emotions, a satisfactory incumbrance?
Oh deformity! thou art an eternal source of
mortification to the soul that is touched with
any desire for eminence or happiness in this
worldthou art a perpetually tormenting fiend
to thy sensitive victim. Let those who have
never experienced the tortures of thy agonizing
presence, talk of the virtue of enduring thee
with patience, and recommend philosophy as
an antidote to the ever-gnawing griefs which
thou inflictest. They speak of things they
know not, and of sensations they cannot feel.
What worldly blessings can render him happy
who is cursed by thee? In vain shall health
smile, wealth glitter, or friendship sooth, if
thou, the everlasting memento of degradation,
the inseparable companion of internal sorrow,
layest thy vexatious burthen on the crushed
and wearied spirit. Often and often did Edward
Watson exert the energies of a vigorous mind
in resisting the despondency which his
malconformation
perpetually forced upon his
feelings
;
and occasionally he seemed to gain the
victory. But it was only occasionally, and
for short periods. In his childhood he had borne
the scoff of his playmates, and endured the
vexation
of being unable to vie with them in the
fleetness or dexterity required for their
pastimes
.
His college years, indeed, were less
mortifying, as his competitions there did not
require bodily so much as mental exertions.
Yet even there his disfiguration was not
without
its annoyances. On any occasion of
public
display amidst the assembled youths of his
own agein parties or processions, he
experienced
an humbling sense of inferiority; and in
the hours of relaxing exercise, he felt as if he
were an outcast from their companionship
unfit
to mingle in their feats of strength or their
trials of agility.
These feelings rendered him averse from
mixing unnecessarily with society, or
exposing
himself to the view of a numerous
population
.
After the death of his parents, he,
therefore
,
persuaded his sister to remove with him
from the populous neighbourhood of their birth,
near Hartford in Connecticut, to the retired
and fertile settlement of Wyoming, among the
colonists of which he had many relations who
had written him pressing invitations to
reside
amongst them. He accordingly sold his
little property near Hartford, and, with his
sister, joining a small party of his neighbours,
whose views were directed to the same
destination
,
proceeded to Wyoming. Here he was
soon engaged in the successful pursuit of his
profession, and might have felt happy amidst
a simple and benevolent people, by whom he
was respected and beloved, but for the
influence
of the most pleasing and most irresistible
of passions. He loved; but he loved in silence
and despair; for when he reflected on his
deformity
,
he imagined that he never could be
blessed with a return of affection, ardent and
faithful as his own. The object of his passion
was faultlessly beautiful in features as well as in
symmetry of person. And could he, blemished
as he was, and curtailed of nature's fair
proportion
,
expect to elicit passion in the breast
of one so lovelyone whom many gallant and
brave and graceful youths, endowed with all
that could recommend them to a lady's eye,
loved with ardour and sued in vain. Could one
who was so perfect in the love-kindling graces
of the outward form as Agnes Norwoodfor it
was she for whom he pinedcast her regard on
him who was unseemly even in his own
eyes? It were vain to expect it, he
despondingly
sighed; I dare not hazard an
attempt
to win her. I now enjoy her friendship,
and her intimacy with my sister affords me
often the high blessing of her society. Shall
I forfeit this, and expose myself to scorn and
mockery, by an imprudent disclosure of my
passion? It would be vanityit would be
madness, it would be disappointment,
humiliation
B 2
anddespair. She would rejectshe would
avoidshe would despise me.
Though his heart was thus torn with a secret
and hopeless passion, and preyed upon by
the melancholy reflections which had
embittered
his whole life, yet to the public eye
he appeared neither morose nor fretful. His
repinings were confined to his own bosom.
His sister, indeed, had long known the extent
of his early and irremediable sorrows; and
suspicions
of the additional unhappiness which he
now endured, had sprung up in her mind; and
her anxious, but silent observations, soon
ripened
them into certainty. She loved her brother
with the tenderest affection. She sympathised
in his sufferings, and keenly felt all his woes.
But she never alluded to them. Her good
sense told her that they shrunk from
observation
,
and were of too delicate a texture to bear
the gentle touch of even a sister's kindness.
Her chief study was to render agreeable to him,
the enjoyments of home, and to sooth him with
those daily comforts which the female
manager
of our household concerns alone can
supply
.
He was not unobservant of these
attentions
.
He felt grateful for them. They endeared
his sister to him. They made him feel that
the world was not a desolation; that it
contained
at least one being who loved him, and was
solicitous for his happiness. He thanked
Heaven
for the blessing, and felt that his existence
was not altogether in vain, while it contributed
to the support and satisfaction of one so
affectionate
and worthy of his regard. On her
account he pursued his calling with industry,
and assumed a cheerfulness in society little
accordant with the internal state of his feelings.
Mary Watson was not a beauty in the
pictorial
sense of the word. But she was far from
being disagreeable to look upon. Benevolence
and good nature ever shone from her
countenance
.
Her features were sufficiently regular,
but they were marked by some traces of the
small pox; and her complexion, though
indicating
health, boasted but little of the delicate
intermixture of the rose and the lily which
animated
the blooming countenance of her friend
Agnes Norwood.
CHAPTER II.
Behold the pest of civil strife,
Destructive foe of human life,
He comes, with havoc in his train,
And rides on ruin o'er the plain!
Sefton
.
In the year 1776, the tempest of civil war
gathered fearfully over this continent, and
frowned with peculiar wrath on the region of
New England. The cause of American liberty
had aroused that section of the country to arms,
even before the sister colonies had determined
on a union of strength to expel foreign
dictation
and secure independence. But on a
question
so important, one involving so many
conflicting
opinions, feelings, and interests as that
which then agitated the country, it could not
be expected that there would be unanimity of
sentiment and action. Many opposed, even
by force of arms, the cause of their country,
and the names of Whig and Tory became the
distinguishing appellations of parties that were
more fiercely arrayed against each other, than
the factions so called had ever been in Great
Britain. The tories of New England had
exerted
themselves very early in the struggle.
But they constituted, although a bold, a very
small minority in that patriotic section, and
were soon subdued. Among the most
troublesome
and dangerous of the bands into which
they formed themselves, was one commanded
by an enterprising and daring youth of
Connecticut
,
named Butler. His father had held a
lucrative and honourable office under the
British
government, and had been one of the first
to assemble all who were attached to the old
regime
, and raise the standard of Toryism.
His excessive zeal rendered him imprudent,
and in a rash attack upon a party of the patriots
he was taken prisoner, tried for treason, and
executed. His son, John, already mentioned,
assumed the command of his party, and vowed
revenge upon the Whigs for the destruction of
his father. He was well qualified to be the
leader of a desperate gang. Intrepid and
fearless
,
but wily and sagacious, he was equally
capable of contriving stratagems and of
performing
exploits. Unscrupulous, unprincipled,
and fruitful in expedients, with wonderful
celerity
he could retrieve the most disastrous
mischances; and often when his enemies
supposed
that his power of doing mischief was
annihilated, he would suddenly come upon
them with renewed force and fury, and make
them feel that his arm was as strong, and his
heart as relentless as ever. His personal
qualities
,
as well as those of his mind, fitted him
well to be a leader of desperate men engaged
in a marauding warfare against the recognised
authorities of the land. At once agile and
athletic, and of vigorous health, he was capable
of enduring any fatigue, and sustaining every
privation to which the adventurous and
dangerous
courses he pursued so frequently
exposed
him. He had also an air of dignity and
loftiness in his appearance, which contributed
much to secure him the complete ascendency
he possessed over his followers.
Many and terrible were the slaughters, the
burnings, and the desolations committed by
Butler and his guerilla band on the fairest
portions
of Connecticut. His name soon became
so terrible, that rewards were offered for his
apprehension, and the militia of the country
made every effort to effect his destruction. He
was at length taken, carried to New Haven,
and condemned to the same fate his father had
borne, a fate which he had so cruelly avenged,
and so amply deserved. But he died not.
Love saved him. Oh! what is so faithful!
what is so energetic! what is so precious to
man as woman's love! Isabella Austin loved
the traitor, although she approved not the
treason
,
for her father's family were Whigs. She
deceived his gaolershe procured admission to
the convict; and the same stratagem which
afterwards saved the life of the celebrated La
Vallette, now saved that of John Butler.
Uriah Austin, the father of his deliverer,
and his family, with some other families in
the neighbourhood, were then preparing to fly
from the war-scourged plains of New England,
in search of repose and safety in the valley of
Wyoming. By the entreaties of his daughter,
and influenced by his own feelings of
compassion
,
Mr. Austin was prevailed upon to grant
shelter and protection to the fugitive whose
principles and conduct he reprobated, but who
now threw his life into his hands and assumed
the mask of penitence, professing his desire to
accompany his protectors to the country of
Wyoming, where some of his relatives were
already settled, and where he solemnly pledged
himself to lead a life of peace. The good
hearted Mr. Austin consented, and even
promised
,
in the event of his continued
amendment
for a length of time sufficient to prove its
sincerity, to consent to his union with his
daughter.
It was early in the month of May, 1776, on
a day beautiful and serene as the unclouded sun
in spring ever illuminated, that a company of
travellers, with their wives and children,
numbering
altogether about fifty persons, were seen
pursuing their way slowly along the right bank
of the Susquehanna in the direction of the
village
of Wyoming. They were accompanied
by a numerous drove of cattle, and about a dozen
teams, to which were attached large wagons
laden with all the requisites of household
comfort
.
Interspersed among these, at irregular
distances, a number of smaller vehicles, chiefly
gigs and dearborns, bore along the females and
the children, the aged and the infirm of the
party. In advance of these, two active young
men, armed, as if for the chace, with rifles and
hunting knives, pursued their way on foot at
a much brisker rate than the rest of the
company
.
These, aided by a couple of pointers,
were on the look-out for game, as the wild
deer and the wild pigeons were then abundant
in the woods. Of the latter they had made
considerable prey, when, considering that they
were now some miles separated from their
friends, they sat down on a bank that
overlooked
the river, at a turning of the road, to
await their approach.
The impressive stillness of undisturbed
nature
was around them. The river lay in a
smooth and glittering sheet, like an immense
mirror, beneath them, while a sombre forest
stretched far beyond it, whose tall tops
seemed
to touch the heavens at the verge of the
horizon. Behind them at a very short
distance
,
an oak-bearing mountain, one of those
that separated the surrounding country into so
many fruitful and pleasant valleys, raised its
lofty summit to the skies, as if it would penetrate
the secrets of the elements above.
How solemn is the deep tranquillity of the
magnificent scene now before us! said Henry
Austin to his companion, John Butler, the
fugitive from justice, with whom the reader is
already acquainted. Henry was the only son
of Uriah Austin who had afforded Butler his
protection, and the only brother of Isabella, who
had saved the life of that offender. He was at
this time little more than twenty years of age;
warm, open, and generous in his disposition,
and so zealous in the cause for which his
country
was then struggling, that he panted to
enrol
himself amongst her defenders; and but
for the commands of his father, whom he never
yet had ventured to disobey, he would, ere
this, have arrayed himself in their ranks.
Although Butler, in his heart, disliked the
patriotism of this brave youth, he was aware
of the imprudence of, at this time, expressing
his feelings; and, with profound dissimulation,
he continued to affect penitence for his former
conduct. In reply to Henry's remark, he said,
this tranquillity forms a striking but pleasing
contrast to the scenes of tumult, strife, and
C
blood, in which I was so lately engaged; but
which, thanks to your generous-hearted sister,
I now, from my very soul, abhor.
What is past cannot be recalled, replied
Henry. It is useless to grieve for it. When
penitence is sincere, it ought to procure the
forgiveness of error. But let us not allude to
the past when its memory is unpleasant. Let
it sink into forgetfulness; and let the future
engage our attention. Our country is, at this
moment, engaged in a tremendous struggle
against a powerful foe.Oh! that I could fly
to her assistance.
Your enthusiasm is natural to your youth,
said Butler, with an internal sneer. But, my
dear Henry, you cannot be every where; and
you are now where your duty requires you,
comforting your parents in their old age, and
assisting them to find a place of safety from the
terrors of the times.
I should, indeed, replied Henry, be
unwilling to desert my friends in their present
circumstances. But the very repose of this
mighty solitude that surrounds us, recalls to
my mind, by the force of contrast, the
agitations
,
the dangers and the sufferings that now
shake our native land to its centre, and
overwhelm
thousands of her sons and daughters in
irretrievable ruin. When I think of this, I
cannot but sigh, that I am prevented from
hastening
to her aid; and, if she conquers, to share
in her glory, or if she falls, to partake of her
calamities.
Your patriotism is sublime! said Butler,
with an irony of tone which Henry's
inexperience
of hypocrisy prevented him from
observing
.
The profound silence of the present
scene is, indeed, strongly distinguished from
the sounding of the trumpet, the echoing of
the bugle, or the roaring of the cannon, and all
the other clamours of brazen-throated war, which
now roll their alarums along our sea-board,
from Boston to Savannah. But should we not
bless Providence, that those we love best are
so far removed from those clamours, and that
we are present to defend them from whatever
dangers may assail them?for even here
danger
may come.Yes, Henry, tranquil as things
now are amidst this remote solitude, your
martial
ardour may yet be needed even here. The
savage prowler, whose amity is so uncertain,
is in the vicinity.
At this moment their attention was drawn
to a tall man of rather elderly appearance,
clothed in a wild mixture of savage and
civilized
apparel, hurrying down the mountain
behind
them. He soon approached, and
addressed
them with hasty utterance
White menChristiansif ye have any
of the compassionate feelings which Christians
are said to possess, haste with me to rescue
from the cruelty of the savages, two young
females of your own nation, who have fallen
into their hands!
Lead on, cried Henry, we will
follow
;
and Butler echoed the reply. The hill
was soon ascended; and about twenty minutes'
rapid race along its summit, brought them to a
steep and dangerous declivity, down a narrow
and scarcely traceable path of which their
aged conductor plunged with unhesitating
alacrity
,
and they as fearlessly followed. At
length, on coming to a tall and precipitous rock,
the base of which reached to the bottom of the
hill, their guide halted.
Let us now proceed more cautiously,
said he. Then in a stooping posture, so as to
be concealed by the brushwood, he preceded
them slowly and in silence for a short distance.
The brushwood then terminated, and afforded
them a clear view into a small glade in the
valley beneath them.
My part is now done. What remains is
yours, said the old man, and he disappeared.
Our adventurers beheld two white females
seated on a log; and three savages, two of
whom were employed at a large fire,
apparently
preparing food, while the third
seemed
to act as sentinel over the females. A
short consultation soon determined the
measures
they should adopt. They cautiously
descended
a little lower among the brushwood,
till they approached near enough to take a sure
aim, when, both firing at the same moment,
two of the Indians fell dead. The third seized
a musket; but the assailants being sheltered by
a large tree, were secure from his fire, until
they had time to re-load. But before that had
taken place, another Indian, who had been
straggling a short distance from the group,
appeared
upon the scene, armed also with a
musket
.
Instead of firing, however, the two
savages
hastened from the glade to take shelter
behind the adjoining trees, which they reached
in safety.
Austin and Butler were now, for a space,
perplexed how to proceed. But the latter, being
experienced in every mode of bush-fighting,
soon determined on his measures. Instructing
his companion to remain stationary, with his
rifle displayed so as to deceive the Indians, he
cautiously approached them in a circuitous
direction, concealed by the woods, until he
gained a sure aim at one of them, whom he shot
through the heart. The other, with a loud
yell, darted from his station, exposing himself,
C 2
in his flight, to the view of Austin, who fired,
but missed him. The savage, now that both
his antagonists had discharged their pieces,
rushed, with desparation, towards Austin, who,
in a few moments, found himself in contact
with his furious enemy, whom, with one blow
of his rifle, he felled to the earth. On account
of the tree which protected him, the Indian
had found no opportunity of firing at him
until
he received the blow which disabled him
from firing with effect. The gun was
discharged
in the scuffle, but its contents lodged
harmlessly in the side of the hill. In an
instant
,
however, the savage was again on his
feet. He was a powerful and active man, and
Austin would have had a dangerous and
difficult
struggle to undergo, had not his antagonist
perceived the approach of Butler. One leap
carried him almost to the bottom of the hill,
where he plunged amidst the thickest of the
woods, and disappeared.
The attention of the victors was now
directed
to the females, who had fled, with terror,
into the woods, at the commencement of the
combat. But the extreme thickness of the
undergrowth rendered it impossible for them
to proceed far. They, however, secreted
themselves
,
and anxiously awaited the issue of the
contest. Finding that their deliverers were
victorious, they re-appeared to express their
gratitude and throw themselves on their
protection
.
But who can imagine the sensations of Henry
Austin, when he beheld so lovely a being as
Agnes Norwood, kneeling to return thanks to
Heaven for her deliverance, in effecting which
he had the happiness of being so instrumental.
Her amiable companion, Mary Watson, who
knelt beside her; his own companion and
colleague
in the victory, Butler; the slain Indians;
the whole scene of woods and mountains, earth
and the heavens, that surrounded him, allall
were forgotten, or rather extinguished in the
absorbing sensation of that enrapturing gaze
with which he beheld her. And she, when
her grateful outpourings to Heaven were
finished
,
and rising to salute him, for the first time
noticed his ardent gaze, and surveyed his
generous
countenanceshe, too, felt as if there was
none but him in the world.From that
moment
,
indeed, they became all the world to
each other. On that spot, and in that moment,
love exerted his supremacy over two youthful
hearts as pure, as fervent, and as faithful as
ever beat in human bosoms. It is true, they
were entire strangers; they knew nothing of
each other; and yet they felt as if they, for the
first time, beheld beauty and perfection, of
whose existence they had been long aware,
but which had never before been presented to
them in a vision so full of truth, blessedness,
and love.
CHAPTER III.
Fierce prowler, to thy woods away,
Why should the virtuous be thy prey?
Why doth thine eye licentious rove
On maiden's charms for maiden's love?
Or is it vengeance fires thy heart,
To act the unmanly ruffian's part?
Sefton
.
The outrage upon Miss Norwood and her
friend, of which we have been speaking, was
the first that had been committed by the
Indians
,
on any of the inhabitants of Wyoming,
for many years. It was, therefore, totally
unexpected
,
and threw the whole district into the
utmost consternation. It was caused by the
intestine commotion which then agitated the
whole continent. It was one of the remote
heavings of that might commotion which
effected
such a change in the destinies of man
the American Revolution. A crisis was then
taking place in the fortunes of the western
world, and such a one as was not to be
accomplished
without a violence, which shook the
fabric of society, and was felt at the most
extreme
verge of civilization.
The outrage we are now considering, was
excited by some fugitive tories from New
England, who had taken refuge among the
savages
.
Its origin was, in truth, closely
conneeted
with the affairs of Butler, although,
ignorant
of the circumstance, he was so
instrumental
in defeating and avenging it. His
prosecutors
,
the Whigs of New Haven, had many
relations among the settlers of Wyoming. In
revenge, therefore, for the condemnation
passed
upon him, which it was not doubted would
be executed, as well as in resentment of the
patriotic principles which predominated in
the settlement, some of his gang, after its
dispersion
in Connecticut, fled to the country of
the Mohawk Indians, and exerted every
artifice
to inflame them against the settlers. The
Mohawks were ready enough to hearken to
these instigations, not only on account of their
desire for plunder, but also of some claims
which they had to a portion of the lands
occupied
by the settlement.
Their chiefs, however, would not rashly
engage
in such a war. The neighbouring whites,
with whom they had long lived on peaceable
terms, had given them no recent cause of offence.
Besides, in the quarrel between the government
of Britain and the colonies, they believed that
their wisest course would be to remain neutral.
Old resentment against the colonies, however,
operated in their minds. They had not
forgotten
the usurpation of their lands, and the
exterminating
wars so frequently waged against
their race. While, therefore, they refused as
a nation to commit any act of hostility, they
permitted it to be understood that they would
not too strictly scrutinize the conduct of any
individuals of their tribe who might join the
tories in their depredations on the whigs, or
undertake of themselves, any enterprise against
the frontier settlements. In consequence of
this tacit permission, many of the more
adventurous
Indians began in small parties to harass
the colonists for the purposes of plunder or
revenge
.
The seizure of Agnes Norwood and
her companion, Mary Watson, the issue of
which has been narrated, was the first of a
series
of outrages which the inhabitants of
Wyoming
were destined to endure from the
spirit
of hostility thus awakened in the minds of
the savages. The suggestion of one Silas
Bateman, a zealous partizan of Butler, was the
immediate cause of this outrage. He applied
himself to a half-breed Indian of a daring and
ferocious character, who possessed great
influence
among the Mohawks. This man's name,
which has since become infamous in history,
was Brandt. He had, for some time past,
harboured
much animosity against the people of
Wyoming, and particularly against Dr.
Watson
,
of whose character the reader is already
apprised. This arose from the following
incident
.
About two years before the present
adventure
,
Brandt had accompanied a trading party
of his tribe to Wyoming. While there, in a
fit of intoxication, he quarrelled with one of
the inhabitants, whom he wounded with a
knife, so dangerously, that recovery was not
expected. Brandt was arrested, and the
evidence
of Dr. Watson, who had witnessed the
affray, was decisive against him. He was
convicted
;
but as the person whom he wounded,
had not died, he was only sentenced to some
months imprisonment, a punishment to which
the leaders of his tribe gave their consent,
acknowledging
it to be just. Brandt, however,
considered himself disgraced, and resented it
exceedingly. Before half the term of his
sentence
had transpired, he broke from prison
and escaped; his bosom glowing with revenge
against the whole of the population of
Wyoming
,
but particularly against Dr. Watson, whom
he looked upon as the principal author of his
disgrace.
He was, therefore, a willing listener to the
suggestions of Bateman, and a ready
instrument
in his hands, to execute any enterprise
of violence against the objects of his
resentment
.
Accordingly, as soon as he understood
that the chiefs of his tribe would be willing to
overlook whatever outrage he might commit
upon the whites, he, in conjunction with three
of his boldest and most zealous confederates,
undertook the enterprise which, as we have
seen, terminated so disastrously for his party,
he himself being the only one that escaped.
His chief object was the destruction of Dr.
Watson. But in this he was disappointed, the
intended victim happening to be from home at
the time of the attack. The doctor's house
being
situated in the outskirts of the village, was
easily assailed; and the attack was made at a
late hour in the evening, when the assailants
supposed there was little danger of alarming
the inhabitants before the completion of their
design. Unhappily for Agnes Norwood, she
happened to be on a visit to her friend at the
time the marauders entered the house. The
only other inmates were a male and a female
servant. The former in attempting to resist
the entrance of the savages, was killed; the
latter escaped by a back door, and hastened to
alarm the village. The savages perceived this,
and knowing there was no time to plunder or
destroy any of the property, they seized the
terrified Agnes and Mary, stiffled their cries
by gagging them, and carried them off. The
direction of their flight was not known to any
of the villagers, and although an active pursuit
was soon commenced, it was in vain. But
Providence
D
sent deliverance to the captives from
another quarter. An old man, of singular
habits
,
and mysterious conduct, usually known
by the name of the Hermit of the Woods,
made his haunts in a secluded and rugged
valley
some miles distant. Here, the day
following
the outrage, he discovered the savages,
with their captives, encamped for the purpose
of rest and refreshment. Having, from the
arrangements they were making, satisfied
himself
that they intended remaining there for the
night, he set off with the design of apprising
the people of Wyoming, when, on his way,
he met with Austin and Butler, as before
stated.
On the return of Agnes and Mary under
the protection of their deliverers, to their
disconsolate
friends, the joy of the inhabitants of
Wyoming may be easier imagined than
expressed
.
The sincerest gratitude towards their
deliverers pervaded every bosom. Austin and
Butler became favourites throughout the whole
settlement. The toryism and late misconduct
of the latter, though they were universally
known, were universally forgiven. His
conversion
from error was considered sincere;
and, whatever had been his guilt, it was
amply
atoned for by the important service he had
now rendered. As for Austin, there was no
drawback upon the esteem in which he was
held. The arrival of his friends was hailed as
a valuable acquisition, which, in truth, it was,
to the strength and resources of the colony.
It may be imagined that among those who
felt most gratitude for the services, and esteem
for the virtues, of Henry Austin, was to be
found the father of Agnes Norwood. The
fervour
with which he strained his hand to his
heart when, with tears of joy, he thanked him
for the preservation of his daughter, imparted
to Henry's feelings a thrill of delight that would
have amply repaid, a thousand-fold the degree
of danger he encountered in the performance of
that happy achievement. Butler, too, received
from Mr. Norwood the thanks which he
deserved
.
But his experienced eye perceived
the superior fervour with which the reverend
gentleman, perhaps unconsciously, addressed
his companion. He also observed the looks
which spoke a feeling much warmer than the
warmest gratitude, that brightened the
countenance
of the lovely Agnes, whenever she would
rest her eyes on the happy Henry. The fiend
of jealousy, from that moment, seized upon the
depraved spirit of Butler. He began to hate
Henry; and forgetful of the obligation he owed
his sister Isabella, and the impassioned vows
he had often pledged to her, he began even to
dislike her. A new and fiercer flame,
inspired
by the superior charms of Agnes, had arisen
in his breast. But he was an adept in deception,
and had the art to conceal the change in his
feelings, and even to conduct himself in such
a manner as to gain upon the esteem of those he
hated. He had several very influential relations
in the colony; one of whom, a cousin, named
Zebulon Butler, with whom he chiefly resided,
was so popular, that he was, shortly after this
period, elected commander of the small army
which the inhabitants raised for their
protection
from any future aggression of the Indians.
This circumstance had, for a time, some
influence
in counteracting the effects of Butler's
jealousy
of Henry, and his increasing hatred of
the Austins. He hoped that he might yet, by
adopting a popular course of conduct, raise
himself to an equal influence with his cousin;
and acquire such a degree of authority in the
colony as would enable him to accomplish his
views of matrimony, with the fascinating Agnes,
in despite of the present favour enjoyed by his
rival.
Henry, in the mean time, did not dream of
the alteration that had taken place in the
feelings
and designs of Butler. He conceived that
gratitude and love had bound him firmly to his
sister, and to the interests of all her friends.
His professions of attachment to the popular
cause seemed to be unquestionably sincere, and
as it was a cause in which Henry was an
enthusiast
,
he could not but esteem him the more
for that attachment. Henry, therefore, treated
other as an assured friend, who had shared
with him the glory of a noble and fortunate
exploit
,
and was likely soon to become nearly
connected with him by a union with his only
sister.
Every man must have experienced that there
are some characters in this world, whom we
may believe that we have every reason to
esteem and think trust-worthy, and yet, although
we cannot tell why, we feel unable to open to
them all our minds, or bestow upon them our
unreserved regard. There is an indefinite
something
about them which renders us backward in
yielding them our confidence; and, in despite
of ourselves, limits even the extent of our good
wishes for them. Henry possessed this feeling
in respect to Butler, even at the period of their
closest intimacy. He was sorry for it. He
blamed himself for a repugnance he could not
help. He ascribed it to prejudice against his
former course of life. Often did he combat
with it as an unworthy feeling: but in vain.
With all his efforts, he never could become the
unreserved friend and thorough admirer of
D 2
Butler. Frequently did he feel sorry for his
sister's infatuation in loving this man; and,
although her happiness seemed to depend on a
union with him, he often felt as if he could
wish some event to take place which would
frustrate its accomplishment.
But there was one man in the village to
whom he delighted to open his heart; one whose
integrity of soul, (although he was to him, as
yet, but a comparative stranger,) he felt as if he
would be committing an act of dishonour to doubt
one who, although reserved and unobtrusive,
had acquired his esteem so entirely, that he
perseveringly
sought his friendship until he gained
it. This person was Dr. Watson. On his
principles
he had reliance, and in his confidence he
felt safe. Many were the pleasant and
instructive
hours these sincere friends passed together
in the shade of the tall oaks that skirted the
broad rolling Susquehanna. The attachment
that existed between Henry and Miss Norwood,
was well known to Dr. Watson. There were,
indeed, but few people in the village who did
not surmise it. Love affairs are mighty matters
in small villages; and usually furnish the most
frequent and interesting topics of gossip which
the uniform tranquillity of rustic seclusion can
supply. Henry had not been many weeks a
resident at Wyoming before the good natured
villagers had set him down as the destined
husband
of Agnes Norwood. In the estimation
of all prophetic spirits, it was so suitable, it
was so likely, it was so
just the thing
, that it
could not but take place. There was only one
individual in the settlement that dissented from
this arrangement of the good villagers, or felt
hostile to its accomplishment. This individual
was John Butler. His conviction of their
mutual
attachment gnawed at his heart; and every
allusion to it, by the gossips of the place, stung
him like a scorpion. He, however, was a
consummate
master of duplicity, and preserved a
strict silence on the subject, affecting to occupy
his mind with more important concerns. But
he had internally vowed that their union never
should take place, during his life, without being
cemented by blood.
How different were the feelings of Dr.
Watson
!
He loved Agnes as passionately, but he
loved her more purely, and with a heart so
entirely and exclusively devoted to her
welfare
,
that he ardently wished for her union
with the man she preferred, especially since he
knew that man to be so eminently qualified to
render her happy. Such was the contrast
between
the characters of Henry's rivalsthe
contrast between virtue and vice!
CHAPTER IV.
Oppression's iron reign is o'er,
Our bonds are burst, we're slaves no more.
Let the triumphant clarion swell
The glorious news abroad to tell;
And let our heartfelt jubilee
Declare our native land is free.
Sefton
.
It was a beautiful evening about the middle
of July, 1776Shall I describe it? Nothing
would be easiernothing more agreeable. All
its features are, at this moment, glowing
as vividly in my mind's vision, as ever the
charms of the fairest landscape shone in the
corporeal eye of a poetical admirer of the
glories
of nature. But summer evenings, under
every variety of appearance, have been
described
so often and so well, that there is nothing
left for me to say; and to repeat epithets which,
however appropriate and just, have, at this age
of literature, become trite and familiar, would
be worse than supererogationit would be a
useless expenditure of my own time, as well as
that of my readers.
On the evening to which I refer, Henry
Austin and Dr. Watson were enjoying the
cooling breeze in a favourite retreat among
linden
trees, on the bank of the stream of Sharon.
The great drama of the timesin which all
the daring spirits of the land were engaged, was
the subject of their conversation.
I cannot understand, said Henry, how
any American, who has the feelings of a man,
can take part with a government that would
bind his country in the fetters of arbitrary
power; for to lay on imposts at will, is to
exercise
such power. Slaves alone can be made
the objects of unlimited exactionthe bearers
of involuntary burthens. The conduct of our
tories is, to me, quite inexplicable.
The opinions of men, observed his
companion
,
even on subjects apparently the least
liable to controversy, are so various, that mere
difference of sentiment on this great question,
does not surprise me. I can imagine and
believe
that even good and intelligent men may
feel a conviction that the mother country
has just claims to the prerogative she has
attempted
to exercise. But that any number of
men should be so zealous for such sentiments,
as to enforce them by the destruction of their
nearest friends, affords, indeed, a theme for
astonishment, and implies motives of action
which I cannot comprehend. The destructive
hostility of men towards each other, for mere
difference of opinion, which our country at
present too fatally experiences, appears to me
the height of criminal infatuation, inexplicable
on any principle of rational sense or natural
feeling.
If those who have resisted the
encroachments
of British authority, said Henry, had,
in the first instance, denounced all who would
not join in that resistance, self-defence would
have justified the tories in acting as they have
done. But no such denouncement took place.
All men were
invited
to repel the unjust
aggression
of Britain, but none were
forced
to do
soand I am aware of no instance of violence
exerted by the patriots against any whose
dissentient
opinions did not carry them into overt
acts of devastation or bloodshed.
The moderation and forbearance of the
friends of liberty, amidst the most galling
provocations
,
answered the Doctor, are, in truth,
worthy of admiration, and augur favourably of
their final success. Contrasted with the
ferocity
of the opposite faction, what praise does it
not deserve? But, oh, my friend, if there had
been any means of avoiding the unhappy
struggle
,
without sacrificing the most invaluable
rights, how much suffering and sorrow would
have been avoided; and what cause would
humanity
have had to rejoice! The details you
have given me of scenes you have yourself
witnessed, and the accounts which we almost
daily receive of the events passing in our cities
and populous districts, are truly heart-rending.
Would to Heaven that rulers could appreciate
the evil effects of, at any time, driving a
gallant
people into the resistance of wrongs?
The calamities that overspread the country,
and will continue to do so while the contest
lasts, said Henry, are indeed to be
deplored
.
But if they are the price at which the
liberty of the country is to be purchased, surely
no patriotic heart will grudge the payment.
The object for which we have chosen to
encounter
the evils of war is glorious. If we
attain it, generations yet unborn will enjoy its
benefits, and honour our names, and bless our
memories, for the sacrifices we shall make.
This is the consummation to which our patriots
look forward, as the glorious recompense of
their toils, their dangers, and their sufferings.
If, said the Doctor, the great measure
of proclaiming our country independent, now
in agitation by Congress, were once adopted, I
should then less grudge the sacrifices and the
miseries that the generous and the brave of the
land are destined to undergo. The contest
would then have a definite aim to which every
eye would be directed. There would be a fixed
point, an established and ascertained object,
round which every noble heart would rally,
and to defend which every valiant arm would
be raised. But, at present, the unsettled and
undetermined, nay often discordant views of
our best patriots, distract their councils,
disconcert
their measures, and expose their cause
and their country to many misfortunes and
much distress, from which they might
otherwise
be exempted.
There is reason to hope, replied Henry,
that affairs will not remain long in this
unsettled
condition. Our congress consists of a body
of men of as firm, fearless, and patriotic minds,
as ever were assembled; and it is confidently
believed, that the members are well aware that
the salvation of the country depends on the
adoption of this great measure. For myself, I
have full reliance on their wisdom and
integrity
,
and have not the slightest apprehension
that they will shrink from their duty.
At that moment the Hermit of the Woods
the old man who had conducted Henry and
Butler to the rescue of Miss Norwood and her
friendstood before them.
Rejoice Americans! said heYou are
now a nation. The yoke of the foreigner
is broken. The mighty voice has gone forth
which every land shall hear with delight, and
every tyrant with dismay, that you are FREE
AND INDEPENDENT. Arouse all your energies
to maintain the glorious privilege, ye men of
the new-born nation, for to do so your lives,
your fortunes, and your sacred honour, are
pledged in the sight of Heaven and of the
world!
Whence is thy intelligence, Rodolph?
asked Dr. Watson.
Thou dost not doubt its accuracy? my
son, inquired the Hermit.
No, I have never heard aught but truth
from thy lips, replied the Doctor. But, to
us, thy news is so important and interesting,
that to know all its particulars will be grateful
to our hearts.
Yesterday, said Rodolphby express
from Philadelphia, the tidings reached
Allentown
.
The blessed Declaration was read in
an assembly of the people. I heard the banks
of the Lehigh resound with the acclamations of
the multitude; and I hastened hither with the
joyful intelligence. Here is, in print, a copy
of the sacred instrument of your freedom.
Make it known to your people. Let them
raise the voice of thanksgiving to Heaven; and
dedicate, for ever, to jubilee and joy, the
birthday
of their nation!
So saying, he handed to Dr. Watson a
printed
copy of the Declaration of Independence,
and hastily disappeared.
The delight with which the patriotic people
E
of Wyoming received this important
intelligence
,
was expressed by long and fervent
acclamations
,
the discharge of fire arms, the
parading
of their little military band, the blazing
of bonfires, and other demonstrations of public
rejoicing usual in remote villages. The day
following the arrival of the news, Mr.
Norwood
invited the people to assemble in his
church, where, after reading to them the great
charter of their freedom, he addressed them as
follows:
My fellow citizens: You have just heard the
most important public manifesto that ever was
issued. It is the mighty instrument of
franchisement
,
which delivers one half the world
from the thraldom in which it was held by the
otherfor not the present generation alone,
but the innumerable unborn millions who will
yet fill this immense hemisphere, are destined
to enjoy its incalculable benefits. From the
date of this glorious charter, has commenced a
change not for us only, but for the human race,
which will elevate the humble and the lowly of
every clime from the contempt and
degradation
in which they have been held by the
powerful
and the proud. The sentiments of
liberality
promulgated in this document, will go forth
like axioms, and form the political faith that
shall regulate the movements of the mightiest
nations. All men are born equal, is a truth
before the prevalence of which the pretensions
of kings and nobles to exclusive privileges and
immunities in the social system, will disperse
as the shadow flies before the beams of the
sun. The right of the people to
self-government
,
and their capacity to exercise it
properly
and to their own advantage, will become
recognised as an article of belief which it will
be thought absurdity to controvert. In short,
mankind
shall so deeply venerate this declaration,
that it will become the text-book of freedom,
the manual of patriotism to all generations.
What are its effects on yourselves, since ye
have heard the elevating spirit of its
sentiments
,
its bold announcement of your
emancipation
?
Are you not exalted in your own
estimation
?
Do you not feel as if chains had
fallen from your limbs? Do you not, inspired
with the dignity of freemen, almost imagine
that you breathe the air more freely, and
move with greater elasticity? The humility
and timidity of serfs have departed from your
spirits. But yesterday you felt as if your
patriotism
were treasonto-day you feel that it
is allegianceallegiance to the country of your
birth, to the government of your choice, and
not to an oppressor in a distant quarter of the
globe, with whom you can have no common
interest, and who, for you, can have no fellow
feeling.
Of the soil on which ye tread, ye are now
the paramount lords. Before the date of this
instrument you held it but in subjection to a
stranger whose counsellors have latterly
assumed
the right to exact from you the fruits
of your industry without your consent. Your
resistance to this injustice was called treason.
But traitors you cannot
now
be, for, thanks to
this document, you are no longer subjects to the
foe. You are citizens, free and independent lords
of a soil that owns no foreign master.You are,
it is true, weak in comparison to your foe. So is
the eagle in comparison to the lion, yet it has a
spirit equally daring, and in the independence
of its nature, acknowledges subjection to no
earthly lord. O! my countrymen, may the King
of kings, who is now your only sovereign,
render you worthy of your new-born rights,
and enable you to struggle successfully with
the terrible storms you shall have to
encounter
,
in defending them. Shrink not in the
hour of peril, ye who are now the fathers of a
nation! The morning of your existence is
tempestuous
and dark; but it will usher in a day
of glorious tranquillity, when the fruits of
your labours shall diffuse joy over a grateful
land, and the blessings of millions shall crown
your memories with immortality.
This address made a deep impression on its
auditorsthe true patriots became more zealous,
the wavering became firm, and many who had
hitherto been opposed to the cause of liberty
from the dread of committing treason, now
conceiving themselves freed from their
allegiance
to royalty, unhesitatingly declared their
adhesion to the patriotic side. Still,
however
,
there were numbers whose attachment to
the ancient order of things, rendered them
hostile to the great measure now adopted.
Many of these had favoured the resistance to
British usurpation, but had never desired a
separation
from British connexion or release
from British authority. The hardened and
resolved
tories were strengthened by the
accession
of such; and the bold and irretraceable
step which the whigs had now taken, aroused
their animosity to an implacable degree, and
they became more zealous and active than ever
in the warfare which they waged against the
friends of liberty. The whole heart and soul
of John Butler were secretly with these. Their
leaders knew it, and placed entire confidence
in him. With all their machinations and
designs
he was made acquainted; and frequently,
by his advice and management, he contributed to
E 2
the success of their enterprises. He, however,
in public preserved an appearance of attachment
to the popular cause. This he did with the
double view of serving his own party the more
effectually by treachery to the other, and of
availing himself of any favourable occurrence
that might take place to aggrandize himself by
means of the whigs, in which, had he
succeeded
,
it is doubtful whether his principles might
not have accommodated themselves to his
interest
.
Be this as it may, he, for some months,
conducted himself so much to the satisfaction
of the people of Wyoming, that their most
vigilant
patriots found no cause to make him an
object of either disapprobation or suspicion.
CHAPTER V.
Since we must part,before this holy shrine,
And in the presence of the Power Divine,
Our heart's sincerity our lips shall prove,
And swear unchanging faithfulness in love.
We'll join our fates in one for ever now,
Bound and
betrothed
by an eternal vow!
Harley
.
The promulgation of the Declaration of
Independence
,
although a bold, was an extremely
prudent and well-timed measure. Without its
encouraging tendencies, the numerous disasters
which befell the American arms during the
subsequent five or six months, must have
occasioned
the most resolute friends of the popular
cause to give it up in despair. After the loss
of the great battle of Long Island, a series of
defeats reduced the combatants for freedom to
the mere skeleton of an ill-supplied and
much-suffering
army, harassed and pursued from
place to place, by a victorious, numerous, and
well-appointed foe.
This was that period of desponding
prospects
which is emphatically said to have
tried
men's souls
. The most sanguine began to
despond, and in thebosoms of the timid, hope
was extinguished. The noblest cause for which
a people ever fought, depended entirely on the
firmness and management of
one
man, aided
by only the remnant of an army of harassed,
wearied and worn-out fugitives, so ill-appointed
that they had not clothing sufficient to defend
them from the severity of an inclement winter.
But that man was
Washington
, and those
fugitives
were THE HEROES OF SEVENTY-SIX,
who soon became the conquerors of Trenton
and Princeton, and snatched, by their hardy
valour, the cause of their country
the cause
of man
from the brink of ruin. Even after
these brilliant achievements had shed their
cheering influence over the cause, the horizon
became again darkened by the disasters of
Brandywine and Germantown, and the
country's
necessities called aloud to her sons for
sympathy and succour.
By none was the call more keenly felt than
by Henry Austin; and his ardour at length
received
the sanction of his father. This ardour
was participated by many of the patriotic
youth of the settlement; and he was enabled
to collect a generous band of about fifty
volunteers
,
who enrolled themselves beneath his
command for the purpose of joining the army
under Washington. As the day of his
departure
drew near, his patriotism had to contend
with the force of a powerful passion which
swayed his bosom as strongly as ever it swayed
the bosom of man. This passion was love
love for Agnes Norwood, whose image had
become, from the first moment he beheld her,
entwined with his very existence. Day and
night was she the subject of his meditations.
Her charms were the delicious food of his
imagination; and he felt as if he could live no
where, with satisfaction, but in her presence.
And she had long since acknowledged a
mutual
love. Many and sweet were the hours of
romantic fervour they had passed together since
that acknowledgment took place. Their
attachment
was sanctioned by their parents.
Henry
appeared to Mr. Norwood just such a
husband
as he could wish for his daughter, and
Mr. Austin rejoiced in the happy fortune
which had gained for his son the affections of a
female so fair and so worthy as Agnes
Norwood
.
For one reason in particular, he
rejoiced
in the circumstance. He hoped that her
charms would have sufficient influence to retain
him at home, and check his patriotic eagerness
to embark in the dangers of war. And,
indeed
,
these charms had been sufficient for this
purpose, until Henry heard of the depth of his
country's misfortunes, and the encreasing
gloom which, after the battle of
Germantown
,
overshadowed her cause. His sense of
duty then came in aid of his patriotism, and
he resolved to make a mighty effort to break
the fascinations of love and the enjoyments of
home, in order to serve a cause in the success
of which he felt so strongly interested. Yet
so powerful was his passion, that after he had
procured his father's consent to join the army,
and had even organized his band of followers,
his heart almost failed him, and he became
irresolute
in his determination to leave, even but
for a season, the dear object of his soul's desire.
While under the influence of this feeling he
visited her. He found her in her father's
parlour
.
I come, my Agnes, said he, to state
that your fascinations have conquered. Love
has prevailed.Patriotism, duty, desire of
gloryall, all have yielded to my dread of
separating from thee. I have decided to
remain
with thee. I feel I have done wrong:
but, O! for charms like thine, who would not
relinquish every thing? If my feelings were
known, the severest would forgive my error.
Henry, said she, what do I hear!
Wilt thou refuse thy arm to thy country in her
distress?But, perhaps, thou art right: we
may be happy here, although liberty should
be driven from the land!
What! Agnes, he exclaimed, as if her
tone, rather than her words, had caused a
forgotten
feeling to startle his mind, what
sayest
thou? Could we be happy as slaves?
Yes; with love like ours, even in slavery
we might be happy! But, Henry,
self-abasement
,
such a mind as thine could not endure.
Self-abasement! Agnes? What abasement
is there in preferring thy love to all things? In
preferring thy society to that of soldiers; thy
beauteous presence in this valley, to the
clamours
of a camp?
It is preferring the indulgence of selfish
wishes, to the performance of duty. Henry,
canst thou not see how that would produce
self-abasement?
True, Agnes! I see it.
Couldst thou endure the torments of such
a degraded feeling?
No, Agnes! I fear not easily. But thy
smiles would be my recompense, my relief,
my unfailing comfort.
But could I smile if thou wert unhappy?
Or could I comfort thee, if thou hadst lost thy
own esteem?
Ah! I feel thy words, my beloved! Thou
art the angel of my protection.My own
esteem
!I
shall not lose it. I will do my duty.
Assist me, Agnes! strengthen me with thy
counsel. Enable me to leave thee for a time,
that I may fly to the post of duty, and be
worthy
of thy love.
When thou shalt do so, Henry, I will
esteem
theenay, if possible, I will love thee
more than now!
He caught her hands rapturously. Thanks
to thee, my only love! he said, thou hast
saved me from my weakness. Thou shalt
esteem
,
as well as love me. My country needs
me. I will do my duty!
Although our separation, Henry, should
break my heart, I would not be the means of
detaining thee from thy duty. Thy departure
to the busy world where thou mayest forget
me, or to scenes of danger where thou mayest
be slainO! Henry, such thoughts distract
me.Yetyet, thou must gothy country
calls, and what is my happiness, or even thine,
that we should indulge it at her expense?
Agnes, I could worship thee for such
sentiments
.
I will leave thee for my country's
sake. Heaven will protect thee in my absence
in recompense of thy virtue.And I too shall
win favour from above for the severe sacrifice
I now make in obedience to the calls of duty.
But forget thee, didst thou say? No, not for a
moment, Agnes, shall thy image be absent
from my recollectionthy loveliness from my
heart. But, my beloved, can we not unite
before
my departure? Methinks, I could go
with less sorrow and reluctance, could I call
thee my own?
Henry, dost thou allude to marriage?
We are both youngtoo young, perhaps.But
let our fathers decide.Return here at six this
evening. I will reflect on the subject. I will
consult my father. Do thou consult thine.
Henry's father did not approve of his son's
marriage under present circumstances. I
confess, he said, that Miss Norwood is in
all respects worthy of you. Your having
placed your affections on her affords me great
satisfaction. But you are now going on a
toilsome
and dangerous pursuit. I should wish
you to go single and untrammelled with
domestic
cares, so that your new profession may
receive your whole devotion, by which means
you will be more likely to command success.
But should disaster happen to you; should you
be wounded or slain, (casualties which, I trust,
Heaven will avert,) it will be enough that I and
my family be made miserable. Why expose
another family to the same hazard of sorrow,
by needlessly connecting yourself with it in
marriage? Should you marry, you do not
propose
remaining at home to enjoy your wife's
society. You would make her your wife to
F
abandon her after the ceremony, and expose
her to the risk of becoming an early widow.
Is this love, or is it selfishness? But you say,
you wish only to secure her fidelity? Has she
not owned her attachment, and promised
constancy
in return for your's? And do you doubt
her truth? You cannot. It would be a feeling
unworthy of the lover of Miss Norwood.
Henry was struck with his father's
observations
.
He felt that it would be sweet to call
Agnes his own. But it would be unjust to
expose her as his wife to the distress of any
accident that might befall him in the war.
True, she loved him, and were he
unfortunately
to fall, even though unmarried to him, she
would grieve with a sincere and deep sorrow.
But would not that sorrow sooner end in the
maid than in the wife? At all events, he
would not at the present, urge the marriage,
since his father disapproved of it, unless Mr.
Norwood's opinion should be more favourable
towards it, which he did not venture to expect.
Henry judged rightly of Mr. Norwood's
opinion. That gentleman, anxiously alive for
his daughter's welfare, thought that her
marriage
with so young a man on the eve of his
departure from the settlement, and on a
hazardous
pursuit, would be extremely imprudent.
Let a few years roll on, said he to
Agnes
.
This tempestuous period will pass by,
and happier times may bless the land with
peace and freedom and prosperity. Henry
and you, my daughter, will be still young
enough to engage in the cares of the marriage
state, and I shall then be happy in joining your
hands and giving you my blessing.
To her father's opinion Agnes bowed
implicitly
.
In all that concerned herself, his
opinion was her creed, his will was her law.
When Henry according to appointment visited
her that evening, she stated to him the
objections
made by her father to their marriage
under present circumstances. He saw them in
their full force, and he admitted them, and
forbore
to press his suit for immediate happiness;
although, when he beheld her loveliness in all
its blooming graces before him, he internally
deplored the untoward circumstances that
withheld
him, for a time, from the possession of
such charms.
That evening, towards twilight, the lovers
walked out together along the banks of the
Sharon. It was the eve of Henry's departure.
His company of volunteers were assembled in
the village, in readiness to march the next
morning. Had his marriage, therefore, taken
place, short, indeed, must have been his stay
with his bride. This consideration, in some
measure, reconciled him to the
disappointment
.
Oh Agnes, said he, I was certainly too
inconsiderate in the wishes I expressed, for if
thou wert made my own, I feel that I could not
leave thee, and my duty should be neglected.
Indeed, she replied, I am persuaded
that the postponement of our nuptials, is both
prudent and proper. If Providence shall hear
my constant prayers, and restore thee to thy
friends in more propitious times, our union
will then have the sanction of our parents, and
the joy of that hour will not be blighted by the
grief of separation.
They had now reached the entrance of the
village church. They observed the door partly
open. They concluded that it had been left so
by the negligence of some person employed in
making repairs inside. They entered the holy
place. All was still and silent as the interior
of the graves that surrounded it. Who has
ever visited a temple of the Divinity, built with
hands, when devoid of worshippers, without
being impressed with a sensation of the awful
solemnity that pervades the sacred edifice. It
is a feeling as if we were in the immediate
presence
of the Supreme of all things, surrounded
by his ministering angelsfor we imagine, or,
at least have sensations skin to the imagination,
that such a place can never be unoccupied; and
since human worshippers are absent, their
place must be filled and their functions
performed
,
by invisible intelligences of a higher
and more holy order.
The lovers felt, that if they were not
surrounded
by such intelligences, they were
altogether
without witnesses of their fervent
expressions
of mutual fondness and never-ending
constancy.
Oh! my beloved, said Henry, it is not
any fickleness of thy mind I dread; for I
believe
that thou art all truth and sincerity. But
events may occur in my absence severely to
try thy faith. Forgive me, therefore, if I wish
it secured by some solemn vow. Become my
betrothed
plight
thyself to me within this solemn
shrine of God, and before that holy place from
whence thy father's lips have so often
poured
forth pious instruction, and promulgated
the obligations of our holy faith. In the name
of love, and for the sake of my peace of mind
when I shall be afar off, let me entreat thee, to
kneel with me in this sacred temple, where it
may be long before we again meet, and, in the
awful presence of
Him
to whom the place is
consecrated, let us pledge to each other
unwavering
faith, and eternal lovelet us swear
F 2
that in wedlock neither of us shall ever pledge
our vows to any other.
They knelt, they caught each other's right
hands, and before God and his angels, they
swore the oath of betrothment, and sealed it
with a fervent kiss. That moment a voice
suddenly but sweetly said, Heaven has
registered
that vow. Oh! ye
Betrothed
! let it
never be broken!
The lovers started to their feet in confusion;
but conscious of no sin, they felt no alarm.
They looked round, and beheld standing
behind
them the Hermit of the Woods.
Pardon my intrusion, said he, it was
not intentional. The door was open. I
entered
.
I approached too near before I
perceived
you, to withdraw without disturbing
you. I, therefore, remained silent till your
vows were passed, when I thought it better to
discover myself than run the hazard of being
discovered by you. I have long known your
loves.I have now witnessed your
betrothment
but
fear nothing. I am your friend,
and your secret is safe.
Good Rodolph, said Henry, we know
you are our friendwe have effectually
experienced
your friendship. What you have seen
and heard, you were sent by Heaven to
witness
.
We, therefore, murmur not at your
presence. But in this holy place and sanctified
moment, we crave thy blessing.
May the great Being who rules above, and
who is worshipped here, bless you, my
children
.
May he watch over you when far
asunder, and in other days bring you together,
that you may redeem the vows you have pledged
this evening, and under happy auspices, fulfil
your Betrothment! He said and departed.
CHAPTER VI.
Heaven first taught letters for some wretch's aid,
Some banished lover, or some captive maid;
They live, they speak, they breathe what love inspires,
Warm from the soul, and faithful to its fires.
The virgin's wish without her fears impart,
Excuse the blush and pour forth all the heart,
Speed the soft intercourse from soul to soul,
And waft a sigh from Indus to the Pole.
Pope
.
Whoever has witnessed the departure from
a small village, upon a distant enterprise of
importance and danger, of a band of soldiers
endeared to the inhabitants by long residence
and ties of affinity, must have been moved by
the many spontaneous effusions of sincere
affection
;
the tears, the embraces, the tender
exhortations
,
the blessings, and the heart-warm
prayers for the protection of Heaven, which
are fervently reciprocated by friends, relatives
and lovers, now parting, many of them to meet
no more. This is the revealing hour of
attachment
.
Emotions of love which were hitherto
concealed
,
now break forth, and show themselves
freely, though, perhaps timidly, before the face
of day. A degree of license is permitted to the
public outpourings of the heart on such
occasions
,
which on others would be considered
unseemly
or indecorous. It is not the parting
embraces
and sorrows of parents and children, or
sisters and brothers, that are now alone tolerated
by the sympathizing feelings of the public; the
bursting forth of the grief of young and
bashful
lovers is viewed as neither misplaced nor
unbecoming. The hearts of all are softened,
and enter fully into the pathetic spirit of the
scene; and partake so much of its tenderness
as to comprehend and value the kindly
influence
from which it flows.
Such a scene, in all its variety of feelings,
and intensity of emotions, was, much to his
chagrin, witnessed by John Butler, the royalist,
on the day that Henry Austin and his brave
band of patriotic volunteers, departed from
Wyoming to join the encampment at Valley
Forge. Yet Butler rejoiced at the departure
of these men. It removed to a distance many
of his enemies, and diminished the strength of
the whig interest in the settlement. He was
only chagrined to see how much they were
beloved; and if a wish of his could have
annihilated
these patriotic soldiers and those who
lavished on them their parting caresses, that
wish would have gone forth with the joyous
energy of malignant triumph. He still wore
the cloak of patriotism; but the time had come
when he gave up the intention of wearing it
much longer. He had tried popularity for many
months, but it had gained him no confidence;
it had procured him no public trust, no official
emolument. He now saw reasons for
permitting
the current of his affections to revert into
their former channel. It reverted, however,
secretly. It did not yet suit his views to
change his outward professions or his
observable
conduct. Hypocrisy was, for some time
yet, his surest game, and he played it
admirably
.
The leaders of the people were deceived.
It was, therefore, easy to dupe the people
themselves. But he deceived them no longer
for office. That object he saw was hopeless.
He deceived them for his own safety and their
ruin.
At this period, many families fled from the
populous districts that were the seats of the
war, to seek repose and safety in more remote
settlements. The settlement of Wyoming
offered
abundant attractions to these.
Accordingly
,
both whigs and tories flocked there in
considerable numbers. But of these
newcomers
,
the tories were by far the most
numerous
.
Their continuance in the
war-haunted
districts where their opponents had obtained
all authority, was neither pleasant nor safe. It
is true, the authorities, as well as the majority
of the people of Wyoming, opposed them in
politics, and disliked their turbulence. But they
were a people generous and hospitable, and
many of them connected with the fugitives, or
as they were more courteously termed, the
refugees
,
by the ties of relationship. The latter,
therefore, by the most solemn pledges of
peaceable
intentions, gained the good will, and
secured
the protection of the deceived and
kindhearted
inhabitants of the district, who
believed
that they had admitted among them men
who sincerely regretted their past errors, and
were resolved by their future conduct, to atone
for them. A few were sincere, and remained
faithful to their pledge; but fear alone induced
the majority to feign a repentance which they
did not feel. Their feelings and opinions were
not changed. But the deceived people could
not see the heart. They believed the
professions
which they heard, and gave credit for
the decorum they beheld. That which was
produced by expediency, they mistook for
the result of conviction. The traitors were
forgiven, received as friends, and treated with
affection by the virtuous and unsuspecting
people
of Wyoming, whom they waited only for
a fitting opportunity to destroy.
Many even of the latter character would, no
doubt, have remained tranquil, and perhaps
gradually abandoned their unpatriotic and
dangerous
sentiments, but for the machinations of
Butler, who, like the evil genius of the place,
would permit neither tranquillity, confidence,
nor amity to remain long therein. War and
destruction were the elements in which he
delighted
to move. To enjoy the revelry of
bloodshed, he scrupled not to sacrifice both the
obligations of kindred and the ties of gratitude.
He had in his advances to popularity, among
the whigs, met with repulses sufficient to
convince
him of the fruitlessness of pursuing
aggrandizement
in that direction. The
encreasing
numbers of the refugee tories that now
sought safety in the settlement, and looked up
to him as their head, induced him secretly to
abandon all desire of connexion with the
whigs, and to throw himself entirely into the
arms of the party to which, from feeling and
habit, he had long been attached.
Since the departure of Henry Austin, he had
made several overtures to Miss Norwood. She
had been long acquainted with his passion for
her. Master of duplicity as he was, he had
not even been able entirely to prevent Henry
from suspecting it. But Henry had never
breathed his suspicion to Agnes, nor she hers
to him. He felt too confident of the firmness
with which he was rooted in her affection, to
fear being supplanted by Butler or any other
rival; and he had the delicacy not to hurt her
feelings by alluding to the possibility of such
an occurrence. Butler's engagement with his
sister he had long wished to see dissolved; for
he now knew enough of the man to be assured
that he was not calculated to make her happy.
His surmise that his affections were transferred
to Agnes, led him to hope that the intended
union of such a man with so near and dear a
relative as his sister, never would take place.
Yet he grieved for the affliction which the
disappointment
would bring upon Isabella. She
had unfortunately fixed her affections upon an
unworthy object, and was, therefore, doomed
to the misery of a sorrowing heart, whether
she became united to him or not. In the one
case, however, the sorrow might be transitory
the hand of time and the force of reflection
would at least weaken, if they did not entirely
obliterate its impression.In the other, there
could be no hope of this. An indissoluble
bond would unite her destiny to that of a
villain, and permanent wretchedness could not
but ensue. On his sister's account, therefore,
the change in the affections of Butler afforded
Henry satisfaction sufficient to atone for any
uneasiness he might feel on account of Agnes
being the object of the new flame of the
deceitful
royalist. In the fidelity of Agnes to
himself he had full confidence. The rivalship
G
of Butler he therefore treated with contempt;
and he left Wyoming without giving him to
understand, by any indication whatever, that he
suspected its existence. When at a distance,
however, from the object of his love, he soon
began to have unpleasant feelings on the
subject
.
He recollected that in his absence,
Butler
might have the boldness to make an express
declaration of his passion; and although it was
impossible that Agnes could be induced to
encourage
his pretensions, she might be subjected
to his importunities, and evenbut it was an
idea he wished not to entertainin the event
of disturbance in the settlement, to his
violence
.
In his correspondence with herfor
he found frequent opportunities of forwarding
letters to his friendshe never alluded to his
fear on this subject, lest he might give her
unnecessary
uneasiness. But to Dr. Watson he
poured them forth without reserve.
There is one great cause of uneasiness
under
which I suffer, said he, in a letter to the
Doctor, written in the spring of 1778, that I
have as yet communicated to no one. For
some months before I left Wyoming, I was
haunted with a suspicion that Butler loved
Agnes. It is needless to detail the
circumstances
that gave birth to that suspicion. I
shall only say that they were numerous and
forcible. You are aware of his engagements
with my sister. Because I had a bad opinion
of the man, any thing that inspired a hope that
those engagements would not be fulfilled,
afforded
me pleasure. His passion for Agnes
did not much alarm me, while I was in her
vicinity. I knew that she would be faithful
to me, and I feared not his rivalship. Neither
did I then fear that she would be subjected to
any inconveniences from his importunities, or
danger from his violence. The one she would
repel, and the other he dared not attempt.
The circumstances of the parties and the
affairs
of the settlement sanctioned this
conclusion
.
She was under the protection of her
father, of her lover, of her friends, of the
whole population of the village, by whom she
was belovedwhile hea refugee without
power, without influence, without character,
could not without ruin to himself, attempt any
thing against her peace.
But, my friend, I am now separated from
her by an extensive and almost pathless
wilderness
.
I know not what may be the
posture
of public affairs at Wyoming. The
savages
are your neighbours, and they are far
from being friendly to our cause; and tories
are numerous even in the midst of your
population
.I
cannot forget that Butler was a tory;
nay, I have good grounds for believing he is
still one in his heart. Should any interruption
of your tranquillity take place, I tremble to
think of what may be his conduct. He hates
my sister. Might he not avail himself of some
Indian irruption to destroy herto destroy
perhaps my aged parent?And then his
passion
for Agnesmight he not employ the
marauders to bear her off to some distant
concealment
,
where she would be completely in
his power?
It is the possibility of evils like these that
cause my uneasiness. Will you say that my
apprehensions are fanciful? Heaven grant that
they may be so! But incidents have come to
my knowledge, that impart to them a greater
strength than they could ever derive from
mere fancy. Has Butler been absent of late,
for any length of time, from your village? If
he has, there is treachery on foot; and my fears
are not without foundation. Let all his
movements
be watched with the closest vigilance,
and you may possibly detect and frustrate his
designs. Hear the reasons for my alarm, and
the cautions I give you. I suspect he has been,
within these few weeks, in Philadelphia,
arranging
with General Howe the plan of some
military movement, doubtless on the frontiers.
One of my corps, who is now a prisoner in the
city, has found means to inform me, that he is
persuaded he saw this restless and deceitful
man, in a disguised habit, at General Howe's
quarters. What should he be doing there, if
he is, as he professes, our friend? And why
disguised, unless engaged in some treacherous
design, which he fears may be discovered by
some of our friends in the city. But he may,
I admit, be wrongfully accused. My
informant
may have been mistaken in his identity.
You will, on the spot, be best able to judge. I
would not have him accused if he is innocent.
It would be impolitic, as well as unjust. It
would excite his revenge and arm his adherents
against us. He is now, perhaps, at least
neutral
;
and it is better to keep him so than arouse
against our cause one so capable of doing
mischief
.
I do not know whether it would be proper
to acquaint Agnes with my fears. It would
alarm her, perhaps needlessly. Your
discretion
will decide this point. Alas! my friend,
if I were to describe the full extent of my
gloomy forebodings, you would imagine that I
had lost all moral courage, and become totally
unfit for the duties of a soldier. Yet it is not
so. The contrariety of my feelings is, indeed,
strange, but not unaccountable. I feel that I
am not a coward, and yet I am a prey to
intense
G 2
fears of a certain description. I could
with alacrity go out, at any moment, to meet
the enemy in battle array. It is not for
myself
I fear. It is for
one
dearer than myself.
Oh, if you have ever felt the power of an
absorbing
love like mine, you will be able to
understand
my feelings; to account for my
inconsistency
perhaps
you will call it my
weakness
.
Yet be assured that this passion, potent
as it is, is still kept in subserviency to my duty.
My duty requires me to be here to act
against the enemies of my country; but my
affections are in Wyoming, wound round the
form of the loveliest and sweetest of earthly
beings.But I become rhapsodical, forgetting
that you may not be lover enough to relish my
flights of romantic passion. I will conclude
by imploring you to watch over the safety of
my
Betrothed
, and to be alive to the
information
I have given you in relation to Butler.
The following letter Henry forwarded at the
same time with the foregoing, to Agnes:
My dearest loveYou can scarcely imagine
the gratification which an opportunity of
writing
to you affords me. The most rapturous
moments of my existence have been spent in
pouring forth in your presence, the language
of love that told the emotions of my heart;
and in listening to the sweet tone of approval
with which you answered me. We are now
far asundermore than a hundred miles of an
almost impenetrable forest separate us. Yet
do I pant as strongly as ever for that sweet
communion of souls, that interchange of
devoted
affections once so ardently expressed by
every look and every tone which then
rendered
us so happy. Yes, in such moments my
bliss was great, and but for the sake of my
suffering
country, I never should have withdrawn
from the endeared scenes where I enjoyed it.
Reflecting upon them, and meditating on
your perfections, are substitutes for those happy
moments which I often enjoy. But writing to
you is still a more rapturous employment. An
opportunity for it occurs more rarely than for
meditation, and it approaches in its nature
more nearly to conversation. It imparts the
pleasing feeling that the sentiments I commit to
the paper shall be conveyed to you; that you
will ponder on them; that they will be
cherished
by you, and that you will derive from them
a gratification similar to what I experienced in
writing them. Such are the enjoyments of
letterwriting
to separated lovers. Oh! my
Betrothed
!
for my sake indulge in it frequently, that I
may frequently behold the words which your
own hand wrote, the sentiments which your
own heart conceived, and the assurances which
shall speak the unwavering fidelity of thy
affection
.
Do not mistake me. I doubt not thy
affection, my Agnes. I would as soon doubt
the existence of the sun on which I daily gaze.
Yet I would beg from you frequent assurances
of thy love, because of the delight they afford
me. Oh! with what luxury could I dwell on
the dear lines that should contain those
assurances
.
Save hearing thy lips pronounce them,
earth could afford no enjoyment so sweet.
Let then thy letters convey to me that which
thou knowest will be my best solace for thy
absencethe assurance of thy welfare, and the
whole fervour of thy love. Without reserve
Oh! Agnes! without reserve, surely, thou
wilt express all the ardour of thy affection, all
the devotedness of thy heartall thy fondness,
and all thy wishes for me. I am, my love,
covetous of every thought that passes through
thy mind. I would not have the slightest
emotion of thy soul unknown to me; nor
would I conceal from thee the least sensation
of mine. Would to Heaven that separated
lovers had some more perfect and expeditious
means of interchanging sentiments and feelings,
than by letters. Then should we, even at this
distance
,
be made happy by the intermingling of
thoughts and sensations. I should then less regret
the necessity which keeps us asunder; and endure
with more patience, the absence from thee to
which I am doomed.
Yes, Agnes, attached as I am to the
righteous
cause in which I am embarked, I
acknowledge
I suffer much from my impatient desires
again to be with theeto hearken to the tones
of thy sweet voiceto gaze upon thy beauty
thy unrivalled beauty! Agnes, at this
moment
,
thy picture is placed before methy
bright eyes so full of fondnessthy sweet
lips surrounded with smilesthe innumerable,
nameless, and matchless charms of thy whole
countenance! `Ah!' I may well exclaim,
`among the daughters of men who is like unto
thee, my beloved!' No wonder my fancy is
inflamed, andmy heart enraptured, when I
meditate
on thee. And art thou to be my own!
Hast thou sworn it, my
betrothed?
Shall I
yet be the master of such boundless happiness
such intoxicating charms? My soul is
kindled
with the idea. My imagination flies to
the haunts of Wyoming. I embrace theeI
am happythou art my allthe world, and all
its interests, ties and connexions are forgotten.
What are they to me when thou art mine!
This is the potency of love which I delight to
obey! Oh! Agnes! that such a reverie might
last for ever!that no wordly interruption
should remind me that my joys are but visionary
that no trumpet's sound, nor sentinel's gun,
should disperse the dear illusion, and tell me
that I am in the midst of a camp, enchained
there by a soldier's and a patriot's duty, whilst
thou art far distant amidst sylvan wilds on the
frontiers of civilization!
But I will have fortitudeI will endure
our separation on account of my country, until
she shall no longer need my service. Thou
wilt love me the more for the sacrifice. Oh!
write to me that thou wilt. It will strengthen
my resolution; and from the exhortations of
love I shall draw inducements to patriotism,
and acquire a spirit of perseverance in duty,
which will in the end afford me matter of
self-satisfaction
and joy.
CHAPTER VII.
I know that there are angry spirits
And turbulent mutterers of stifled treason,
Who lurk in narrow places, and walk out
Muffled to whisper curses to the night;
Disbanded soldiers, discontended rufflans,
And desperate libertines who brawl in taverns.
Byron
.
Several weeks after writing the foregoing
letters
,
Henry received the following from Dr.
Watson.
Your information concerning Butler was
well-timed. It aroused our vigilance and led
to the detection of his villany. A deep and
nefarious conspiracy was formed against our
settlement, in which hundreds of our tory
neighbours were implicated. Many of them,
among whom is Butler, have fled, and some
are in prison. The latter, it is believed, for
better security, will be sent to Reading. The
bearer of this, carries despatches from our
council to your General, detailing our present
perilous condition, and requesting succour,
which, I trust, we shall receive in time for
our protection.
On receiving your letter, my first impulse
was to lay it before our council. But as
you had expressed yourself doubtfully in
relation
to the guilt of Butler, and seemed desirous
that I should watch rather than accuse him, I
resolved to do so, for I felt unwilling to involve
into a trouble a man who might eventually be
innocent. There is an individual in our
settlement
in whom I have long placed a greater
degree
of confidence than is known to any one
besides
ourselves. I have entrusted him with
secrets
which I never entrusted to another, and
have, in consequence, derived from him
consolation
none else could afford. This man is of
wandering
habits; but wise, intelligent and
venerable
.
He is respected by all the people
throughout
the settlements. Even the Indians, whom
he often visits, and with whose language he is
familiar, esteem him much, and on affairs of
intricacy consult him often. You will by
this time have perceived that I mean Rodolph,
the Hermit of the Woods.
Rodolph had himself observed some
movements
among the tories, and especially among
the New England refugees, over whom Butler
possesses great influence. Many of them had
lately visited the Mohawk Indians, a tribe
with which Rodolph is well acquainted. They,
in consequence, as he supposes, have held
public
councils, and seem to be preparing for some
enterprise. But the circumstance most
convincing
of Butler being connected with these
movements, is his having been absent for
nearly
four weeks, about the time when you state
that he was suspected to be in Philadelphia.
We concluded, therefore, that your friend was
under no mistake respecting him; and we
looked
upon him not only as connected with the
treason which you suspected, but as the
arch-traitor
and chief contriver of the whole.
Still we kept our suspicions from the public
ear. No one had as yet done any thing to
warrant his arrest; and by remaining in a state
of apparent security and indifference, we might
tempt the conspirators into some indiscretion
which would enable us to discover and baffle
their designs.
Rodolph's political sentiments are not very
generally known. Until the agitations of the
times began to embroil the affairs of this
disstrict
,
he, perhaps, felt but little interest in
them; and, although he wandered much among
the valleys, he was never very communicative
with the inhabitants. His manners are
reserved
,
mild, and meditative, and obnoxious to
no party. The whiggish inclination of his
opinions, therefore, is known to only a few
of his select friends. The tories know
nothing
of them. On perusing your letter, he
availed himself of this circumstance to deceive
them for the public good. He resolves to act
H
the dangerous part of a spy on their conduct,
for which purpose he feigned an approbation
of their sentiments, and a preference for their cause.
By this means he became acquainted with
the intrigues that were now actively going
forward
among the refugees, and soon discovered
that the principal mover was Butler. I now
determined to put our rulers on their guard.
I had no longer any cause for hesitation. He
whom I should accuse, I could prove to be
guilty. Still there was an obstacle in the way.
The near kinsman of the traitor, you know, is
at the head of our local government. He is
a worthy man, and one in whom the whigs
justly repose confidence. He had been
hospitable
and kind to his deceitful relative, and
had taken him under his protection, in the
conviction
of his conversion to the cause of the
country being sincere. To inform such a man
that his cousin and protogee was a traitor,
would, to say the least of it, be to inflict a
pang of no ordinary kind upon his feelings.
And would not the governor's friendship for
the accused naturally cause him to hesitate
giving
credence to the accusation? I feared not
the latter. I had confidence in the governor's
patriotism and integrity, and I had proofs
sufficient
to produce conviction on his mind. As
for giving him pain, that was too trifling a
consideration
not to fade away before the
importance
of the revelations I was to make. I
therefore hastened to him. I made the
revelations
.
He was astonished; for the professions
of his kinsman had completely deceived him.
He was grieved; for he had cherished an
affection
for the traitor, and was also on terms of
intimacy with many others involved in the
treason.
Rodolph had discovered that an assemblage
of the tories was to take place in a few days in
an obscure valley, called the Hemlock Glade,
some miles to the westward of our village.
Several of the leading whigs were immediately
summoned to the governor's house. The
particulars
of the information were laid before
them, and their opinions asked as to the
measures
it would be most advisable to pursue.
After some deliberation, it was agreed that the
information should be kept secret, lest alarm
might be given to the tories, and their assembling
preventedfor, it was considered, that the act
of their assembling would be such manifest proof
of their treasonable designs, as would reconcile
their best friends to the necessity and justice
of their punishment. In the mean time it was
proposed that an armed force, sufficient to
overpower
them, should be collected as secretly as
possible, by which their meeting might be
surprised
,
themselves carried to prison, and all
their machinations frustrated and their power
of doing mischief destroyed at one blow. This
plan had also another essential advantage. It
would furnish sufficient evidence of the guilt
of the culprits, without obliging the authorities
to expose the individual from whom the
information
originated. Such exposure was, if
possible
,
to be avoided, as it would incapacitate
him from afterwards serving the patriotic cause
in the character of a spy.
Thus far the epistle of Dr. Watson has
answered
the purpose of our narrative. The
remainder
having by some accident been
destroyed
,
the story must proceed without its aid. By
industrious research the writer has obtained a
sufficient acquaintance with the facts, to be able
to relate them accurately enough without the
aid of any written document.
The measures mentioned by the Doctor
having
been agreed to, a young and spirited officer
of the militia of the district, named Dennison,
undertook to have a sufficient armed force in
readiness for the service. In the valley
appointed
for the meeting of the tories, there
was a small log house belonging to one of their
faction. About noon, on the appointed day,
around this rustic building, the conspirators
began to assemble, and until about two o'clock
continued to increase in number, without
proceeding
to business. Butler, Brandt, and
Aranooko, the Sachem of the Mohawks, were
early on the scene. In conformity with the
custom of modern and fashionable historians,
we shall stop the progress of the story for a
short time, in order to give a brief sketch of
these three distinguished personages. Though
this may communicate no important
information
,
it may satisfy the curiosity of the reader,
and, if so, will not be writing in vain.
Butler possessed a good figure; and, in his
pleasant moods, a handsome countenance. But
in his moments of gloom and resentment he
betrayed the looks of a ruffian, and in his
periods
of wrath the scowl of a demon. On
such occasions the contracted brows, the flushed
cheeks, the clenched teeth, the quivering lips,
and the eyes flashing fire like burning mirrors,
denoted the hellish fury of his mind, and if he
did not become loathsome, he became
terrifying
.
But his most furious fits could be
controlled
by his hypocrisy where his interest
required
it. A moment's reflection would replace
him on his guard, and restore to him a placidity
yet an expressiveness of countenance, which at
once indicated great knowledge of the world,
and ability to deceive it.But having spoken
H 2
of his appearance and character in a preceding
part of our narrative, it is unncessary to
enlarge
upon it here.
The ferocity of Brandt, his courage, his
activity
and robust strength, are well known to
the readers of history, which has abundantly
exposed to an indignant world, the sanguinary
and vengeful disposition of this most daring of
savages. His hatred of the whites is said to
have been of a more embittered character than
was usual even among the Indians. This is the
more remarkable, as he himself was but a
half-Indian
,
his father having been a white man, of
German descent, who on occasion of some disgust
which he had imbibed against civilized society,
took up his residence among the Indians. The
collisions with the frontier settlers into which
the restless and enterprising disposition of
Brandt had frequently brought him, and in
which he had met with many repulses, no
doubt tended much to irritate his feelings, and
arouse that animosity against the whites which
was the reigning passion of his soul.
The Sachem, Aranooko, was an Indian of a
dignified figure, somewhat advanced in years,
but still athletic and healthful. He was
actuated
with all the antipathy natural to the
aborigines against the despoilers of their race;
yet he was averse to useless and wanton
warfare
upon them. He was unlike Brandt in the
circumstance, that the destruction of white men
of itself, unattended with any advantage to the
Indian cause, afforded him no pleasure. At
least, like a prudent father of his people, he
was unwilling to plunge them into the horrors
of war, when it afforded no prospect of a
successful
issue, merely from vengeful motives.
He possessed neither the unbounded ferocity
nor reckless hardihood of Brandtyet he was
greatly under the influence of that mongrel
savage; and it was chiefly by his persuasions
that he had been induced to join the present
confederacy against the inhabitants of
Wyoming
.
CHAPTER VIII.
A fairer person lost not heaven; he seemed
For dignity composed, and high exploit:
But all was false and hollow; though his tongue
Dropt manna, and would make the worse appear
The better reason.
Milton
.
Brandt and Aranooka sat on a bench in the
chief apartment of the log-cottage already
mentioned
,
waiting with dignified gravity, and in
meditative silence, the full assemblage of the
tories, whose number was every moment
increasing
by fresh accessions from various parts
of the district. Five or six other savages sat
near them. The two chiefs were drest in a
very showy and rather imposing costume. Their
vestments of scarlet flannel, wide in the sleeves,
and tied closely round the body, were
ornamented
in front, by an intertexture of
porcupine's
quills and the down of various coloured
birds, wrought into curious devices. These,
together with their leggings of deer skintheir
mockasins of buffalo hideand, above all, their
head dresses adorned with feathers of the
flamingo
and the eagle, presented to the eye a wild
but rich and picturesque appearance. The
dignified composure of these rude sons of the
forest was well contrasted with the noisy
restlessness
of the tories who filled the apartment,
and were often disputatious and clamorous, and
sometimes even indecorous in their
conversation
and conduct. Ardent spirits, furnished
for payment by the owner of the cabin, were
used freely by the whites. But Aranooko and
his companions refused to taste any until the
business for which they had met, should be
transacted.
Such was the state of matters within doors,
before the hour appointed for the transaction
of business arrived. Without, a promiscuous
assemblage of several hundred men, indulged
themselves in military exercises, or in
discussing
the merits and prospects of their enterprise,
or in feats of strength and other amusements,
as whim or inclination suggested. At length,
twelve o'clock being announced, Butler
mounted
on an elevated platform outside the door,
and requested the attention of the assembly,
which he addressed as follows:
Friends and fellow subjects, I now beg
leave to state the object of calling you together
on the present occasion. But first let me
observe
,
that I hope there is no one here who is
not truly and zealously faithful to the cause in
which we are embarked, namely, resistance to
the unnatural and bloody rebellion now raging
throughout this unhappy land. Remember,
my friends, that we have been born subjects to
the kind and beneficent monarch who, at
present
,
sits on the throne of Britain. Britain,
that noble and illustrious isle, whose arts, and
arms, and literature have shed a glorious
radiance
over the whole world, in which we, as
her children, largely partake; and of which, if
we were actuated by a proper sense of duty
and gratitude for the benefits she has, by her
fostering and protecting care, conferred upon
us, we should be proud. Unhappily, a large
portion of our countrymen have shown that
they are not actuated by such generous motives.
Stimulated by pride or selfishness, or misled
by the sophistry and cant of turbulent orators,
the great mass of our people have abandoned
the path of duty, broken the ties of gratitude,
set at nought their allegiance, and rushed into
a wild, sanguinary, and desperate rebellion,
which has already brought destruction on
thousands
,
and must terminante in the absolute ruin
of their audacious and ambitious schemes.
My friends, I am, in truth, amazed and
grieved
when I think on the state into which the affairs
of these colonies, so lately blooming in peace and
prosperity, are now plunged. I could scarcely
imagine, did not woful experience convince me
of the fact, that such a degree of turpitude as is
sufficient to produce the present direful crisis,
could exist in human bosoms. What! the sons
of Britains separate themselves from Britain!
disconnect themselves from British prosperity,
British virtue, British greatness, and British
glory!And for what object?the paltry
consideration
of saving a few thousand pounds a
year, which we were well able, and well
entitled
to pay; and which the slightest impulse of
gratitude or honour ought to have rendered us
willing to pay. And is it possible that the
present
horrid state of things has arisen from this
sordid motive? Has it been a mere petty
financial
speculation that has driven three millions
of people into the crime of rebellion against a
parental government; and induced them to
plunge into a sea of blood for the hope of
saving
annually a few pence per head, which they
ought to have been proud to pay a generous
parent, who had so lately expended millions for
their sakes? But no; my fellow subjects,
repugnance
to parliamentary taxation, let the
disorganizers
pretend what they please, was not the
cause which induced the majority of the leading
rebels to raise their accursed standard. It was
ambition. Our lawyers got an itch for making
laws for a nation, hence they must have a
congress
.
Our military captains wanted war that
they might become generals: our sheriffs and
magistrates, and forward politicians of every
class, wanted independence, that they might
become governors of states, or members of
cabinets, or public functionaries of some kind,
whereby they might make a figure in the land
at the public expense.
But enough of these dishonest and
dishonourable
men, who have embroiled us with the
mighty power to whom we owe allegiance, and
with whose vast superiority of strength it is
madness to contend. The distress into which
their schemes have plunged the country
renders
them abhorred by every virtuous and well
principled mind. My friends, I hope there is
not one among you who does not loath and
detest
them as you would a pestilence; and will
not be ready to hasten with just and holy
vengeance
upon them, as you would upon
incendiaries
whom you caught in the act of
committing
destruction upon all that you held dear
and estimable, or accounted sacred and
venerable
upon earth.
I propose now to lead you against a nest of
rebels of this stamp. They have not, indeed,
taken the field against their sovereign, but they
have abjured their allegiance, and thrown off the
lawful authority under which their fathers and
themselves were born. Strange, indeed, and
depraved must be that state of society in which
allegiance and loyalty are thrown aside with as
little ceremony and reflection, as the casting off
of a loose gown or a pair of slippers. It is against
the whigs in the adjoining settlements, whose
militia hold their fortifications for the rebel
congress, that I propose to lead you, and I call
upon you, by your allegiance, to follow me.
That you may see I am authorized to make
such a call, I request you to look upon this
commission. It has the signature of Howe, as
noble and brave a general as ever wore a sword.
I have within these two weeks been in his
presence
:
I have been honoured and delighted
with his conversation; and have received from
him authority to arm all his majesty's loyal
subjects in this district, in order to reduce the
people in the neighbourhood to obedience, and
sieze upon their fortified places in the name of
his majesty. Hearken to the reward offered
us in the event of succeeding in this service. It
is a rich oneno less than the whole valley
of Wyoming, including all its improvements,
dwellings, cattle, crops and property of every
description, now forfeited by the rebellion of
their present owners, to be divided amongst us
in proportion to the merit we shall individually
exhibit in the contest we may have to sustain.
If we are truly zealous in the cause, and
I
desirous to earn this rich reward, we cannot
but succeed. The force against which we shall
have to contend is not much more numerous
than our own, nor is it better equipped for war,
for of warlike stores the British general has
taken care to supply us abundantly. Besides,
what have we, inured as we are to all the toils
and risks of war, and experienced in its arts
and stratagems, to fear from a simple
agricultural
race, the majority of whom have never
witnessed
a battle nor destroyed a foe. It is my
belief
,
my friends, that on the first appearance of
danger, these men of timidity and peace, will
submit, and acknowledge once more the
authority
of their legitimate sovereign, while we
shall earn the reward of our loyalty by
becoming
the owners of the fair estates they have
forfeited by their rebellion.
But should they unexpectedly resist, besides
our own strength, we shall, in reducing them,
have the powerful aid of the brave Mohawks,
the chiefs of whom I have invited to this
conference
,
in order to lay before them the
proposals
of General Howe for an alliance between
them and the government of Britain. The
liberality
of the terms offered to these valiant
people, cannot but secure their approbation and
win their aid; and with such potent allies, what
have we to fear from the feeble peasantry of
Wyoming.
Thus, my friends, the crisis which to
others
is so gloomy and full of peril, opens to us a
brilliant prospect of glorious victory and rich
reward. Be courageous and resolute, and soon
the pleasant dwellings in which we have been
only sojourners, and the fertile fields which
surround them, shall be our ownand we shall
dispose of the present inhabitants according to
their deserts. What say ye, my gallant friends,
shall we raise the standard of loyalty in these
regions, and strike for possessions so valuable?
A shout of applause was given by the
auditors
of this harangue, in answer to the question
with which it concluded. This shout continued
to resound for some minutes, and seemed to
express the unanimous assent of the assembly
to the proposal of the speaker. It was not
unanimous, however. There was one man, and
one too in whose staunch loyalty all present
placed the firmest confidence, who opposed
waging war against the people of Wyoming,
for the purpose of despoiling them of their
property
.
This man's name was Clifton, who had
already suffered much for his royalism. He
had the courage to address the assembly, and
was listened to only on account of his known
zeal for the royal cause, and the sacrifices he
had made for it. The warm expressions of
personal regard for him which General Howe
had more than once used in the hearing of
Butler
,
induced the latter to attend to his remarks
without interruption, although not without
impatience
and a strong feeling of resentment.
Friends and fellow subjects, said Clifton,
your zeal in behalf of the government under
which we and our fathers have so long
flourished
,
is worthy of all praise; and in these
unhappy
times of treason and rebellion, is
refreshing
and consolatory to every well-disposed
mind. I would not damp your ardour in such
a cause; but I would direct it to the ad option
of justifiable measures. I do not wish you to sit
down in sluggish apathy, while rebellion, like
a raging monster, fills the land with blood and
desolation. No, my friends, I rejoice to
behold
your enthusiasmI would have you to be
up and active in the cause of the lawful and
just government under which our colonies have
long enjoyed so many blessings; whose
protection
and care alone preserved them in the
feebleness
of their infancy, and reared them to
their present state of maturity.
But I would have you to select proper
objects
for the display of your zeal. I would have
you to direct your hostility to points where you
could perform real service to your sovereign, and
vindicate, upon enemies actually in the field,
the majesty of his laws. I would have you to
wield your energies against rebelsand there
are abundance of such in the landto whom
you are under no obligations for hospitality,
kindness and protection; and to whom you have
made no pledges of amity and peace. I cannot
suppose that you have so soon forgotten the
forlorn
and fugitive state under which we implored
and received shelter and sustenance from the
people of these settlements. We were driven
from our homes, and like wild beasts, hunted
into the forests by the vindictive power of our
enemies. We fled hither, and threw ourselves
on the mercy of the inhabitants of these valleys.
Although they had embraced the cause of our
enemies, and disapproved of the political and
warlike course we had pursued, yet they saw
us destitute and suffering, and their humanity
relieved us. They received our assurances of
living in tranquillity among them, and they
afforded
us habitations. They fed, they clothed,
they lodged us. We are at this moment,
pensioners
on their bounty, protegees of their
care; and, trusting in our promises of peaceable
behaviour, they have taken no precautions
against our hostility, as if they could not dream
that men were to be found so wicked as to aim
I 2
insidious and dark destruction against
protecting
and confiding friends.
The king's general requires us to arm; I
say too let us arm, since we have obtained the
means. But let us arm against our enemies;
not against our friends. The king has
abundance
of foes who are no friends of ours. Let us
march to the sea-board; we shall there find
rebels
to whom we owe no gratitude, whom it
will be our duty to subdue, and for subduing
whom, the royal authorities will be as grateful,
and, no doubt, reward us as liberally, as for
subduing a people less deeply plunged in the
guilt of rebellion, and to respect whose welfare
we are bound by every tie of gratitude and
honour.
When Clifton ceased speaking, a mixed
sensation
seemed to pervade the assemblya murmur
expressive of divided sentiments, was distinctly
heard in various directions; for many were in
reality, forcibly struck with the justice of his
arguments and the propriety of his views. This
feeling of rectitude, however, did not prevail
long. Butler hastened to stem the current that
was setting against his designs; and by his
address
he completely succeeded in giving it a
contrary direction.
What! said he, have I, in reality, heard
sentiments of lukewarmness in the cause of
Britain, from one who has hitherto been so
devoted
to her interests; who has fought and bled
and lost his all for his fidelity to the
government
that claims his allegiance! But it is the
weakness of humanityit is the mere frothing
of the milk of human kindness, which now
prevails over his natural vigour of soul, and
enfeebles
his energies with scruples of sickly
sentiment
and morbid sensibility. We are
distinctly
called upon by the British general, to
seize and occupy the fortresses of the Wyoming
valley, in behalf of the king, and to compel the
inhabitants to return to their allegiance.
Here Butler read a commission which he had
received from general Howe, appointing him
to the command of such of the frontier royalists
as might join his standard. He also read to the
assembly a paper of instructions, requiring him
to use every effort in his power to reduce the
malecontents of Wyoming, and to preserve the
district in subjection to the regal authority.
This paper likewise contained the promise of
bestowing
on him and his coadjutors in this
service
,
all the lands of the district whose owners
should be convicted of any act of disloyalty.
Now, said he, after he had finished
reading
these documents, all who are willing to
obey the orders of general Howe, and to serve
their king, and earn the reward offered for
such service, will come forward, enrol their
names on the list of the king's friends, and
swear fidelity to his cause. Those who refuse
had better now retire from this assembly, for in
half an hour they shall be treated as enemies.
None retired. All were either convinced or
intimidated by Butler's statement. Even
Clifton
tacitly yielded to the opinions of the
majority
,
and made no further opposition. One
Ford, an active and violent tory, was appointed
to administer the oath of fidelity to the
assembly
;
while Butler and two or three other
leaders
withdrew to hold a conference with the
Indian chiefs. The calumet was lighted, and
each having smoked from it, Aranooko arose,
and addressed Butler.
Brother, we received your message, and
are here. Tell us the will of our father, the
great king of the east. We would be his friends,
and if his wishes be reasonable, we will obey
him. The Mohawks have suffered much from
the people of your race, the disobedient
children
of your father beyond the great lake. Our
revenge has lately been asleep; but if the voice
of your father comes in friendship to us, we
will hear, we will awakewe will kindle up
the fierceness of our wrath, like the angry
panther when hunted in his native woods. We
will be a rod in the hands of your father to
chastise
his unruly childrenwe will be a flaming
brand to avenge our own wrongs. You have
heard me, brother; now speak.
Brave Mohawks! replied Butler, our
father knows ye are valiant, and he asks your
aid. He knows ye have been wronged, and he
bids you avenge yourselves. The chief captain
of his host bade me say to you, that he will
supply you with clothing, and with instruments
of war sufficient for your whole tribe. Ask
what else you want, and it shall be given, for
you are a brave people, and we wish for your
friendship.
Brother, said Aranookoclothing and
arms are all we want. Our forests supply us
with food, and with fuel, and with timber for
wigwams. We want no more.But when we
do, we shall ask it. We are your friends. The
disobedient of your race are our enemies. We
will join you in war against them.Receive
our Wampum!
So saying, he handed to Butler, a long string
of beads made of red berries, in testimony
of the league. In return for which Butler made
him a present of several trinkets he had
provided
for the purpose. Brandt now arose. His
eyes glanced fire for some moments, then cooled
into a settled gleam of ferocious satisfaction:
while pride perched on his heavy brows,
determination
expanded his large lips, and
imparted
a clenching firmness to the vigorous
muscles of his whole frame, as he addressed
himself to Butler.
Brother, said he, You and I are now
leagued in one cause. You have rebellion to
punish. I have wrongs to avenge. Our
victims
are the same. I devote them to death.
Let no man step between me and my purpose!
Brother, I am determined on slaughter. They
shall die! Are you of my mind?
Butler himself was startled at the fiendish
ferocity
with which the savage asked this
question
.
He paused for a moment, as if to recover
from his surprise, and to reflect on an answer.
He then said:
Brother, our minds agree. Blood must
flow. Death must mark our course, for
rebellion
must be rooted out, and your vengeance
be appeased. Brother, our hearts are one. I
feel that we are colleagues in a work destined
to eternize our names as perpetrators of
unparralleled
deeds.Brother, shall we exchange
gifts in token of the compact of blood?
Butler received a sharp hatchet in return for
a poignard, on handing which to Brandt, he
observed
,
The point of that steel is for the
hearts of thy enemies, until thy revenge is
glutted!The edge of this hatchet is for the
necks of rebels until they be cut off from the
land!
Why wert thou not born a Mohawk?
exclaimed
Brandt. Thy sternness is worthy of
our nation, and in fierceness of spirit we are
brothers!
At this moment the party were startled with
a discharge of musketry, and a cry of terror and
distress which rent the air, and announced that
they were attacked by the whigs. Butler,
Brandt, Aranooko, and all, indeed, who were
inside of the log-house, rushed out to lend
assistance to their friends, but they found them
in full flight, and were themselves borne off the
scene by a torrent of fugitives which they could
not resist. In a moment colonel Dennison and
his militia occupied the ground on which the
tories had been assembled, whence they
detached
a strong party in pursuit of the fugitives.
The closeness of the woods and intricacies of
the country, favoured the flight of the latter,
and only about forty fell into the hands of their
pursuers. Among these was Clifton, who was
immediately released, on account of the effort
he had made in opposition to the proposal to
attack Wyoming, which was communicated to
the whigs by one of their party who had acted
as a spy among the conspirators.
CHAPTER IX.
Ingratitude! thou poisoner of the heart,
That mak'st it dead to all the joys of life,
What fiend engendered thee! and brought thee forth,
And let thee loose upon the sons of men!
So that the one upon the other plays
Such arts of treachery, as sting the soul
With tortures keener than the adder's fang!
Oh! thou dost wring the meek confiding spirit,
With wrong'd affection's fierce, envenomed grip,
Until the world seems to the writhing victim,
A wilderness of pit-falls, thorns and briers,
With not one green nor sunny spot therein.
Harley
.
Who has made any progress on the journey
of life, and mingled, in any degree, with
society
,
without experiencing the truth of the above
sentiments? What has produced to human
hearts more intense pangs than ingratitude? To
be injured by those on whom we have
conferred
no favour, on whom we have fixed no
esteem
,
and lavished no bounty, occasions but
little surprise, and inspires but little
dissatisfaction
with human nature. We can still, after
such an injury, look upon the world and upon
mankind, in their natural colours, compounded
of the various and ever-changing shades of good
and evil, and remain satisfied with ourselves.
Hope blends with fortitude, and enables us to
bear present ills in anticipation of future good.
But when we have detected the lurking
animosities
of a favourite, or received an insidious
blow from one whom we have trusted, aided,
or esteemed, grief for disappointed hopes and
lost affections, mortification at being duped by
hypocrisy, and horror at witnessing such a
manifestation of the perfidy of man, contribute
much more than the amount of the injury
received
,
to inspire us with gloomy views of our
nature and condition, and render us
discontented
with existence.
How intensely, on this occasion, did the
astonished
people of Wyoming experience such
feelings! The greater number of the
individuals
who were detected in this foul conspiracy
against their lives and properties, had been the
welcome partakers of their bounty, many of
them the confidants of their secrets, and some
of them bound to their affections by the closest
ties of relationship or marriage. When the
prisoners were conducted through several of the
villages on their way to the fort at Wyoming,
how grievously did many a confiding heart
shudder to reflect how it had been betrayed,
and to perceive that its destruction had been
contrived by those on whom its confidence had
been placed without restraint, and its kindness
lavished without limits.
Perhaps there was no circumstance
connected
with these agitating scenes more remarkable
K
than the forbearance of the inhabitants of
Wyoming
towards their captured betrayers. The
bare idea that such a treacherous and murderous
combination had been projected, was enough to
inflame the blood of its intended victims, and
to arouse them to a degree of indignation which,
had it arisen and overwhelmed their prisoners
in immediate destruction, would have been
neither so wonderful nor censurable as many
ebullitions of popular fury which history has
recorded, nor half so flagitious and detestable
as the foul conspiracy it would have avenged.
But no excess of this kind was committed.
The generous inhabitants of the district were
more grieved than irritated at the example of
treachery and barbarous depravity they now
witnessed. Alarm and sorrow, rather than
indignation and rage, filled their hearts and
actuated
their feelings. To their governor,
Zebulon
Butler, who, though the relative of their
arch enemy, was a tried and faithful friend to
their cause, and to five of the most intelligent
of their known patriots, whom they selected to
form his council, they committed the
management
of their affairs at this critical juncture.
Mr. Norwood, Mr. Austin, Dr. Watson,
Colonel Dennison, and the judge of their court,
whose name was Harvey, formed this council;
and a more judicious selection could not have
been made. In the honesty and prudence of
these men, the inhabitants placed implicit
reliance
.
Nor did they place it wrongfully.
Whatever zeal, vigilance and correct judgment
could effect for the safety of the district, was
accomplished
.
But their resources were small in
comparison to those of their enemies, who were
in league with the powerful tribe of the
Mohawks
,
and supplied with all the materials of
war, by the British General.
The aspect of the affairs of the settlement
was indeed extremely menacing. The
inhabitants
had, it is true, detected and frustrated a
fearful plot, which, had it with matured force
burst upon them by surprise, would have found
them almost totally unprepared for resistance,
and would inevitably have effected their
destruction
.
But although this imminent danger
had been escaped, safety was far from being
secured. The clouds of a tremendous and
savage
war were gathering around them. They
saw them with the apprehension of rational
beings
,
who could estimate probabilities and
appreciate
consequences. But they trusted in
Providence, and did not sit down indolently to
await the bursting of the storm in the apathy of
despair. They assumed the fortitude of men
conscious of a good cause, and they made every
preparation for defence that judgment could
suggest or circumstances would permit. All
among them, fit to bear arms, were enrolled,
and instructed to be in readiness to act on the
first alarm. Despatches were also forwarded
to Washington, informing him of the
threatening
aspect of their affairs, and their defenceless
condition; and requesting military aid as soon as
he could possibly send it. The Wyoming
volunteers
were also implored by many private
letters, to return to the protection of their
friends and their homes.
It was little more than a week after the
dispersion of the conspirators in the Hemlock
Glade, as mentioned in the preceding chapter,
that an incident happened which greatly
increased
the consternation of the Whigs, and
excited them to stronger feelings of resentment
than any thing that had yet occurred.Mr.
Norwood had returned home on the evening of
a warm day in June, from a meeting of his
fellow
counsellors at the governor's house, when
learning that his daughter had gone into the
orchard which skirted the stream of the Sharon,
in order to enjoy the coolness of the evening air,
he hastened to join her. He found her seated
near the bank of the stream on a favourite spot,
where she had often sat with Henry Austin.
She had been reading, probably for the
twentieth
time, a letter lately received from Henry.
This letter described to her the joyous entry of
the troops under Washington into Philadelphia,
which had been evacuated by the British force
now under the command of sir Henry Clinton.
The glowing style of triumphant patriotism,
and the ardent expressions of undiminished
love, which pervaded this communication from
the chosen of her heart, warmed her feelings
and engrossed her attention so entirely, that the
alarming aspect of the affairs of her own
neighbourhood
were for a time forgotten; her whole
faculties were employed in the contemplation
of her absent lover. His numerous virtues,
his patriotism, his courage, and the unchanging
and unchangeable nature of his love for her
the toils he had undergonethe privations he
had endured, and the dangers he had
encountered
in the performance of his duty of his
countryall stood imaged in her mind as
personifications
of the highest excellence that
could dignify the character and conduct of man.
And he had been rewarded for these virtues and
privations. He had seen his country's chief and
her gallant army, in triumph enter her capital,
which had just been abandoned by a retiring
enemy.He had himself formed part of the
glorious
procession. And now he was in the
midst of a populous and fascinating metropolis.
Her thoughts instantly flowed in another
K 2
current. Would he be able to resist the
fascinations
of gayety, beauty and splendor which the
new scenes he should now witness would present
to him? Amidst the many accomplished females
to whom he would now become introduced,
would there be none sufficiently attractive to
make an impression on his heart? She wished
to get rid of the unwelcome suggestion. To
harbour it was painful, and might be unjust
nay, when she reflected on the vows and the
virtues of Henry, she felt assured that it was
unjust.No, thought she, no allurements
will lead him from the path of fidelity. The
temptations that shall assail him may be great;
but his virtue is greathis love is sincere, and
he will triumph over them all.
She was indulging this train of thought when
her father approached her.
My daughter, said he, the messenger to
general Washington has been despatched. Your
letter to Henry has gone with him. I fervently
pray that at least our own brave volunteers, who
serve under him, may return to our aid, before
the savages and tories shall have time to
combine
their forces and attack us.
The distance is great and the road
difficult
;
she observed, but when they hear of
our danger, affection will give wings to their
speed, and I trust in Heaven, that they will
reach us in time to secure our safety.
Their force is but small, said Mr.
Norwood
,
but their military skill would be of
immense value. We have requested general
Washington for more extensive aid, which, I
trust, he will be able to spare us, since the
invading
enemy has been, at length, compelled to
make a retrogade motion, and to retreat, as we
have just heard, across the Jerseys, towards
New York, followed by the whole patriotic
army.
But, father, said she, this removes our
friends farther from our assistance. Heaven only
knows at what distance they may be, when
our messenger reaches them. Our situation is,
indeed, perilous. Our prospects are forlorn.
Do not be alarmed, my Agnes! returned
her father. Our messenger is well
acquainted
with the country, and he has been ordered
to take the direct course into Jersey, and find
the head-quarters of Washington by the
shortest
road. But lest he should fail, two other
messengers will be despatched to-morrow.
Nor are we in such immediate danger, nor so
totally destitute of strength, as to justify
despondency
.
Our men have all assumed arms
they seem brave and resolute, and will nobly
resist any attack that the traitors and their
savage
allies may make upon us. And one or two
of our forts are strong
Traitors and their savage allies!
exclaimed
a large man in a mask, who, followed
by two savages, rushed upon them from the
midst of some bushes on the bank of the rivulet,
where they had been concealed. The savages
seized Mr. Norwood, tied his hands behind
him, and hurried him off. The man in the
mask caught Agnes, whom, without binding,
he attempted also to carry away. She screamed
and struggled, but he succeeded in removing
her out of the orchard. She ceased her cries,
and assuming a tone of entreaty, begged for a
few moments' respite. She was taunted with
the exclamation
Traitors and their savage allies!
These
were harsh terms. You and your father, fair
maid, shall soon know how far they are
applicable
.
He however slackened his pace with
the view of treating her more mildly, as he
added in a conciliatory toneyou at least
have nothing to fear. Unless too obstinate, your
father and you shall be both well treated. I
love you and wish to separate you from a
rebellious
people destined to destruction.
Behold
me, and believe my words!
He withdrew his mask and presented the
countenance of Butler. An instinctive alarm
seized her, and she again screamed aloud. At
that instant a man on horseback gallopped
towards
them, the wood being sufficiently open
to admit his approach. Butler drew forth a
pistol. Agnes with great presence of mind,
watched his motions, and, at the moment he
fired, she shook his arm so forcibly, that the
accuracy
of his aim was destroyed, and he missed
the advancing horseman. He uttered a
profane
exclamation of disappointment, and,
perceiving
the horseman to be in the act of
presenting
a pistol, he fled, and was soon concealed
amidst the woods.
My fathermy father is carried off by the
savages! cried Agnes, as Dr. Watson, for he
was the horseman, alighted in order to raise
and support her, for her alarm having
overpowered
her, she had sunk upon the ground.
The main road was but a short distance from
the scene of this incident. The Doctor had
been riding past when he heard her cries. He
hastened to her assistance. He was armed as
has been stated. Since the times became
dangerous
he had never ventured from home with
out being so. When Butler missed him and
fled, he prudently reserved his fire that he
might the more effectually protect Agues from
any other assailant until she could be conveyed
to a place of safety. This he soon
accomplished
,
and hastened to raise a party to go in
pursuit
of the captors of Mr. Norwood.
It will be readily supposed that so violent an
outrage on the person of a clergyman so much
esteemed as Mr. Norwood, would produce
strong sensations of both sorrow and resentment
in the minds of his people. Several hundred
were speedily in active chase of the savages.
But the latter, whom Butler soon overtook,
knew the lurking places of the woods too well
to be easily captured. For several days they
were briskly pursued. But they finally escaped,
and arrived safe, with their worn-out prisoner,
after a perilous and toilsome journey, at the
chief village of the Mohawks, where the tories
had formed an encampment.
Oh! Agnes, unhappy daughter of an
unfortunate
father, to what desolation of heart wert
thou now subjected! What horrors did thy
bereaved
and fearful spirit imagine to be the
doom of thy beloved and only parent! The
vengeful bitterness and capricious cruelty of
the savage nature were well known to thee
and was thy father now destined to endure
them! Was his aged and venerable frame to
run the cruel gauntlet, and sustain the scorn
and the blows of Mohawk ferocity? Or does
thy terrified imagination behold the blazing
faggots, and the stake to which he is bound, in
order to be consumed, amidst the shouting
vengeance of exulting fiends in the shape of
men? Is he doomed to that most cruel of all
deaths to which savage vengeance is
accustomed
to devote its victims? Art thou, in thy
misery
of mind, capable of enduring the terrible
thought? Or hast thou consolation? Does hope
whisper any solace to thy heart? Dost thou
listen to the suggestions of comfort? Dost thou
not rather repel them as fallacious, and beg thy
comforters to departto leave thee to silence
to sorrowto hopelessnessto despair! No;
although thy grief is intensealmost too
great for thy tender frame to endure, thou art
a Christian, and wilt not harbour thoughts of
despair. Thy spirit is too strongly imbued
with the pious principles which thy father
taught thee, to question the designs of Heaven
in inflicting calamities, or to murmur at the
rod of chastisement although it pierces thee to
the heart. There is a Rock of comfort to which
he, for whom thou grievest, taught thee to look
for support under every affliction. And thou
rememberest his instructionsthou lookest to
the God of Christians for support in thy
bereavement
for
solace in thy sorrow, and for
deliverance from thy affliction! Hence thou
wilt not listen to the suggestions of despair.
Thou art sick, and sorrowful, and wretched
thou canst not help suffering, but thou sufferest
with pietywith meekness and resignation.
The unrepining but intense grief of Agnes,
although it could not overcome the strength of
her mind, overpowered that of her body.
Sickness seized upon her. A strong fever ran
through her veins, and prostrated her strength.
The solicitude with which Dr. Watson
attended
to a patient so beloved may be readily
imagined
.
His sister, her faithful friend, now
became her anxious and diligent nurse. She
made her abode with her, and her assiduous
cares and judicious counsels contributed much
both to mitigate her fever and to shorten its
duration. Her recovery, however, was chiefly
owing to intelligence contained in the
following
letter, which she received about a week
after
the capture of her father, from the author of
the outrage.
This letter is written by a man you hate;
yet you will receive it with satisfaction. With
satisfaction do I write it, because it will give
pleasure to the woman I lovethe
only
woman
I ever loved. It pleases me also to think
that the characters I now trace will be perused
by youwill be gazed upon by those eyes
which have struck the fire of love into my
soul.But I hasten to communicate the
circumstance
which is the object of my writing,
and which alone will make my letter
acceptable
.Your
father
lives
he is well treated
and, for your sake, until I hear from you, I
shall secure to him a continuance of good
treatment
.
Believe me this will not be an easy task.
What I have already done for him, has
encountered
much opposition. The half Indian
Brandt,he who escaped from the attack upon
you, which afforded me the first occasion of
beholding
your loveliness, and of rendering you
some service,has not forgotten that he was
once a prisoner in your village. He is
inveterately
hostile to all your people. He will go
any length, he will submit to any hardship, he
will expose himself to any danger, he will
commit
any crime to be revenged on the feeblest
and most innocent among you. I had to sooth
and conciliate him, and make even humiliating
concessions to him, ere I could obtain his
forgiveness
for the part I acted in your rescue.
His knowledge of the breach between your
people and me, and an assurance that we are
now irreconcilable enemies, tended to mollify
him; my influence among the royalists whom
he views as necessary instruments of his
revenge
,
procured for me his respect, and, in
some measure, his confidence; and my proposal
L
to join him in the late attempt to carry you off,
has attached him entirely to my interests.
It was you I wanted, my love, and not
your father. But when, from our lurking
place, we discovered him to be with you, the
Indians proposed to seize both, and I made no
objection. I was rather pleased with the
circumstance
.
My passion for you is vehement.
I know your aversion to me. Your father
being
in my hands, might afford me the power of
working on your mind, so as to gain your
consent
to become mine. I now lament the
circumstance
of your father being present. I have
no ill-will towards him. I wish no harm to
befall him. His being with you occasioned the
failure of my great object to secure you. It
drew the attention of the Indians from you. I
thought my own strength sufficient to bear you
off. It would have been so, had I not been
desirous
to effect my purpose with as little
harshness
as possible. I refrained from stifling your
cries by force. I even indulged you by
relaxing
my speed when we left the orchard, for I
wished to show you that you would be treated
tenderly. That relaxation ruined the whole
project. You renewed your cries. Your friend
approached. I knew not how many might be
following him. I cursed my ill-starred fate,
and to avoid instant destruction, abandoned
you.
I have gained something, however, by the
enterprise. Your father is my prisoner. I see
my advantage in this, and I am determined to
profit by it. Let the irresistible nature of my
love for you excuse my design. Your father
must be my instrument to gain, or if the
expression
must be used, to extort, your consent
to my wishes. I have already stated that I
have protected him from injury. I have
claimed
him from the savages as my own prisoner.
I have preserved him from the torments of
their cruel customs. I have saved him from
the humiliation and blows of the gauntlet, and
from the fiery horrors of the stake. Do I not
merit recompense for this? Will you not be
grateful? Will you not attribute my exertions
for to do these things required exertionsto
the ardour of my love? I would restore him to
liberty, but my power over you would be then
lost. No; I must have you. My conceptions
of happiness are so entirely wrought up with
the idea of possessing you, that I swear to
you, I shall stop short of no effort that
circumstances
may put in my power, to obtain that
great good for which I so passionately long. I
disdain every other luxuryI disdain mirth
and exhilarationnay, I disdain reputation and
powerI would disdain life itself but for the
hope that it may last till you have blest me with
your charms.
Hear now my purpose. Your father's fate
is in my hands. It is in yours. Your conduct
to me shall regulate mine to him. Let me
know your resolves, and let me know them
soon
. The aspect of the times will admit of no
delay. I enclose a safe-conduct for any
messenger
you may send me. Should you decide
on coming here to see your father, and to be
mine, it will be prudent to communicate your
design to me privately, lest the people among
whom you live, should prevent its
accomplishment
.
Your messenger will hear of me at the
wigwam of Aranooko. If he comes not
soon
,
I shall not expect him at all. Fierce and prompt
measures shall then be adopted, and remember
who is in my power. Oh! drive me not, thou
most fascinating of thy sex, to the adoption of
measures that may sink thee into affliction, that
humanity may deplore, that I myself may view
with horror! If thou refusest to make me
happy
,
most solemnly do I swear to make
thousands
miserable. Arouse not my energies to
do mischief, or terribly, on all whom thou dost
love, will I revenge thy hatred of me.
John Butler
.
What a diversity of feelings did this letter
excite in the bosom of Agnes? With what
contending
emotions did it agitate her whole frame?
Her immediate sorrow was relieved. Her
father
was alivewas safe. How earnestly did
she rejoicehow ardently did she thank
Heaven
!
But how long should he be safe? That
depended upon her determination. Cruel
consideration
!
She could not, she dared not
comply
with the terms on which her father would
be spared. Her love was given, her faith was
sworn, her hand was RETROTHEDto another.
She could not be Butler's without being
faithless
and perjured. To save her father she would
cheerfully die; but could she wrong her soul?
Could she become a bold offender against
Heaven
and subject herself to perdition?No, no
her father himself would shudder at the
thought. She must reject the dreadful
alternative
,
be the consequence what it would. To
Mary Watson she showed the letter, and
explained
her perplexities, and from her she
requested
counsel.
Heaven be praised, she said, my father
is alive; and he has not been tortured. But
how shall I save him from the perils with
which he is threatened. Oh! my friend, thy
judgment is clearcounsel me what I shall
do!
L 2
Thy situation is, indeed, perplexing, said
Miss Watson, what counsel to give it is
difficult
to determine. Concession to the demands
of this wicked man cannot be thought of. To
refuse him entirely might be to seal thy father's
fate. To defer making any reply to his letter
might gain time for the occurrence of some
favourable
event. But that is uncertain; and he
threatens harshness in case of delay. To
deceive
him by a feigned and conditional
compliance
,
would be the safest course; but would it
be proper? Would it be justifiable? These are
questions which require a clearer judgment than
mine, to resolve.
Alas! said Agnes, in what a situation
am I placed, when the least unhappy
alternative
for me to adopt is deception!
But it is deception to prevent cruelty and
crime, observed Miss Watson, and
deception
too that will injure no one. Does this not
argue something in its favour?
I would fain reconcile my conscience to its
adoption in this instance, said Agnes, but
I cannot. The motive for the imposition may
be laudable. But still it would be imposition.
It would be promising to do that which I am
resolved not to doOh, Mary Watson, would
you advise me to be guilty of falsehood?
I am, indeed, bewildered on the subject,
replied Miss Watson. Anxiously do I wish
for the adoption of some means to preserve your
father,and I can see no other than your
consenting
to deceive the wicked man into whose
power he has fallen. Yet, I acknowledge, the
idea of your committing a deliberate falsehood,
is a painful one. It would be truly desirable
to avoid it. Perhaps my brother may be able
to suggest some means of extricating you out
of this difficulty.
I should like to consult him, said Agnes.
His wisdom may point out the correct course
for me to steer. On his friendship for aid in
my present distress, I implicitly rely, and I feel
that I do not rely in vain.
A message was despatched for Dr. Watson,
and he was soon in the presence of Agnes.
When he heard her statement, Thank
Providence
,
said he,they have not murdered
your father! While there is life there is hope.
Butler must, if possible, be kept in uncertainty
respecting your determination. Peremptorily
to reject his terms might be fatal to your father.
You must write soothinglybut let me reflect
before you write, I will consult a friend
whose counsel and whose aid, if any man's can,
will serve us on this occasion. He is at present
in our village.
He withdrew, and returned in about a
quarter
of an hour, with the Hermit of the woods.
My daughter, said the Hermit, I respect
your scruples. Whether they be, in this
instance
,
overstrained or not, I would have you
for ever to cherish them. They are valuable
proofs of upright feelingsprecious marks of
a pure mind. Yet, commendable as this rigid
adherence to literal veracity, under all
circumstances
,
is, in our course through life, we may
often find the exercise of contrivance and
stratagem
requisite for self-preservation; and to use
artifice against the deceitful must be sometimes
allowable. It is but meeting them with their
own weapons. To use it against such a dark
and depraved dissembler as Butler, and, as in
the present case, for the purpose of preserving
the life of a virtuous man, can hardly be
considered
wrong. But since you have scruples on
the subject, you do well to hearken to them.
They proceed from correct principles; and so
long as they regulate your conduct, you will
not be likely to go astray.If you will commit
to me the management of this affair, I will
endeavour
to effect the preservation of your father,
without obliging you to offend against your
conscience. You are betrothed to another.
You cannot promise yourself to Butler,
without
speaking a wilful untruth. Yet on such a
promise the safety of your father seems to
depend
.
Fear not, my child;adhere to the
strict principles of integrity which are the
foundation of your virtuous scruples. The
consciousness
of doing so will be an unfailing
solace
in every trial. I will exert myself in
behalf of your father. Will you trust to my
efforts?
You have spoken comfort to my heart,
she replied. Not only will I trust you, but
my thanks and my prayers shall attend your
generous efforts. Save my father, and the
justice
of Heaven will reward you: it will be a
deed beyond the power of man to reward!
The Hermit departed; and Agnes full of
confidence
in the success of his exertions, soon
threw off the despondency which had weighed
so heavily upon her, and bloomed once more
in renewed health and recovered spirits.
CHAPTER X.
Should simplicity be opposed to cunning, and openness of heart to
deep guile? As well might we oppose the lamb to the fox, or the
trembling fawn to the crouching tiger. No; let snares be set for the
deceiver, and let the deviser of fraud fall into his own pit. So shall
honesty triumph over baseness, and wisdom show herself stronger
than fraud.
Talmud
.
Although the Hermit approved of the
scruples
of Agnes on the subject of deception, and
encouraged her to persevere, on all occasions,
in a system of strict veracity, yet the moral
code which he prescribed for himself was not
quite so rigid. Injurious or even unnecessary
untruths he detested. Such, he conceived, could
never come but from a corrupt source. But he
had great knowledge of human natureof its
condition in this lifeits liability to be affected
by circumstances which it cannot control, and
which frequently change its position in respect
to abstract morality, rendering the obligations
of the latter more or less incumbent, according
to events and situations. He had often been
witness of alternatives which left only a choice
of crimes. To choose the least was assuredly
then the
duty
, and he who did so was, in his
opinion, entitled to praise instead of censure.
To destroy the life of another in
self-defence
,
he reasoned, has never been
considered
immoral. Neither is it thought
immoral
to break a promise or even an oath
which is enforced by the fear of violence. How
then can it be criminal to dissuade a ruffian
from the commission of murder by
communicating
to him information which is known to
be untrue? What is, in most other cases, a
crime, becomes here a virtue. It is used as an
instrument of good; and to forbear the use of it,
when it is found that no other instrument will
answer the purpose, is to omit doing the good,
and to participate in the enormous guilt which
the omission permits to take place.
If such were the Hermit's views, why did he
not counsel Agnes to save her father by
deceiving
Butler? His motives were various. Truth
is, at all times beautiful, and rarely indeed, is
a breach of it commendable. To accustom
young and ingenuous minds, therefore, to
reverence
it at all times, and to ward off from their
experience, as much as possible, any occurrence
that might justify deception, is to consult their
welfare by strengthening their integrity. For
this reason, the Hermit did not wish Agnes to
diverge from the direct line of truth even for a
good purpose, when that purpose might be
otherwise obtained, which he believed it might
by his own agency. Besides, he was a believer
in the doctrine of the impulses of conscience
being the criterion of good or evil actions.
The scruples of Agnes, proved that in
practising
the proposed deception, she would have
acted against the dictates of her conscience,
and, therefore, in his view, would have been
criminal. Should he find deception to be
necessary
to save Mr. Norwood, he had no
scruples
against using it himself. In such a case he
would experience no compunction, while he
would save a young female whom he esteemed,
from doing what might afterwards inflict upon
her the pangs of remorse. In short, whether
the Hermit's reasoning on this subject was right
or wrong, it will be admitted that his intentions
and conduct were benevolent. He had in view
two schemes for the delivery of Mr. Norwood.
The first was to use an agent whom he could
instruct in a certain stratagem which might
effect
the purpose, and thereby obviate the
necessity
of himself appearing on the scene and
deceiving Butler in relation to Agnes; an
alternative
which he wished to avoid, but if found
necessary, he was resolved to adopt.
On leaving Agnes he proceeded to the
residence
of a young man named Joseph Jennings.
Joseph, though rugged in his manners,
possessed
a warm heart, and was devotedly, or rather
superstitiously, attached to Mr. Norwood,
whose clerical character he esteemed as the
perfection
of human excellence, and whose
abduction
he conceived to be a sacrilegious crime
that could not fail to be visited by the vengeance
of Heaven. Joseph was stout, active and
fearless
.
From his earliest youth he had been a
hunter of the wild beasts of the forest, and was,
in consequence, acquainted with every hill and
valley, defile and cavern, river, swamp and lake,
in the whole of the broad region that lies
between
the two great branches of the
Susquehanna
.
He possessed also that quick and
shrewd conception, which, when found among
the uneducated classes of mankind, is more
observable
,
perhaps because less expected, than
when found among those who have had better
opportunities of mental cultivation and
intellectual
improvement.
It was with the aid of this youth that the
Hermit proposed to effect the deliverance of
Mr. Norwood; and he found him a ready and
zealous auxiliary in the enterprise. He
accompanied
him to a cavern about ten miles distant
from the residence of the sachem Aranooko, in
the neighbourhood of which Mr. Norwood was
confined under the immediate surveillance of
Butler himself. From this cavern, Joseph
proceeded
alone on the enterprise. He had
received
instructions from the Hermit in relation
to the measures he should adopt. He pushed
M
forward boldly with a resolution to act the
royalist
to the heart's content of the tories, who
had on the detection of their conspiracy, fled, in
great numbers, from the Wyoming settlements,
to the country occupied by the Mohawks, near
the chief village of which they had formed an
encampment. Joseph entered this encampment
singing, at the top of his lungs, God save the
king. His hunting pursuits, by keeping him
at a distance from society, had prevented his
political predilections, which were decidedly
whig, from being generally known. It was,
therefore, not doubted but that he was sincere
in his present manifestations of loyalty; and
that, as he now pretended, he had fled from the
threats of the Wyoming whigs, to seek shelter
among men whose sentiments were more in
accordance with his own. He was soon
introduced
to Butler, furnished with arms at the
expense of king George, and enrolled among
the faithful defenders of his majesty's crown
and government.
Joseph knew the value of time, and was no
laggard on an errand of importance. He soon
discovered the tent in which Mr. Norwood
was confined. He had some slight
acquaintance
with the sentinel placed over the reverend
captive for that evening. It was late in the
evening when Joseph approached this sentinel
in a seemingly careless manner, with a flask of
rum in his hand. He tipt him a jovial wink,
and offered to treat him. Good humour is
always
infectious, especially when good fare is
offered with it. Joseph's was at this time
irresistible
to the sentinel, who willingly pledged
him in a bumper, which was soon repeated;
and Joseph seated himself on a log beside his
sociable companion and began to talk of the
times.
When do you think, Ephraim, said he,
we shall have to fight the whigs? I guess
when we muster our forces, Indians and all,
they wont stand us long.
The time of marching will be fixed
to-morrow
,
said Ephraim.
Who fixes it? inquired Joseph.
The Indian chiefs are to hold a council for
the purpose, replied Ephraim, and our
leaders are to assist at their deliberations.
Another glass, drank to the success of their
enterprise
,
followed this information.
How does the old preacher stand his
confinement
?
asked Joseph.
He seems patient enough under it,
answered
Ephraim.
Is he well treated? inquired Joseph.
Pretty well as yet, was the reply. But
he is not likely to be much longer indulged as
he has been. Butler and he have had a violent
quarrel to-day.
How?but no matter, said Joseph. It
is none of our concern, you know. Here
Ephraim, another glass to the success of the
right side. This empties the flask.
The more's the pity, said Ephraim,
again partaking of Joseph's spiritual kindness,
the effects of which on his intellects had now
become visible.
Did you hear nothing of the cause of their
dispute? asked Joseph. Cause!hicdarn
the cause! Guess it was politicsCare nothing
about ithic-updarn this sentry dutycurse
the rebels! hicthey give so much trouble
hic-up.
Joseph, who perceived that his friend, whose
notions of military discipline were not very
orthodox
,
had got into the delectable
care-for-nobody
state which suited his design, proposed
to relieve him for a short time of his irksome
duty, by assuming it in his stead.
If Butler or Batemanhic-upfinds that
I have left my posthicmuttered Ephraim.
But without finishing the sentence, his ideas
took another turn, and he exclaimed, Darn
them, what care I for them. I'm as good a
man as any of them. I am for king George
hic-up! Guess I'll have a frolic. Some of the
boys are carousing in Josh. Juggles's tent!
Keep my post for half an hourbravo! darn it
now for spree! hic-up! And away Ephraim
staggered in pursuit of jollity and rum, leaving
Joseph in possession of the premises.
Joseph's difficulty, however, was not yet
over. The tent contained more inmates than
Mr. Norwood. Butler himself and two or three
other royalists were it inhabitants. It is true,
from the lateness of the hour, eleven o'clock
at night, the presumption was that they were
asleep; but that presumption was the same in
regard to Mr. Norwood. Besides, Joseph
knew not which bed was occupied by the latter
gentleman, and he might awake some other
person in his stead. He had a bold heart,
however, and he resolved to make an effort to
effect his design, trusting to some favourable
circumstance, and his own dexterity for success.
He cautiously entered the tent, and perceived
by means of a dim lamp that flickered in one
corner, three beds spread on the floor, two of
which apparently contained more than one
individual
.
In the third which was the farthest
from the entrance, he conjectured there was
but one person, whom from the appearance of
an article of dress which lay upon it, he
believed
to be the object of his solicitude. Joseph,
while he supplied Ephraim so liberally with
M 2
the rum, had taken care to use it very sparingly
himself, so that he was in possession of all his
faculties, with perhaps a little elevation of
courage suited to the occasion.
He approached the bed which he believed
to contain Mr. Norwood; but he was mistaken.
It contained Butler himself, who was in a sound
sleep. He examined the other dormitories,
but was greatly chagrined to find that the
object
of his search was in neither of them. He
was retiring very reluctantly and with much
mortification, when he heard a cough which he
thought was familiar to his ear, and perceived
the movement of a curtain which he had before
mistaken for part of the enclosure of the tent.
He was also agreeably surprised at seeing the
curtain drawn aside, and the well-known
countenance
of his reverend friend looking at him.
He hastily motioned to Mr. Norwood to
preserve
silence, and to follow him. Mr.
Norwood
knew Joseph well, and instantly
comprehended
his intention.
This is a providential interference
thought heI will avail myself of it.
He beckoned to Joseph that he understood
him and would follow. Joseph immediately
withdrew, and, in a few minutes Mr.
Norwood
joined him outside of the tent; a few more
carried them into a part of the woods which
effectually secured them from detection.
Through the intricacies of the forest, there
could not be a better guide than Joseph, and
early the next morning he conducted his
venerable
protegee into the cavern where he had
the day previous left the Hermit of the woods.
In three or four days more, Mr. Norwood
received
the embraces of his pious and
affectionate
daughter, and the heart-felt congratulations
of all the people of Wyoming.
CHAPTER XI.
The council meets, and vengeance is decreed;
War's demon is unchained, and blood-shot rage
Whets his fierce appetite, and spurs his steed
To the death-revelling field, the strife to wage,
Where innocence as well as guilt shall bleed;
But, if he can with human suffering feed
His fell voracity for mortal wo,
He cares not;let the weapon but succeed,
To him no matter who endures the blow,
The wound it makes shall cause the demon's joy to glow!
Harley
.
No demon of wrath could exhibit more fury
than did Butler on discovering that his
important
prisoner had escaped. The sentinel whose
neglect of duty had occasioned this mischance,
was brought trembling into his presence. In
vain did he acknowledge his crime and implore
pardon. In vain did he plead that he had been
deceived by one who had deceived Butler
himself
one
who had that very day been enrolled
among the king's friends, and seemed
particularly
zealous for the royal cause. Poor
Ephraim
was handed over to some tory officers who
formed themselves into a species of court
martial
,
for the purpose of trying him for his
offence
.
As strict discipline was, as yet, far
from being properly established among the tory
bands that now rallied round the standard of
Butler, and as there was some danger of
exciting
discontent in their ranks, if Ephraim should
be punished too severely, he was merely
sentenced
to be first publicly reprimanded, and
afterwards exposed in an open space in the
centre
of the encampment, with his legs confined
in a wooden frame resembling stocks, for
twenty four hours. Butler was greatly
dissatisfied
with the lenity of this sentence; but
reflecting
that too much harshness might shake
his popularity among a body of men who were
not yet accustomed to subordination, he
acquiesced
.
He, however, determined to urge
forward, with all speed, the measures that
were in preparation for an attack upon the
settlements
of Wyoming.
In expectation of being able, by means of
her father, to constrain Agnes to comply with
his wishes, he had for some few days past
rather
contributed to retard the intended
enterprise
,
that he might have time to effect this
purpose. He knew the filial reverence and
strong attachment of Agnes for her father. He
considered him, therefore, as an engine in his
hands, by which, with proper management, he
could wield her determinations as he pleased.
He had written to her, as we have seen,
informing
her that her father should receive good or
had treatment, according as she complied or
not with his wishes. The time in which,
according
to his calculations he should receive
her answer, had elapsed on the day of Joseph
Jennings' arrival at the tory encampment. No
answer had arrived. But in this he scarcely felt
disappointed. He was too well aware of her
aversion to him, to have been very sanguine in
his expectations of one, at least one
satisfactory
to his wishes. He considered that Agnes,
knowing her father to be himself averse to her
connexion with him, might suppose that her
consent, even if she gave it, would not receive
his sanction. To remove that obstacle,
therefore
,
he determined either to persuade or
compel
his prisoner to exert his authority over her,
and to write desiring her to yield to his wishes.
It was his attempt to enforce such a letter from
Mr. Norwood, that occasioned the altercation
between them to which the sentinel alluded in
his conversation with Joseph Jennings. The
firmness of Mr. Norwood highly incensed him,
and he did not refrain from the most vehement
threats of vengeance. He, in fact, determined
to commence a system of harshness and cruelty
towards his prisoner, which he doubted not
would compel him to purchase forbearance by
compliance. His scheme, however, was
frustrated
by the event we have related, and, with
a spirit animated to the utmost fury of revenge
against all the whigs of Wyoming, he resolved
to exert his whole influence in hastening
forward
the expedition now planned against
them.
A great council, composed of the Mohawk
chiefs and the tory leaders, was held the day
after Mr. Norwood's escape. This was the
council alluded to by the sentinel Ephraim. It
convened in the wigwam of Aranooko. Its
object was to confirm the league between the
Indians and the royalists, and make final
arrangements
relative to the marching of the
intended
expedition against the whigs of
Wyoming
.
The sachem Aranooko presided at this
assembly
.
Around the council-fire which was lighted in
the centre of the wigwam, the chiefs and leaders
arranged themselves. The calumet was smoked
in silence, for some minutes, and the cup of
hospitality pledged, in token of amity between
the parties. Aranooko then addressed the tory
leaders.
Brothers, I am glad to see you. Hearken
to me. The council-fire is kindled that we may
converse around it. The smoke of our calumets
have mingled, and we are unitedthe festal
cup has been pledged, and we are friends.
Every Mohawk says, let it be for ever.
Brothers
,
what is your reply!
For ever! answered Butler and his
coleagues
.
Then take this wampum, said the
sachem
,
and let the treaty be confirmed.
Butler received the wampum, and presented
Aranooko with a handsome military sash in
exchange
.
The treaty is now confirmed, continued
Aranooko. We are now the allies of the
great king, your father, whose throne is fixed in
chambers of the eastin the land of the
morning
sun. Your father is powerful. He is at a
far distance. But he stretches his arm across
the great deep, and our forests tremble at his
strength. The winds of heaven have blown to
this land the travellers of the sea that he has
sent forth. They brought thunder with them,
they shook the solidity of our shores, and at
the glare of their lightning, heroes have turned
pale. Thus mighty is your father. Yet he has
children in this land, who fear not his power.
They have united in strong bands against his
faithful servants. They have spoken words of
defianceThey have committed acts of
rebellion
.
They are not worthy to be called
children
.
Brothers, your father wants to chastise his
disobedient children. He asks us to aid him,
and offers us rich rewards. We have agreed to
his terms. Brothers, hear our reasons.
In the quarrel between your father and his
disobedient children, we would have nothing to
do, if those children did not deserve
chastisement
from our hands, as well as from his. They
have usurped our landsthey have driven us
from our hunting grounds. The wigwams of
our fathers once covered the fair regions of the
Merrimack, the Hudson, the Delaware, and
the Susquehanna. Where are now those
dwellings
of the brave? They have vanished like the
blossoms that are beautiful when fanned by the
gale of spring, but that wither and fade away
when the fierce summer bursts upon them with
the relentless scorching of his beams. So have
our people faded before the wrath of the
children
of your father. They would now destroy
him also; and shall we not help to avenge his
cause and our own?
Brothers, we grieve for the doom of our
fathers. The recollection of their sufferings,
makes our hearts ache. You invite us to
revenge
them. Can we refuse? When we look
at ourselves, what do we see? The persecuted
remnants of a mighty people. Our race was
once like the stars of the heaven, numerous and
bright in their glorious abodeswe are now
like the glimmering meteors of the swamps and
N
solitudes, few and wandering, scattered by the
winds of night, and extinguished by the beams
of day.
Brothers, you offer us vengeance. Shall
we not take it? Our wrath is awakenedour
strength is revived. We have lifted the hatchet.
We pant for the enemy. Let us hasten towards
him, that we may scorch him with the fire that
burns within us.
Brothers you have heard me.
Butler now rose and addressed the sachem.
Brother and chief, thy zeal delights me.
The spirit that animates thee is worthy of the
chief of the gallant Mohawks. Thou hast not
degenerated from thy fathers, and thy fathers
were heroes. They never shrunk from battle,
although the death-winged thunder of artillery
rolled in volumes of destruction against them.
Their hearts were invincible, but their weapons
were not formed of materials to combat with
the deadly hail of the musketry, or the fiery
bolts of the cannon of their adversaries. Yet
they would not submit to the invaders. They
could die but they could not yield. Hence
were they swept from the land.Ye are now,
brave Mohawks, in the stead of your fathers.
You are equally heroic. Their spirits, from
their abodes in the land of bliss, will survey
your exploits in the approaching war with
delight
.
They will say to each other: `Our sons
are heroesthey are mindful of our wrongs.
See how they avenge us!'
Brother, thou hast said truly that our
father
,
the great king beyond the ocean, is
powerful
.
All parts of the world have seen the
glittering of his arms, and heard the rolling of
his thunder. His armies have conquered
continents
,
and his navies have brought the islands
into subjection. His rebellious children in this
land, could soon be humbled by his power, and
crushed in his wrath; but they have sought aid
from his enemies, and have unnaturally thrown
themselves into the arms of those who envy
the power of their parent. Is their offence
not heinous? Is it not aggravated beyond
endurance
?
Brother, those same disobedient people are
your enemies. In this very neighbourhood,
they have usurped the lands which were once
yours, and they have given you no equivalent
for the possession. The pleasant valleys on
the Susquehanna are no longer yours. They
have enclosed fields, built villages, and erected
strong-holds on your hunting grounds. You are
expelled from the heritage of your ancestors.
You will now be avenged; you will soon
repossess
your own. Our great father, the king,
invites you to accept of his assistance. He
sends you arms and ammunition equal to those
possessed by your enemies, and such as your
fathers never had. With such means would
your fathers not have conquered? Would they
not have kept possession of their lands, and
transmitted to you the inheritance of a great
people? Your hearts answer, `yes.'
Brother, you will do no less than your
fathers
would have done. We will lend our aid.
We will go forth jointly to conquest and
revenge
.
We will avenge the wrongs of our
father
,
though he is far distant. You will avenge
those of your long-suffering race; and after the
wreaths of victory shall decorate your brows,
you will resume your station as a great and
valiant
people.
Brother, shall we march to-morrow? In
three days we shall be upon the enemy. We
shall take them by surprise, and they shall be
easily overthrown.
Brother, it is my proposal that we delay
not, lest our foes receive succour and be in a
condition to give powerful battle on the field,
or to entrench themselves securely in their
strong-holds.
Brother, you have heardwhat say you?
My voice is for marching to-morrow by
the dawn, said Aranooko.
Father! said Brandt, addressing the
sachem
,
My voice is the same. Shall I say
that now the wish of my heart is accomplished,
when I see a league formed against the spoilers
of our people? No, until I behold a thousand of
their scalps hanging around our wigwams, I
shall not say so. But, father, I will say that I
rejoice exceedingly at the prospect this treaty
holds forth. It appears to me as the dawn of a
triumphant and glorious day, which will not set
until my soul shall be satisfied with the blood
of my enemies.
Father, hear me. I am a Mohawk. When
I was a boy some of my companions taunted
me. They said that the blood of the pale-faced
people ran in my veinsthat my heart sided
with the race of my father, and that the
Mohawks
should not confide in me. I then vowed to
show to you all which side my heart preferred.
Did I ever spare a white man in battle? Did I
ever show mercy to a white prisoner? If so,
let my mother's race disclaim me. But ye are
all witnesses of the animosity with which I
have pursued the white race, and how I have
endeavoured to avenge the injuries they have
inflicted on my red brethren, the people of my
mother.
Father, I will tell you the reason. My
mother was tender to my infancy. She
cherished
,
she fed, she clothed me in my helpless
N 2
years. I reverence her memory. I love her
people. My father I never knew. He deserted
me when I was feeble. He was unnatural, and
left me to the protection of a forsaken woman.
My mother had been his friend in distress.
She nursed him in his sickness, and her caresses
relieved the anguish of his mind. He was
ungrateful
.
He was more unnatural than the
rugged bear or the ferocious panther. They do
not desert their young when it is helpless, and
leave to its mother the sole charge of providing
for it. My father did so. Can I love him?
No; I grieve that my frame contains any
portion
of his blood. For his sake I detest his
people.Father, on my own account I detest
them also. Have they not maltreated and
imprisoned
me, because I resented the insult of
one of their rude tongues. I clove him down.
I should have been applauded: but I was bound
and thrown into a dark cell. My heart has
panted for revenge! I demand of my white
brother, that, when we gain the victory, he
will allow me a thousand scalps of the prisoners
over whose tortures I may exult, and enjoy a
full banquet of vengeance.
Let our white brother speak, said
Aranooko
.
Brandt is brave. He will be the
leader of our warriors. He will deserve his
reward.
I know the bravery of Brandt, replied
Butler. I admire his zeal in behalf of his
people. His desire of vengeance upon those
who have injured him, is natural. I will not
oppose it. Let it have its full swing upon the
rebels of Wyoming. There are but two or
three there whom I would save. I will name
them to Brandt in secret. All others shall be
at his disposal. Why should I wish to
preserve
rebels?Will this satisfy my brother?
I am satisfied, said Brandt. There is
joy in my heart. I will have vengeance for
the bonds that fettered my limbs; and for every
hour of my imprisonment the scalp of a white
man shall reward me!
Let the first glance of the sun to-morrow
upon our village, be the signal for marching!
said Aranooko.
The chiefs signified approbation, and the
council broke up, each man hastening to make
arrangements for his departure the next
morning
.
CHAPTER XII.
Who that feels what love is here,
All its falsehoodsall its pain,
Would, for even Elysium's sphere,
Risk the fatal dream again?
Who, that 'midst the desert's heat,
Sees the waters fade away,
Would not rather die than meet
Streams again as false as they?
Moore
.
What a wayward and unaccountable passion
is love! No strength of mind can resist itno
force of reasoning can control it. If it has
once truly fixed upon the heart, what will
remove
it? Neither the coldness nor the
unworthiness
of its object. We may discover that
our affections are misplacedwe may grieve,
but we will continue to love. We may
disapprove
we
may condemnwe may even try
to detest. But it will not avail. Our affections
will cling to their chosen object, no matter
how desperate the efforts we may make to
separate
them. The mention of a beloved name
will excite tender emotions, although we know
it to be the name of a wretch. We may abhor
crime, yet we may love the criminal. Nay,
we may receive injuriesungenerous, base and
cruel injuriesyet we may love the unkind
being who inflicts them, and long to kiss the
hand that consigns us to misery.
Unfortunate
,
indeed, is the condition of those whose
heart and understanding are thus at variance.
Often does the struggle continue until the whole
frame becomes agitated and convulsed, and
sinks into despondencydespairmadness
death!So true is the Greek adage which may
be thus paraphrased:
Not against hope alone, said mighty Jove,
But against reason shall weak mortals love,
Until the madd'ning strife exhausts the breath,
And the torn victim finds repose in death.
Isabella Austin still continued to love
Butler
even after his treacherous alliance with the
savages became known. In spite of the
exhortations
and arguments of her friendsin spite
of her own earnest desire to withdraw her
affections
from one so perfidious and wicked, her
heart still clung to him. He was her first, her
only choice among mankind. All her affections
were entwined around his image, and she found
it as impossible to dissever them as to separate
sensation from her existence. Severely,
indeed
,
did she feel his perfidydeeply did she
lament his turpitude. His attempt upon Miss
Norwood, and his instrumentality in carrying
off her father, greatly shocked her. She could
offer no apology for him. She saw that he was
not only a traitor but a ruffian; yet, though her
esteem was gone, her love was not diminished;
and no small portion of the agitation she
experienced
,
when she heard of the late transaction,
arose from the danger to which he had then
been exposed. The outcry against him
throughout
the whole settlement was unanimous and
great; and every day her ears were pained by
accumulating intelligence of his flagitious acts
and detestable projects. She brooded intensely
and sorrowfully on the subject, until she
became
an object of pity to all her acquaintances,
and of anxiety to her immediate friends.
Miss Norwood and Miss Watson were her
most intimate companions, and deeply did they
sympathise with her. By every art that could
be suggested by the tenderest friendship, they
endeavoured to sooth her sorrows, and divert
her mind from the unhappy subject of its
contemplations
.
Books, music, short walks
for the times were too dangerous to admit long
onesand cheerful conversation, were the
principal means resorted to, and they
sometimes
produced an apparently good effect. She
felt grateful for the attention of these true
friends, and seemed to derive enjoyment from
their society.
One evening as they sat in the porch of Dr.
Watson's house, they observed two fowls
fighting with great fury.
Alas! said Isabella, all animated nature
seems to be imbued with contentious feelings.
The propensity for mutual destruction is not
confined to man. To be irritable and vengeful
seems to be a law imposed, no doubt for wise
ends, on all sentient beings!
All sentient beings, observed Agnes,
have impulses capable of being excited to
either hatred or love, resentment or gratitude.
The effects of hatred and resentment even in
the inferior animals, it is unpleasant to behold;
while those of love and gratitude are always
delightful
.
How much more so in man! and
endowed
as he is with reason to see and
appreciate
the superior advantages of the latter, he is
wonderfully inexcusable for not cultivating
them attentively and indulging them
exclusively
.
That men, said Miss Watson, with all
their powers of calculation and foresight, should
plunge, on account of any provocation, into the
known miseries of war, seems to me not only
inexcusable but unaccountable. The lower
animals
cannot estimate the extent of injury they
may inflict on each other by yielding to the
impulses of anger, and are, therefore, certainly
not so culpable and absurd in their quarrels as
men. Neither do the evils resulting from
their combats ever extend so far. With the
rational, and, therefore, less excusable beings,
we frequently find the evils of contention
almost
unbounded in their extent, and shocking
in their details. Plunder, devastation, and
death inflicted in a thousand forms, and, alas!
too often in the most cruel that can be devised,
are the direful accompanimentsoften the
intended
objectsof human warfare, for which,
in my view, no justification nor apology can be
offered.
I do not wish to justify the wars waged by
men from any example drawn from the brute
creation, said Isabella. Alas! I have been
too severely tried by the animosity existing
among our raceour neighboursour
connexions
shall
I say our friends!ah! no; they
are deceitfulfalse friends!But such are
mankind!Can I justify them? Nono. In
our present unhappy dissensions, my
approbation
may be entirely on one side; but there are
those I dearly love embarked on both. Can I,
without a bleeding heart, contemplate the strife
of such, or wish either to be vanquished? My
friends, you will forgive me if I wish safety to
your most dreaded and detested enemy! Alas!
is he not my own enemy? Yet does my heart
bleed for himcling to himin spite of reason
in spite of dutyfor, oh! I cannot control
my heart. I ask you not to approve of me. I
only ask you to pity and forgive me!
Truly do we pitysincerely do we forgive
you, said Miss Watson. We know your
affection for that man is involuntary. It is
true love with which reason has nothing to do.
It is the offspring of feeling alone. Happy,
happy are they whose reason sanctions the
impulse
of their feelings!
At this moment their attention was directed
to a man on horseback galloping swiftly
towards
the governor's house. They
recognised
him to be Joseph Jennings. Their hearts
sunk within them, for something indescribable
in his manner, as he past, told them that he was
the bearer of alarming intelligence. In a short
time, they perceived a crowd assembling about
the governor's house, and were soon informed
that the intelligence was indeed alarming. The
combined forces of the tories and Indians had
invaded the district. One of the remote forts
situated about half a day's journey from the
village, had already fallen into their hands, in
their attack upon which they had slain nearly
a hundred of the garrison, and after its
surrender
,
had massacred the survivors consisting of
about the same number.
In a short time our trembling females
received
O
a message from the governor, requiring
them to retire into the adjoining fort, where all
the women and children, and the aged and
infirm
inhabitants of the settlement, were
hastening
for protection. Mr. Norwood and Dr.
Watson
were the bearers of this message, and their
companions to the only asylum that now
remained
against the advancing and ferocious foe.
The habitations of Wyoming soon became
totally deserted. The fort, although capacious,
having in its construction been adapted for
such an emergency, was incapable of
affording
accommodation to the great number that
desired
admission. Many were, therefore,
obliged
to fly to the wilds and mountains for safety.
The nearest and dearest friends were thus
separated, and the most heart-rending scenes of
grief and distress were sorrowfully witnessed
by the governor and the council, without it
being
in their power to relieve them.
The fort was tolerably well calculated for
defence. It was surrounded by a parapet about
five feet high, outside of which was a ditch
nearly as many feet deep, and more than twice
as many wide. This ditch was, on the present
occasion, filled with water brought to it by a
channel purposely cut from the Sharon. It was
entered by a wooden bridge or moveable
platform
which was susceptible of being drawn up
against the gate of the parapet, so as in that
place, to form no inconsiderable addition to its
strength.
The garrison consisted of about four hundred
men, comprising nearly two-thirds of the armed
strength of the whole settlement. The residue
was scattered in various small bands, for the
purpose of protecting the inhabitants in
different
parts of the district. One of these under
Joseph Jennings, was particularly useful in
defending
those who were obliged to seek shelter
in the mountains from marauding parties of the
enemy. While engaged in this service, Joseph
had the fortune to encounter the celebrated
Brandt himself, and to rescue from his
murderous
hands, the venerable Hermit of the woods.
The incident will be related in the next
chapter
.
CHAPTER XIII.
There was a something in his look,
Which the fell murderer's purpose shook;
His words, mysterious, dark and strange,
Had power the savage heart to change;
Yet less the words impression made,
Than the deep tone of what he said.
Harley
.
It was about mid-summer in 1778, that the
united force of the tories and Indians
arrived
at the most northern settlement in the
valley of Wyoming. This place was defended
by a garrison of about two hundred men,
stationed in a fort, called Wintermoot, from a
violent tory of that name, who had several
months before made it the object of an attack,
in which he was defeated. It was assailed
now by an overwhelming force of nearly
sixteen
hundred tories and Indians, under the
command of Butler and Brandt. The tories,
who were commanded by Butler, formed the
largest portion of this army, their number
being
about one thousand. The remainder
consisted
of the Mohawk warriors, who owned
Brandt for their leader. On reaching the first
settlement of the whites, they halted in order
to perform some warlike ceremonies customary
with the native tribes, on such occasions.
The war-dance was accordingly performed,
and the war-song chanted. The former being
more grotesque than picturesque, would afford
no pleasure in the description; the latter, which
was wild in its structure and fierce in its
sentiments
,
ran something in the following strain.
INDIAN WAR SONG.
Warriors! warriors! we are come
To the field of blood;
Warriors! warriors! we assume
The fierce and vengeful mood!
Remember the combats our fathers maintained
So daringly, so daringly!
O'er the red fields of slaughter their hot vengeance
reigned
Unsparingly, unsparingly!
The sun of the summer burns fierce on the plain,
The fire of our wrath in the battle shall glow;
The thunder of Heav'n shakes the land and the main,
Our war-cry strikes dread to the heart of the foe!
On, ye warriors, brave and bold!
The foe is therehis ranks behold,
To deathto death devote them!
Send their souls to howl in air;
And let their writhing frames declare
'Twas vengeful arms that smote them!
Warriors! now to us belongs
To avenge the red-man's wrongs,
To teach the spoilers of our race,
The murderers of our sires,
That strength does yet our sinews brace,
That rage our hearts inspires!
O 2
There they are!We'll spare them not!
Our arms are strong, our rage is hot,
Our aim is sure, and sharp our steel,
Which soon their quivering flesh shall feel,
As from their sculls we wrench away
The trophies of this vengeful day!
Warriors! warriors! we are come,
To seal yon haughty white men's doom
Hark! our fathers from on high,
Pronounce the mandatethey shall die!
Haste then, the dread command obey!
Plungeplunge into the deadly fray!
Nor mercy ask nor give to-day!
After the excitement of the bloody
exhortations
contained in these verses, it is not to be
supposed that much mercy would be shown to
the small garrison which was now attacked. The
brave Wyoming soldiers, however, sold their
lives dearly. Repeatedly did their well-aimed
discharges of musketry from behind their
ramparts
,
thin the ranks of the assailants and
stagger the enthusiasm of their approach. But
that enthusiasm, supported by the weight of
their numbers, carried them forward to the
gate of the ramparts, which soon gave way, and
a thousand balls followed the flying garrison
into their last refuge, a large log edifice inside
of the entrenchment. Nearly one half of these
brave men were slain; the rest surrendered at
discretion, but were soon laid prostrate in the
arms of death along side of their companions,
and two hundred scalps collected together that
evening in the tent of Brandt, formed the
horrid
trophies on which that monster feasted his
fiendish imagination with intense delight.
Eight hundred more! cried he, addressing
himself to Butler, and my revenge on
Wyoming
shall be satisfied!
That will require the heads of nearly
one-fourth
of the population of the district!
replied
his confederate in cruelty. But no
matter, you shall be gratified. The full
complement
shall, before many days, be meted out
to you. Your valour deserves even a richer
reward.
What richer can I obtain? asked Brandt,
with fierce satisfaction gleaming in his burning
eyes. In the assemblies of my tribe, I will
point to these trophies of my valour, and I
will say, `Mohawks, behold how I have dealt
with your enemies'and they will answer,
`Brandt deserves to be our leader in war, for
he has overpowered the white men!'
That evening, while the victors, wearied out
by their exertions during the fight, or their
carousals
afterwards, were mostly sunk in slumber,
and the whole encampment had become
hushed
in comparative silence, Brandt, whose
exultation
of mind prevented him from sharing in
the general repose, and who was also desirous
to ascertain whether the sentinels were
attentive
to their duty, wandered for some time
from station to station, indulging his delight in
the present triumph, and regaling his
imagination
with the contemplation of others that he
believed were speedily approaching.
The evening was beautiful, and altogether
free from that sultriness which frequently
characterizes
the evenings of July (for it was now
the beginning of that month) in Pennsylvania.
There was a magnificent serenity in the
expansive
brightness of the starry heavens, the
majestic mildness of the modest moon, the
sedateness
of the lofty hills, the solid plain on
which he trod, and the broad and quiet sheet
of the Susquehanna that lay basking in the
moonlight rays before him, that might have
inspired even a savage with the love of
tranquillity
and peace. There was also inherent
in the sublime grandeur of the scene, a
mysterious
power of impressing on the mind of
the beholder, holy and solemn feelings and
convictions relative to the great Author of all
things, which might have imparted a
sensation
of humility even to the proud and stern
heart of the triumphant Brandt, and softened
his rugged temper, into, at least, a temporary
feeling of kindness and benevolence toward his
fellow men. But although he was impressed with
no feeling of this nature, he was not altogether
insensible to the beauty and blandness of the
scene. These induced him to wander some
distance from the fort, towards the bank of the
river, in order that he might have a more
perfect
view of the silvery sheen of its broad
bosom
.
As he approached the river, but while
yet at some distance from it, he imagined that
he beheld the figure of a man moving slowly
amidst the trees near the bank. He advanced
cautiously, and with that stealthy pace which
the Indians, when requisite, can so readily
adopt, for he wished not to frighten away the
wanderer, whom he suspected to be a spy from
the whig party, endeavouring to reconnoitre
the state and position of his encampment. If so,
as he was armed with a tomahawk, he
determined
to cut him down, and add one scalp more to
the number of the day's trophies. If indeed he
should be a white man, whether a spy or not,
unless he belonged to Butler's party, he resolved
that he should suffer the same fate. His quick
eye soon discerned that the stranger was clothed,
partly at least, in the Indian costume. This caused
him to hesitate in his murderous intention, and
he hailed the stranger in the Indian language.
The latter was startled. He had evidently not
hitherto observed the approach of Brandt. It
was now too late to avoid an interview, even
if he wished to do so, and he answered the
salutation in the same language.
Brandt now recognised the Hermit of the
Woods. By information received from
Butler
,
he knew that he had now in his power the
person whose interference had occasioned the
rescue of Miss Norwood and Miss Watson, and
the death of three of his party in the Hemlock
Glade. His first impulse was to sacrifice him
to his vengeance. But reflecting that he was
entirely in his power, he resolved to forbear,
until he should show him how he had excited
his resentmentfor he knew that revenge is
never so complete as when its victim is made
conscious of his offence, and compelled by his
sufferings or his fears to deplore having
committed
it. Indeed those who are epicures in
the indulgence of that most savage and hellish
of all passions, never wish the sufferings of
their victim to be too suddenly terminated by
his dissolutionfor what gratification can
vengeance
derive when consciousness is gone and
life extinct?Besides, even before he received
the information of the Hermit's agency in the
transaction just mentioned, Brandt had
partaken
of the general reverence which was felt
for the old man by the Mohawks, whose
villages
of late years he had frequently visited,
and had to Brandt himself paid more than
ordinary
attention. It is true, he had sometimes
wearied the stern savage by ineffectual attempts
to restrain his impetuous temper and soften
his ferocity. Brandt, although he disrelished
those harangues, and improved nothing by
them, could not but respect a man who took
so much trouble to do him a service. Some
sprinkling of this feeling, perhaps, on this
occasion
,
mingled with his resentment, and
contributed
to produce the pause in his murderous
design, which we have mentioned.
What brings thee here, old man, said he,
prowling, at midnight like a beast of prey, on
the skirts of a field of battle?
I come, said the Hermit, to this scene
of slaughter to discover if there is no wounded
being lying neglected in its vicinity, to whom I
may be of service.
Thou mayest save thyself such trouble,
said Brandt. Every thing human that, this
morning, inhabited yon fort, has been subjected
to the tomahawk.
Then indeed I can render them no
service
!
ejaculated the Hermit. Barbarous
barbarous Brandt!But cruel as thou art, thou
art even less so than he who bears the name of
a Christianwas born among Christianswas
educated in Christian principlesand yet has
assisted thee in this butchery upon his own
people.
Beware old man, exclaimed Brandt, or
thou mayest thyself become the victim of my
resentment. My vengeance is not yet satisfied
on the usurping race who have destroyed my
fathers, and robbed their children of their
hunting
grounds!
Thy fathers!interrupted Rodolph
thy fathers were of the race on whom thou
seekest vengeance. Unnatural man, leave the
work of destroying white men to those who
have none of their blood in their veins! Thou
shouldst
Hold! shouted the savage with a loud and
fearful voice, by Manetto, thou dost insult
me! Seest thou this tomahawk! Is that the
weapon of a white man? Seest thou the hand
that grasps it, the eye that directs it, and the
heart that dictates its useSeest thou these?
Do they belong to a white man? Nono
tremblethey belong to a Mohawk! One who
has sworn vengeance on all thy race; and who
grieves that his blood is tainted with theirs.
One who has sworn vengeance on thyself, for
thou hast done him an injury not to be forgiven
thou hast caused the destruction of three of
his mother's kindred!
Brandt! said the Hermit, in a fearless
tone that surprised the savage, Brandt, what
meanest thou? Thy charge I comprehend not.
But let me tell thee, I fear neither thy
barbarous
weapon, thy blood-stained arm, thy
ferocious
eye, nor thy savage heart. Weaponless
as I am, I dare defy thee. But explain thy
charge. What kindred of thy mother have I
destroyed?
One word will explain it, said Brandt,
somewhat disconcerted by the manner of the
Hermit, the Hemlock Glade!All the people
of my tribe are the kindred of my mother!
The Hermit now clearly comprehended the
charge; but he shrunk not from meeting it.
Ha! said he, I might have been assured
that thy companion in atrocity would have
informed
thee of that. I did my duty then. I
saved innocence from misery, and thee from
additional guilt. Yet I lifted not my hand
against thee. Dost thou wish that thou hadst
disgraced thy manhood by the murder of
women
?
They were our captives, old man, said
Brandt; what we should have done to them
would have been determined by our chiefs.
But the death of my companions must be
avenged. Thou wert the causethou must die!
As Brandt prepared to strike, the Hermit,
starting back a few paces, drew himself up to a
P
greater height than usual, and assumed an air
and attitude of majesty that seemed for a time
to hold the savage spell-bound.
Brandt, beware! he exclaimed, Heaven
looks upon thee!Nono, thou darest not
strike to injure this time-worn frame. The
spirits that inhabit the orbs which shine above
us would see thee and shudder, for it would
be a deed of guilt surpassing whatever thou
hast yet committed. Return to thy camp, nor
pollute the earth with such a crime. Thou
knowest not whom thou wouldst slay.
Who art thou? strange man, said Brandt
in a subdued tone. Art thou not Rodolph of the
woods?
I am Rodolph of the woods, replied the
Hermit; and I am one whose fate is so closely
connected with thine, that if thou darest to
strike me, with the blow thou wilt seal thy
own perdition. The laws of the universe have
given me a control over thee from which thou
canst not escape, but of which, at present,
thou knowest nothing.
Thou speakest mysteries, old man!
returned
Brandt. By Manetto, I do not believe
thy words. Thou wouldst mock methou
wouldst frighten me.Ha! thou shalt not.
What care I for thy fancied control. Vain
dreamer, thy silly device will not serve thee. I
must have revenge for my slaughtered friends
and now thou diest!
I die not now. Heaven prevents thy
wickedness
!
said the Hermit. Brandt replied not;
but uttered an imprecation which he intended
should be followed by the stroke of death.
Immediately
his weapon was raised in air, but as
it descended, it was grasped firmly by an
unseen
hand, and rendered powerless. The
Hermit then seized it, wrested it from him, and
flung it afar into the Susquehanna.
Untameable savage! he cried, return to
thy companions, I command thee; and thank
Heaven that thou hast been prevented from
committing the most terrible of crimes.
Brandt, awe-struck and yet enraged, was
about to answer, when an unknown voice
exclaimed
Obey! and at the same instant, a
large pistol was presented to his breast by the
hand that had lately grasped him so firmly.
He instinctively started back, muttered a curse
upon his ill-fortune, and fled.
It would be right to shoot him, said the
person who held the pistol; and he was about
performing what he said, when the Hermit
prevented him by exclaiming
Oh! spare him! for my sake, spare him!
For your sake, then, let him go in safety,
this time, said Joseph Jennings, for it was he
who had come so opportunely to the Hermit's
assistance. But I fear, added he, that
we shall all have reason to repent this lenity.
Alas! I also fear it, said the Hermit,
sorrowfully
;
but, Joseph, you know my reasons.
I thank you for respecting my feelings, and for
your timely interference to-night. Let us trust
the future to the goodness of the Great Being,
whose hand has so evidently appeared in what
has just taken place. But we must now haste
from hence, lest the implacable Brandt return
to assail us with a force we shall not be able to
withstand.
Joseph's small party of bush-rangers, as they
were called, were stationed in a valley about a
mile distant. Thither they bent their course,
and soon joined them.
CHAPTER XIV.
Last noon beheld them full of lusty life,
Last eve in beauty's circle proudly gay,
The midnight brought the signal sound of strife,
The morn the marshalling in armsthe day
Battle's magnificently-stern array!
The thunder-clouds close o'er it, which when rent,
The earth is covered thick with other clay
Which her own clay shall cover, heaped and pent
Rider and horsefriend, foein one red burial blent.
Byron
.
The next day was one of terrible importance
to the people of Wyoming. It brought against
them the combined forces of their unfeeling
enemies. Flushed with victory, and breathing
denunciations of desolation and ruin on the
hitherto
flourishing settlements of this fair valley, the
fierce Mohawks and merciless tories, swept along
in their march from the fort of Wintermoot to that
of Wyoming, without meeting any opposition.
The country indeed was deserted before them.
Men, women and children,the cattle, and all
kinds of easily transported property, had been
hurried off to places of security. In their hasty
flight, however, the fugitives had unavoidably
left much valuable property behind. This, it
is not to be supposed, was spared by the
invaders
.
Every dwelling was pillaged, and
whatever
could not be removed or was not thought
worthy of removal, was destroyed. The
plundered
P 2
houses were subjected to the flames, and
even the fences of the fields were vengefully
and wantonly demolished.
At length the drums and trumpets of the
tories
,
and the terrifying war-whoop of the
savages
,
were heard by the garrison of Wyoming,
and the alarmed multitude of women, children,
aged and infirm under its protection. Every
disposition that judgment and zeal could
suggest
towards an effective defence was adopted
by the Governor and his military coadjutor
Colonel Dennison. Their men were divided
between them, and each took his station at a
separate wing of the entrenchment, in order
to repel the enemy from whatever part it
should be assaulted. Upon two sides only
could the fort be easily attacked, and to these
was the defence now chiefly directed.
The assailing force was also divided into two
bodies, the savages and the tories, being ranged
under their respective leaders, Brandt and
Butler
.
The tories were the first that made the
assault. They advanced toward the moveable
bridge, but found that it was drawn up against
the gate of the parapet. They retired, and in
the course of half an hour constructed a frame
of light timber. This they intended to throw
over the ditch which was now full of water.
In approaching to make the attempt they were
saluted with such an effective volley of
musquetry
from the Governor's division that they
could not accomplish their design. They
withdrew, greatly chagrined, with the loss of
nearly a hundred men.
In the meantime the savages had dragged
forward, as near to the fort as they could with
safety approach, a large quantity of rubbish and
timber torn from the houses of the village, in
order to fill the ditch in a quarter where they
thought the entrenchment assailable. But here
they also met with such a warm reception
from the walls as obliged them to desist, after
the destruction of about fifty of their warriors.
Butler and Brandt now held a consultation.
These pale-faced rebels, said the latter,
fight like furies. How shall we penetrate
their strong-hold? To approach it on any side
is destruction.
It is an unexpected resistance, said
Butler
.
We must use artifice. Let us
withdraw
our men from the reach of danger, and
then deliberate.
The attack was suspended, and the chiefs
conferred together.
The rebels manage their affairs better than
I expected, said Butler. They know the
strength of their position, and they have
availed
themselves of it with much spirit. It is in
vain to exert our force against them while thus
sheltered. We cannot reach their ramparts,
otherwise we might scale them. But our
musketry produces on them no effect, while
theirs, whenever we approach near enough
thins our ranks in the most murderous manner.
Cannon we have none. If we had, the state of
affairs would be different,this consultation
would not be required. We have the choice
of two measuresto besiege, and endeavour
to starve them into a surrender, or to allure
them out of their strong-hold either by fair
promises or pretended flight. Which shall
we adopt?
A siege is tedious, replied Brandt. I
love action. My heart rejoices in the
excitement
of strife. But flight is shameful. Are
we vanquished that we must leave the field to
the victors?
No, said Butler. We are not
vanquished
.
We shall not flywe shall only
retire
to a better position. I dislike the
tediousness
and dulness of a siege as much as
thou. The delay might frustrate all our
designs
.
The rebels are in daily expectation of
succours from their great army. We must
subdue them soon, and possess their fortified
places, or we shall not be able to withstand the
force that may be sent against us. A siege,
therefore, will not answer. But, brother, are
thy people not expert at stratagems? Do ye
not love the animating variety of dextrous
manuvres, ambuscades, rapid marches,
surprises
and sudden actions in war? Are such
not the favourite pastimes of true warriors, who
shun no toil and dread no danger?
Brother, replied Brandt, thou art
skilful
.
Thou hast spoken truth. My people
glory in the manuvres of war. The rapid
march, the silent ambush, and the clamorous
battle are changes that delight them. Exert
thy wisdomlet thy cunning dictate. I and
my people will obey thee.
Butler being satisfied with this assurance,
took his measures accordingly. He first sent
a message to the garrison summoning it to
surrender
,
offering them terms more favourable
than he had any intention of fulfilling. The
Governor was inclined to accede to these terms;
but the other leaders were averse to them,
and he was overruled. They insisted that it
would be folly to trust to the professions of so
treacherous a character as Butler, whom no
treaties could bind. Besides, the terms now
offered being only personal safety, and the
guarantee of certain property under the
obligation
of never again resisting British authority,
were such as became conquerors only to
propose
to the vanquished. But their enemies
were not conquerors; nay, thus far, they were
themselves the victors in the strife. In fine,
the terms were rejected, and Butler hastened
to adopt other measures.
During the attack which had taken place,
Mr. Norwood, who was entrusted with the
maintenance of quiet and regularity in the
interior
of the barracks, where those unfit to
assist
in the defence were collected, had found
abundant exercise for all his fortitude as a man
and his influence as a divine. The ferocity of the
Indian character, had, by the repetition of a
thousand tales, made a deep impression on the
minds of the women and children. The very
name of Brandt was terrifying to them. It
was connected in their minds with all that was
terrible in savage cruelty or dreadful in human
suffering. Nor was the name of Butler, at this
time, much less appalling than that of his
barbarous
confederate. The atrocities committed
under his sanction at fort Wintermoot had
struck them with dismay, for they felt that if
they should fall into his hands, they might
expect
nothing but a similar fate. Lamentations
and cries, and prayers to Heaven for
protection
,
filled every apartment occupied by these
unfortunate people, during the whole
continuance
of the firing produced by the action that
had taken place. In the work of consolation
and encouragement, Mr. Norwood was zealous
and active, and he had two assistants whose
zeal and activity were little inferior to his own.
These were his daughter and her friend Mary
Watson. Their own hearts were torn with
anxiety and terror. But they lost not their
presence of mind. They concealed the
agitation
which they could not overcome; and,
hastening from one group to another of their
terrified companions, they soothed their alarms
and diffused among them at least a portion of
that courage which they themselves so nobly
exerted.
As soon as the firing ceased, and it was
ascertained that their enemies were beaten off,
the joy and gratitude which pervaded all hearts
were equal to the alarm and despair they had
before experienced. Praises and blessings,
loudly expressed and earnestly felt, were
showered
upon their brave defenders. Mothers
pressed their sons to their bosoms, daughters
their fathers, sisters their brothers, and wives
their husbands, with all that ecstacy of delight
and thankfulness with which they would have
hailed their restoration from the dead. After
the first ebullition of joy had subsided, and
tranquillized feelings permitted their thoughts
to arise to the Author of all good, Mr.
Norwood
assembled them in the open space
between
the barrack and the ramparts, and
publicly
offered up to Heaven grateful
acknowledgments
for the protection they had
experienced
,
and earnest entreaties, if it were
consistent
with the Divine will, that it might be
continued until their enemies should no longer
seek their destruction.
Intelligence that their enemies were retiring
from before the fort, soon added to their
satisfaction
.
Scouts were despatched to watch the
proceedings, and if possible ascertain the
intensions
of the retiring foe. It was in a short
time ascertained that the tories and the Indians
had separated, and marched off in different
directions
.
Many supposed or rather hoped,
from this circumstance, that some
misunderstanding
had arisen between these confederates,
and if so, that the enterprises of either against
their settlement, if continued, would be easily
resisted and overthrown.
While the minds of the people, in the fort,
were occupied with these and other
conjectures
relative to the present aspect of their
affairs, one of the scouts who had been taken
prisoner by the tories, and was released by the
order of Butler, after experiencing from the
latter much unexpected kindness, returned to
the garrison. He reported to the Governor
that Butler was heartily tired of his alliance
with the Indians, on account of their ferocious
cruelty at Fort Wintermoot, as well as the
general obstinacy of their character, which
prevented
him from being able to restrain their
excesses, or even to direct their military force
to any useful purpose. The scout also stated,
that besides giving him this information,
Butler
had requested him to acquaint the Governor
of Wyoming with his desire to enter into
arrangements
by which their differences might be
reconciled, and peace restored to the settlement.
What we ardently wish to be true, we are
extremely ready to believe. The Governor
was, therefore, much disposed to credit this
statement of his kinsman's wishes. There were,
notwithstanding the known perfidy of Butler's
character, many circumstances which
countenanced
the supposition that he was sincere in
this instance. The scout, who had conversed
with him, seemed fully convinced of his
sincerity
.It
was believed that he had witnessed
cruelties enough to render him sick of such
scenes; he had been worsted in his attempt upon
their fort, and might begin to feel hopeless of
success in his designs; and above all, he had
found his savage allies so intractable that he had
been obliged to separate from them. Why
might he not, therefore, be desirous of a
reconciliation
Q
with his former friends who had treated
him with much kindness, and with whom he
had lived in tranquillity and ease.
These reasons operated on the minds of many
besides the Governor. But Mr. Norwood,
Colonel Dennison, and Dr. Watson, placed no
confidence in them. They expressed their
conviction that the professions of Butler were
totally false, and that they were intended
merely as a lure to facilitate the execution of
some stratagem, against which it would be
proper
diligently to guard. They, however,
believed
that, with due vigilance, his sincerity
might be put to the test, without any risk on
their part. Since so many of their friends,
therefore, were desirous to open the door for a
reconciliation, which might put an end to such
a barbarous and unnatural war, they would
throw no opposition in the way of any prudent
and honourable effort to effect so desirable an
object. But they trusted that if a negociation
were opened with the tories while they
continued
to form an armed force, the utmost
circumspection
should be used to prevent any surprise,
or the gaining of any undue advantage in a
military
respect, by enemies so unprincipled and
unfeeling.
It was, at length, determined that the same
individual who made the report relative to
Butler's
wishes, should return to him and ascertain
on what terms he would disband his forces and
accept of the forgiveness and friendship of the
people of Wyoming, who were, even yet, willing
to overlook all his hostility, and restore to him
their former protection and kindness. The
messenger
soon returned with Butler's answer,
which was, that if the Governor and any
number
of his friends would meet him at an
appointed
place, they would confer together, and,
no doubt, speedily agree upon terms.
This reply was certainly vague and
unsatisfactory
.
It strengthened the doubts of those
who had suspicions of Butler's intentions.
Why should he want the Governor and his
friends to leave their place of security, and
meet him in a situation where, it was evident
they could have no other guarantee for their
safety than his word. Was it not mockery in
him to pretend that he expected they would
rely on the promise or the honour of one who
had already so egregiously deceived them, and
had proved so bitterly their enemy? Yet the
fond hope of bringing the distressing state of
their affairs to a termination could not be slightly
abandoned, and some risk might well be
incurred
for the attainment of such an object.
It was therefore agreed that the Governor,
Colonel Dennison, and Mr. Austin, should
proceed
to the place appointed. But as it was thought
imprudent for them to go without protection,
they were accompanied by upwards of three
hundred
and fifty men well armed, comprising, with
the exception of about sixty soldiers, the whole
force of the garrison. The fort was entrusted to
the care of Dr. Watson and Mr. Norwood, the
former being invested with the military, and
the latter, if we may so term it, with the civil
command which required the performance of
but few more duties than he had hitherto
discharged
.
The Governor and his party marched out of
the fort in high hopes and joyous spirits,
anticipating
a speedy and prosperous return with
their repentant and submissive enemy. When
they had proceeded nearly a mile, they perceived
the enemy's flag about a furlong before them at
a bend of the road. They hastily pushed
forward
in order to overtake it; but it receded
as they advanced, continuing for a considerable
time at nearly the same distance from them,
without any accompanying force in view, even
he, who bore it, being but seldom visible. At
length it stopped at the entrance of a defile.
Colonel Dennison, who strongly suspected
treachery, had just advised the Governor to
follow
,
what he called a deluding meteor, no
further
.
The Governor was about taking his
advice, and retracing his steps to the fort, when
the stationary appearance of an unprotected
hostile flag at such a short distance from him,
induced him to advance toward it. When the
Wyoming party reached the entrance of the
defile, the flag suddenly disappeared. But
further
in advance a white flag was perceived,
which soon began to approach. They awaited
its arrival. The man who carried it stated, that
Butler felt unwilling to subject himself to the
hazard of an interview with the Governor
while attended by so large a party of armed
men personally hostile to him. He proposed
that, if the Governor would select five or six of
his friends, Butler would select the same
number
of his own, and attended by these only, they
should meet at the bottom of a high cliff which
he pointed out about a quarter of a mile further
up the defile. In spite of the remonstrances of
Colonel Dennison, the Governor agreed to this
proposal. He left his men in charge of the
Colonel, and accompanied by Mr. Austin and
five others, proceeded to the place appointed.
Butler, with a small party, had reached the
ground a few minutes before them. They had
scarcely met, when the latter retired suddenly
from the group, and sounded a small horn.
Instantly
a band of about twenty men, who had
been concealed in an adjoining hollow, rushed
Q 2
upon the Governor and his friends. They made
a brave resistance until four of them were killed,
among whom was Mr. Austin. The Governor
and another named Dorance, who held the rank
of captain, were taken prisoners. But the
latter
was so badly wounded that he died shortly
afterwards.
On perceiving the attack thus treacherously
made upon their friends, Colonel Dennison and
his whole force hastened forward to rescue them
or avenge their fate. They had proceeded but
a short way, when they perceived at some
distance
up a narrow rugged ravine in the hill on
their right, a flag which they conceived to be
the fatal one that had decoyed them into this
snare; but their anxiety to save their friends,
whose lives were, before their eyes, so
perfidiously
assailed, induced them to hurry forward
without stopping to revenge the injury it had
done them. So rapid indeed was their approach
that they succeeded in rescuing the Governor;
his assailants hastily disappearing behind the
rock at the base of which the assault had taken
place. On advancing to this spot, however,
the Wyoming soldiers were struck with
consternation
to behold the whole tory force
issuing
from the midst of a dark glen, to attack
them. They had scarcely time to form their
ranks, which had been broken by the rapidity
of their advance, when their hearts were
appalled
by the sound of the dreadful savage
war-whoop
,
which awoke the trembling echoes of
the hills behind them. They turned, and saw
the ferocious warriors of Brandt rushing
impetuously
forward to attack them. These savages
had been lying in ambush in the defile where
the Wyoming troops, on passing to the aid of
the Governor, saw the flag which they
supposed
had ensnared them into their present
appalling
situation. Appalling, indeed, was that
situation. A well armed band of royalists, at
least three times their number, was close
upon
them on the one side, while an infuriate
force of red warriors had already attacked them
on the other. There was little time for
deliberation
,
but what there was, the Governor and
Colonel Dennison improved to the best
advantage
.
Their force was divided into two parties.
The Governor, at the head of the one which
was somewhat most numerous, waited the onset
of the tories, while Dennison led the other to
attack the savages. The Governor had not to
wait long. In a few minutes, a volley from the
tories levelled about one fourth of his
party
to the earth. Their companions, however,
avenged them by a destructive fire upon the
assailants, which for some moments checked
their approach. But it was only for some
moments
;
for soon an overwhelming torrent of
bayonets rushed into the midst of their ranks,
and consigned them to one general doom
indiscriminate, unsparing destruction. Cries
for quarterentreaties for mercy, addressed by
name to those who had received kindness, many
and great, from the imploring victims, were
totally
disregarded on this dreadful day, by men
who had hearts harder than tigers and more
unnatural than fiends.
Scarcely a remnant of the Governor's party
escaped this terrible slaughter. He himself,
for some time, fought bravely, and brought
several of his assailants to the ground. He
soon, however, perceived all to be lost in this
quarter, and hastened with about thirty men,
who followed him, to reinforce Colonel
Dennison
,
who was making head gallantly against
the Indians. On reaching the Colonel's party,
the governor exclaimed
All's lost abovethe tories have
slaughtered
our friends; they are hastening upon
ourselves
.
Our only chance is, with desperation,
to cut our way through the midst of the
savages
.
On! my brave men! and as many as
survive, fly to the fort, lest it, too, fall into the
hands of the unmerciful!
Dashing on, he lead the way. Colonel
Dennison
followed, and their whole band rushed to
the same point. The astonished savages were
either overthrown or fell back before them.
But the inveterate and victory-flushed tories
were dealing death upon their rear, and the
thunder of the savage rifles, rolling upon them
from all directions, also dealt destruction at
every step. About forty only succeeded in
escaping from this fatal defile. They
hastened
to the fort; the sad remnant of that gallant
band of nearly four hundred patriot soldiers
who had so recently left it in sanguine hopes
and joyous spirits.
CHAPTER XV.
Auria's self is now but one wide tomb
For all its habitantswhat better grave?
What worthier monument?Oh, cover not
Their blood, thou earth! nor ye, ye blessed souls
Of heroes and of murdered innocents,
O never let your everlasting cries
Cease round th' eternal throne, till the Most High
For all these unexampled wrongs, hath given
Full, overflowing vengeance.
Southey
.
Alas! how horror-struck were the
disconsolate
inhabitants of Wyoming, when the
melancholy
relics of their late band of brave
defenders
returned to that fortress which was
now their last asylum. Where were now the
near and dear relatives, the fathers, sons,
brothers
,
husbands and lovers, to whom so many
heartfelt thanks had that morning been given,
and for whom so many earnest prayers had
been offered? Ye bereaved mothers, and ye
orphans and ye widows, cold now are the
manly hearts that, but a few hours since, beat
so warmly to your ardent pressure; and those
ears which drank in, with so much rapture,
the glowing praises and fervent blessings
which ye showered upon them, are now deaf
to all sounds. From neither friendship nor love
can those clay-cold bosoms, late so generous
and joyous, now experience any pleasing
emotion
.
The blooming cheek is now pale; the
sparkling eye is dim; motionless is the heart
of ardour, and nerveless is the arm of strength.
And ye survive those dear objects! Alas!
unhappily
for yourselves, ye survive them. Ye
are in sorrow; ye are miserable. Sorrow can
approach them no more. Their trials are over;
they are happy! Yes, they are all happy; for
the barbarity of their foes has not permitted a
wounded one to survivethe work of death has
been carefully, coolly, and effectually
accomplished
upon them all. Oh! ye mourners, do
your hearts long for the same fate! Alas!
what is life, when those who constituted
its charm are no more? And within the
walls of the fort of Wyoming many a heart,
during that dismal night, (for night had now
come on,) would have given a sincere welcome
to the blow of the Indian tomahawk or the
thrust of the tory bayonet which would have
terminated their grief, and sent them to join,
in the realms of spirits, the beloved ones of
whom they had been so cruelly bereaved.
Colonel Dennison was now invested with
the command of the small garrison, whose task
it was to defend the fort and preserve from
destruction the hundreds of helpless and
innocent
beings who had made it their place of
refuge
.
The governor, on escaping from the
fatal defile, had refused to enter the fort.
You are, said he to Colonel Dennison,
better fitted for the command than I. My
unhappy credulity has been the sole cause of
the terrible disaster that has befallen my
friends. I am mortified; I am grieved almost
to heart-breaking, to think of the fatal
infatuation
which induced me, in spite of your
judicious counsel, to place confidence in the
assurances
of a wretch so perfidious, so utterly
wicked. I will not enter the fort. I could
not look upon the faces of those whom my
obstinate
folly has reduced to such a state of
danger
and distress. Your coolness, your wisdom,
your intrepidity will do more to save them, if
there is yet for them any means of safety, than
any power or effort of mine. Yet I will not
desert their cause; I will hasten to the districts
on the Delaware. I will implore the people
there to hurry to your aid; and, if I cannot
succeed, I will fly to the camp of Washington
himself, and entreat assistance. Alas! it may
then be too late to assist you. But if so, I will
avenge youGod protect and bless you! said
he; and the tears rushed to his eyes, as he
shook Colonel Dennison by the hand. He
then mounted a horse which was brought to
him from the fort, and rode off.
The tories and their allies did not advance
towards the fort that evening. They had,
during
the day, performed abundance of fatiguing
work. Besides the labour of the severe battle
they had fought, they had gone through the
barbarous toil of despatching the wounded and
despoiling the dead, upon all of whom the
scalping-knife
had performed its horrid office, and
the diabolical Brandt added, that day, the
integuments
of more than three hundred human
heads to the number of his former trophies of
conquest and massacre. They encamped in
the vicinity of the fatal field, and after their
customary carousal in celebration of victory,
they sunk exhausted into a supine and heavy
state of repose. But the garrison of the fort
was too weak, and, perhaps, too much
disheartened
to take advantage of this defenceless
condition
of the enemy.
This melancholy night was spent by Agnes
Norwood in a state of the most intense and
restless anxiety. At the first intelligence of
the disasters of the day, poignant grief
overcame
every other feeling. But the
exhortations
of her father, and the exemplary
fortitude
of Mary Watson, contributed much to
restore her to a state of pious submission to
the awful dispensation that had taken place;
and although the terrors of destruction seemed
to accumulate so thickly around her, as to
exclude
from her view every hope of deliverance,
R
yet she would not resign herself to despair nor
withdraw her confidence in the overruling
goodness of the Most High. Her attention
was, indeed, soon so entirely absorbed by the
wretchedness of her friend Isabella Austin, the
only sister of her Henry, who, on first
hearing
of the death of her father, became so
overpowered
with grief, that she had to be carried,
in a state of insensibility, to her bed-chamber.
When she recovered from this, she wept
bitterly
for some time, and then relapsed into
stupefaction. Towards the morning, she was
seized with several fits of frenzy, during which
she frequently exclaimed, that she beheld the
ungrateful Butler in the act of murdering her
father!
Ha! she would cry, see, see! oh! save
him! The horrid steel pierces his heart.
Ungrateful
Butler! He was your best friend. How
could you do such a deed! Oh! for my sake,
could you not have spared him!
She would then laugh deliriously, and sink
again into stupefaction. Agnes and Miss
Watson
became alternately the nurses of the poor
sufferer, and in the intensity of her grief,
almost
forgot their own.
The morning arose with the brightness usual
in July. The night-clouds fled, and the
advancing
sun came forward joyously and in
smiles, as if he were that day to witness no
scene of calamity and suffering on the earth
which he illuminated. Colonel Dennison, at
an early hour, mustered the whole strength of
his garrison, and found that it scarcely
numbered
a hundred men. This was but a small
force, with which to contend against that which
he expected soon to assail him. They were
zealous, however, and determined to defend
the place to the last extremity. To propose a
capitulation, they knew to be folly. The
garrison
of Fort Wintermoot they remembered,
had received to the request which they made to
Butler to be informed of what treatment they
might expect if they surrendered, the reply
which has since become so famous for its
laconic
ferocity of the hatchet! Their
prospects
of making a successful defence were, it
is true, hopeless. But making such defence
would not render their fate more certain or
more severe. Massacre would inevitably
follow
submission; nothing worse could follow
resistance. Besides, in resistance there was
one chance; that of protracting their fate, until,
perhaps, the succour which was daily expected,
might arrive. This, indeed, was literally a
forlorn hope. Their utmost efforts could not
be supposed capable of resisting the force of
their numerous enemies for many hours. They
were, however, too brave to despair; and with
the firmness of devoted martyrs, they calmly
awaited the approach of the expected foe.
How terrible to the reflecting mind is such
an interval of suspense! In the hurry of
battle
there is an excitement of mind which
silences
the emotions of fear; and nerves which,
in moments of tranquillity, would tremble at
the contemplation of approaching doom, in the
actual struggle with that doom, become
animated
to a defiance, and indurated to an
endurance
of its uttermost extremity.
At length the music of warlike instruments,
floating at first so weakly as scarcely to seem
to agitate the distant air, became every
moment
louder and louder, until the neighbouring
woods shook, and the walls of the fort itself
reverberated with the sounds. The
blood-stained
banner of toryism soon appeared
issuing
from the surrounding forest; and Butler and
Brandt, with the whole strength of their
sanguinary
followers, drew up before the devoted
fort, which they soon made arrangements to
attack.
The fire of the small garrison succeeded for
some time in keeping the assailants at a
respectful
distance. But it was not sufficient
long to guard the entrenchments at every point
from numbers so superior. A party of the
tories succeeded in filling the ditch, near its
northern angle, with rubbish, which rendered
it passable. In various other places repeated
attempts
to accomplish the same object had been
made by the besiegers, which were foiled by
the unremitting exertions of the garrison. To
the place which was now rendered passable,
the assailants soon directed their chief efforts.
The garrison rushed to prevent their wall from
being scaled there. The besiegers drew back.
But many other points being now undefended,
at several of them the trench was also soon
rendered passable. At one of these, Butler
resolved to make an effective attempt, cost
what it would, to scale the walls, and take the
place by storm. As he was leading on a choice
body of men for this purpose, his attention and
the attention of all, both in and out of the
garrison
,
were suddenly attracted to an apparition
upon the rampart opposite to him, of a
beautiful
young woman with her white garments
flowing loosely around her, her dark brown
hair streaming wildly in the air, her face pale,
her eyes rolling, and her hands stretched
towards
Heaven. It was Isabella Austin. She had
unexpectedly rushed from her chamber, and
with the energy and fleetness of a maniac, while
the attention of her friends was directed towards
the advancing foe, she ascended the parapet,
R 2
looked wildly around herthen fixing her
view upon Butler, she exclaimed:
Ha! he is there! Heaven, have mercy!
a murderer!my beloveddid ye not know
I loved you? Yet ye killed him! My father
Oh! Heaven, think of the deed! The old
man was kind.Ha!the thunderbolt! it has
struck my brain. Terrible man! thou art
accurst. My love will not save thee. Fiends!
fiends!yes, there he ishe is a murderer
Oh! God! must I fly to the arms of a
murderer
!
Uttering the last words, she sprang from the
wall towards Butler, and as she descended, a
random ballfor even this heart-rending
spectacle
had not produced an entire cessation of
the firingpassed through her heart. An
exclamation
of horror burst from the defenders
of the fort. One volley they fired with
desperate
precision upon their enemies, which
levelled about fifty of them to the ground. But
it was their last volley. Before they could
reload
,
Butler and his inhuman followers were
within the ramparts, furiously employed in the
work of destruction.
Butler, in the midst of this affray, became
anxious to obtain possession of Agnes, lest she
might fall a victim to the savages, who he knew,
had resolved on a general massacre, and who
were now surmounting the entrenchments in
all directions. Seeing Colonel Dennison
engaged
with a soldier, he ordered the latter to
desist.
Your life, Colonel, said he, shall be
granted on one condition. You see it is
useless
to resist. Let me have your sword.
Name your condition first, said the
Colonel. It must be such as an honourable
man can accept, or I shall die sword in hand.
It is only to lead me to Mr. Norwood and
his daughter, that I may save them, said
Butler
.
No time is to be lostthe Indians may
in another moment, defeat my intention.
You are right, replied Dennison. I
surrendertake my swordfollow me!
In a few moments they had penetrated the
mingled mass of destroyers and victims, and
reached the chamber where Mr. Norwood and
his daughter,and Dr. Watson and his sister, were
calmly awaiting that expected death which they
were determined to share together. On
entering
the apartment, Butler, looking at Agnes,
exclaimed,
I am fortunate!You are yet safe. But
you must be taken hence. These walls are
doomed to destruction!
He then called, from the window, to
Bateman
,
one of his partizans, who has been
already
mentioned as enrolling the tories in the
Hemlock Glade, to bring forward the company
he commanded. He was speedily obeyed.
Captain Bateman, said he, here are
five prisoners. Their safety is of importance
to me. I charge you with it. Conduct them
to Mr. Norwood's house. I will join you there
as soon as our business here is completed.
Agnes and Miss Watson, Mr. Norwood, Dr.
Watson, and Colonel Dennison, were thus
snatched, like brands from amidst a mass of
flaming destruction, by the influence which the
charms of the former had over the savage
heart of a ruffian who was destitute of every
other tender feeling save that of love.Love!
ah! nolet not the name of the sweetest and
purest, and most disinterested of feelings be
profaned by being applied to the gross and
selfish, and sensual passion which actuated the
heart of Butler the destroyer of Wyoming
A detailed description of the terrible
carnage
that was now committed on the
defenceless
inmates of the fort, by the merciless
victors
of this bloody day, would present too
horrible
a picture of human suffering and human
depravity, to be endured by any reader of
sensibility
.
The monster Brandt seemed to be in
his natural element, when wading through the
currents of fresh-flowing blood that filled the
yard of the fortress which was made the
butchering
place of the victims. As each victim
received the mortal stroke, he rushed upon the
body, while yet writhing in the agonies of
death, and with his own knife dissected, with
a fiendish delight, from the warm skull, the
scalp which added one more trophy to those
horrid memorials of vengeful victory of which
he was so proud. The number of these
memorials
to which he had limited his ambition was
on this occasion completed.
I have now a thousand scalps! said he to
Butler. I have had a full harvest of
revenge
.
The people of my tribe will extol me.
I shall be called Brandt the successfulthe
destroyer
of white men!I am satisfied!
The carnage being over, the dead were
stripped
of every thing valuable. They were then
dragged into the principal building of the fort,
which after being pillaged, was set on fire
along with the adjoining edifices. The smoke
and flames soon ascended to the clouds, and
struck new terror into the hearts of the
disconsolate
prisoners at Mr. Norwood's; for too
well they knew that the awful conflagration
which they beheld was the funeral pile of
slaughtered hundreds of their friends and
neighbours.
CHAPTER XVI.
If she will smile I'll woo her like the dove,
Soft, fond and tender every word shall be;
But should she frown repulsive on my love,
The tiger's amorous rage shall reign in me;
Horror and dread shall drive her to my arms,
And with infuriate love, I'll seize upon her charms.
Harley
.
Butler did not interrupt the sorrowful
meditations
of Agnes for that night. He wished
to render himself as little odious to her as
possible
.
By treating her and her friends with
kindness and delicacy, he hoped to remove her
unfavourable impressions of him, and in some
degree, at least, ingratiate himself into her
esteem
.
The vehemence of his passion,
however
,
would not permit him long to defer his
attempts to gain her to his purpose. He
visited
her the next day.
Miss Norwood, said he, I truly rejoice
that you and your father were yesterday rescued
from the unsparing hands of the savages. This
is twice I have had the happiness of rendering
you such service. May I claim some portion
of gratitude for my efforts?
If your general conduct were such, said
she, as to warrant my yielding you any
esteem
,
I would freely acknowledge gratitude.
For the particular services of which you speak,
however, receive my thanks. But beware lest
you conceive them to be thanks accompanied
by any other feeling than horror at the
numberless
deeds of cruelty of which you have
been guilty.
My fair reprehender, he replied, thou
only utterest such sentiments as I expected.
Thy reproach, therefore, does not offend me.
But dost thou not consider the circumstances
that have influenced my conduct, and, in spite
of myself, compelled me to act as I have done.
My conscience is hostile to the rebel cause. My
father was murdered by the whigs. I was
denounced
by them. I fought them often. I have
triumphed over them, and been triumphed over
by them. They have put me into prison; they
have doomed me to death. How I was
rescued
thou hast heard.
Ha! ungenerous man! said she,
interrupting
him, the faithful maid to whom thou
didst owe thy rescue, has been killed by thy
cruelty. Thou didst desert her; she pined in
secret, but reproached thee not. At length,
her reason gave way before the pressure of
calamity
and grief inflicted by thee, for thou didst
slay her father.
Fair Agnes! said he, thou art wrong. I
did not. Another slew him in the scuffle!
But thy treachery ensnared him to
destruction
.
Poor Isabella! she is no more. She
died awfully insane, the victim of thy
ingratitude
and thy crimes!
I grieve for her death, for she loved me.
But if I could not love her, am I to blame? For
a time I tried to love her, and thought I had
succeeded. But I saw you, and found I was
mistaken. The soft regardperhaps I should
rather call it, the petty fondnessI felt for
her, bore no comparison, in intensity, to the
all-absorbing passion I feel for you. Had I
never seen you, perhaps, I might not have been
ungrateful to her. To your charms alone has
my ingratitude been owing. Can you blame
me for this?
Thy love for me! she exclaimed. Oh,
thou deceitful and barbarous man, I am truly
unfortunate in being the object of thy love.
Alas! if thou wouldst acquire any portion of my
regard, talk not to me of love. I cannot hear
thee without loathing.
Fair Agnes, he replied, dost thou not
know love to be an involuntary impulse? If I
could have compelled myself to love Isabella, I
might then have been justly charged with
ingratitude
.
If I could now refrain from loving
thee, thou mightest properly reproach me for
cherishing a feeling thou wilt not, perhaps canst
not, returnthou mightest rightly reprimand
me for troubling thee with a subject which thou
loathest. Oh! Agnes, if thou wert mine, thy
virtues would chase away my vices. I would
become what thou shouldst choose to make me.
But without thee, I feel I can never be
virtuous
I
can never be happy.
This is rhapsodyit is delusion, she
replied
.
Thou dost not want strength of mind.
Struggle to win the victory over thy bad
passions
.
It will be the most glorious thou hast
ever gained, and will afford thee more
satisfaction
than any triumph whether of successful
war or prosperous ambition.
Thou dost throw away thy counsel, my
lovely adviser, said he, looking fondly on her
countenance, which animated by her subject,
had brightened, during her observations, into a
most beautiful glow. By heaven, I would
not resign my love for thee for an empire! It
is the sweetest sensation that ever animated my
frame. At this moment it sweeps through my
veins with a thrill of delight, which I would not
forfeit for the riches of the Indies.Thou must
be mine, I tell thee, ere long, or perdition shall
seize us both!Till to-morrow think of the
fervour of my passion. I must leave thee till
then.
He had heard the sound of a bugle which
was the signal for a joint-muster of the Indians
S
and tories, in order to perform some military
manuvres previous to a carousal they were to
hold in the afternoon, in celebrating their late
decisive victories. On such celebrations, it was
the practice of the Mohawks to sacrifice some
prisoners to the manes of their slain warriors.
But so complete had been the previous day's
slaughter in the fort, that no prisoners had been
made, except those who fell, as we have seen,
into the hands of Butler. This barbarous part
of their ceremonies, therefore, the Indians had
no means of performing unless Butler should
give up some of his prisoners for the purpose.
Brandt made an application to this effect. But
Butler's design of conciliating Agnes prevented
him from complying. He reminded Brandt
that the glory of obtaining so large a number of
scalps as he now possessed, more than
compensated
for the want of prisoners; and that, as to
the few he had himself taken, he considered
he was well entitled to the entire disposal of
them, especially as he had not interfered with
the operations of Brandt in securing as many
scalps as he had thought proper. He also
observed
that had the Mohawks been less eager
to seize upon these trophies of victory, they
would not have destroyed all their enemies
upon the spot, and might now have been in
possession of many prisoners. Brandt
acquiesced
in the propriety of these remarks, and
the captives of Butler were permitted to
remain
solely at his own disposal.
During the carousal, or, as the Indians
termed
it, the Feast of Victory, on this occasion,
every species of riot and debauchery was
indulged
in to excess. To describe a scene of such
frantic folly and disgusting dissipation, would
be to give a representation of human depravity
and degradation, neither agreeable to write
nor desirable to read. While in a state of
intoxication
,
an altercation, as was to have been
expected, took place between some of the
Indians
and the tories, which the interference of
their chiefs alone prevented from becoming
serious
and bloody. In consequence of this, it
was agreed by Butler and Brandt, that, while
the Indians remained in the Valley, they should
encamp at a distance from the tories, but not
so far off as to prevent the maintenance of
friendly intercourse, or a speedy junction in
case of either being attacked by an enemy.
On visiting Agnes the next day, Butler
approached
her with the self-satisfied air of a
wooer who thinks he can plead the merit of
having performed an action of a nature very
pleasing to his mistress.
My sweet Agnes, said he, you will not
consider me destitute of all claim upon your
esteem, when I inform you, that, but for my
exertions your fellow captives would have been
yesterday sacrificed by the savages in
conformity
with their ferocious customs. Do I merit
no portion of gratitude for saving them?
I do, indeed, she replied, and they too
must feel grateful to you for this.And oh!
if you were to conduct us to a place of safety
and restore us to liberty; abandon the wicked
schemes in which you are engaged; repent of
the crimes and the cruelties you have
committed
upon your own kindred and people; and
by your future conduct make some atonement
for themthen might you yet require respect
upon earth and forgiveness from Heaven.
Agnes, said he, I know that you think
me a villain, but I did not suppose that you
thought me a fool. Were I to do what you
say, and throw myself upon the mercy of the
whigs, in all the contrition of a sincere
penitent
,
would not the halter be my fate? My
father's death admonishes me not to trust my
enemies. I have avenged him amply, and,
therefore, my spirit rejoices in my career. But
I have no desire to become the victim of that
career, by trusting to the mercy of those to
whose friends I have shown none. No; I can
form no connexion with the rebelsI can
make no peace with them. But for thy sake,
fair charmer, I can, in future, be less virulent
in my resentmentless destructive in my
revenge
.
Nay, hear me further; if thou wilt
comply with my wishes, if thou wilt be mine,
I will set thy friends at liberty, I will
withdraw
from all scenes of strifeI will retire
to Canada or Europe, and though I will not
make peace with the rebels, I will no more lift
my hand against them. Say, fair Agnes, wilt
thou sign the treaty?
Sign a treaty to become thine! she
exclaimed
,
no; never! My reason forbids it,
my heart shrinks from it, and my vows render
it impossible. Expect it not, I entreat thee;
and if thou wouldst not make me utterly abhor
thee, persecute me no more with thy
applications
.
By Heaven, he ejaculated, I have been
patient long enough with this girl's obstinacy.
Maiden, I shall not be so easily baffled in my
wishes, as thou thinkest. Mine thou must be. I
find that the mild means of persuasion will not
prevail with thee. But thou art in my power
thy fatherthy friends are in my power. I can
bring forceterrortorture to my aid. I have
but to say the word, and they are borne to the
stake. By six this evening thou shalt consent
to be mine or they shalldie!
She heard the dreadful threat pronounced
S 2
with the tone, and accompanied by the looks
of a demon, and she knew he had daringness
and cruelty enough to perform it. Her
terrified
imagination overcame her fortitude. She
caught him as he was hastily retiring, and,
although
she felt as if even the touch of his
garment
were pollution, she clung to his arm in
an imploring attitude, and with a voice and
look of sorrow that would have softened a
fiend, Oh! if thy heart be human, she said,
have pity, pity on my wretchedness!
Have pity on thyself, he replied, have
pity on meon thy fatheron thy friends!
Reflect till six! So saying he left the room,
and under the impression that the persuasions
of Miss Watson, whose life depended on her
decision, might prevail on her to comply, he
ordered that young lady into her apartment.
He himself hastened to that of Mr. Norwood.
I come, said he, my reverend friend, on
an errand of much consequence to yourself, to
your daughter, and to all your fellow
prisoners
.
You know the violence of my love for
Agnes. You also know her obstinate antipathy
to me. She is in my power. I might seize
upon her charms by force. But my wishes are
for an honourable union with her. No
persuasions
of mine can induce her to consent.
Exert your authority. Should you succeed,
you and your friends shall be set at liberty. I
shall retire from the contest against the whigs,
and reside in tranquillity either in Canada or
England.
When I was formerly your prisoner
replied
Mr. Norwood, you obtained my
answer
to a similar proposal. My answer now
shall be the same that it was then; for my
mind is unchanged on the subject. I will not
comply with your wishes.
Then hear thy doom, foolish, obstinate
man, said Butler, in a tone of fierce
determination
and
the doom of thy captive friends
ye shall, should she not consent to save you,
be delivered up by the dawn to-morrow, to the
Mohawks, who, at noon, shall bind you to the
stake, and sacrifice you upon the flaming
faggots
,
according to the customs of their tribe!
When thou shalt have done that, cruel
man! said Mr. Norwood, thou shalt have
done thy worst. I pray to the gracious Power
who can disconcert all the designs of the
wicked
,
and into whose hands I commit my fate
and that of my friends, that, be our destiny
and that of my daughter what they may, he
will avert from her what I would deem the
most direful of all misfortunes, a union with
thee!
Rash man, replied Butler, foaming with
rage, it ill becomes thy prudence when under
the paw of the lion, to goad him to wrath; and
it is but a poor display of clerical sanctity to
convey reproof in the words of insolence. I
swear to thee, thou shalt soon be taught thy
own pulpit doctrine of repentance. Either that
doom, which seems to thee
the most direful of
misfortunes
, shall overtake theethy
daughter
shall be mineor thou shalt
die!
He pronounced the last word with a terrible
emphasis; and casting on Mr. Norwood the
scowl of a fiend, he hurried furiously from the
apartment.
At the threatened hour of six, the enamoured
tyrant waited on Agnes to ascertain her decision.
He dismissed Miss Watson sternly, for he
perceived
from the mixture of detestation and
defiance
with which she regarded him on his
entrance
,
that she had not been a very zealous
advocate for either his interest or her own.
And now, my fair one, said he, as he
closed the door after Miss Watson's departure,
I want to know whether thou hast decided
on peace or war, and art resolved that thy
father
and his friends shall live or die?
Alas! to what straits does thy cruelty drive
me! said she. If my own death will satisfy
thy barbarous wishes, Oh! I intreat thee to
inflict
it, and spare my unoffending parent and
thy other intended victims?
Thy death!Nonsense! he exclaimed
Thou dost trifle with me. I am serious. Thou
knowest that it is thy loveor thy person, if I
cannot have thy loveand not thy death that I
desire. Thy death! No; I would be miserable
if thou shouldst die before I possessed thee!
But now for thy decision? Wilt thou be mine,
or shall the victims die?
Hear me, she said, assuming a sudden
energy inspired by the utter hopelessness of her
situationUnhappy and inhuman tyrant, thou
mayest sacrifice those victims; but their death
shall avail thee nothing. Thine I never will
be. If they die, I shall die also. Their
destruction
and mine, shall only aggravate thy
crimes in the sight of God and men. It will
sink thy soul more deeply into perdition, and
render thy memory more accurst.
Ha! sorceress! he cried, dost thou too
speak the language of defiance? Well may a
sinner
like me be pardoned some rudeness when
holy men and gentle ladies can assume the tone
of violence and the language of menace. But,
fair one, I am made of materials too stern and
unyielding to be frightened by the denunciations
of a maiden's wrath, or even the curses of a
priest. I am master of thy destiny, and of the
fate of thy friends, and they shall be wielded
to suit my purpose. Since thy resolution is
taken
,
so is mine. I shall see you to-morrow at
ten!
He withdrew; his countenance expressing
the settled sternness of determined malignancy,
rather than the violence of irresolute rage.
CHAP. XVII.
How shall I woo her? she is obstinate
As well attempt the firin-set rocks to move
With the soft motion of the zephyrs wing,
As try persuasion on her. But the bolts
Launched by the red artillery of the sky
Can to their entrails rend the solid rocks:
And there's a thunder that can shake the mind,
Formed by the raging agony of terror:
With it I'll woo her till her heart be rent,
And moulded into trembling pliancy.
Harley
.
What a terrible night of hopeless sorrow did
Agnes Norwood spend in her lonely chamber!
She was in utter solitude, left a prey to her own
despairing thoughts without a counsellor or a
companion. Her tyrant had forbidden Miss
Watson to be again admitted to her, for he truly
conjectured that, disregarding all selfish
considerations
,
she had strengthened, by her influence
and arguments, the opposition of Agnes to his
wishes. He had, therefore, ordered her to be
elsewhere closely confined, and to prepare for
death the next day. Miss Watson heard her
sentence
with the calmest resignation. She felt
herself
a martyr in a just cause, and she determined
that her fortitude should not be overcome by
any consequence, however terrific, that should
arise from having done her duty. She had,
indeed
,
been always of a resigned and enduring
temper; and death had of late too frequently
appeared to her and threatened her in his most
hideous forms, for her to be now surprised if he
should overtake her at last. She had witnessed
the destruction of hundreds of beloved friends
and respected neighbours. It was by a miracle
that astonished herself, that she had hitherto
survived. She could not always expect such
a special interference of Providence. What
greater claim had she upon life than those who
had already fallen? She could not conceive of
any. To the dispensation, therefore, now
awarded her, she was resolved to submit as her
duty dictated, without repining and without
complaint.
The character of Agnes was not so stoical.
Her disposition was much more sensitive, yet
she was equally firm in her adherence to duty.
She had besides, causes of inquietude from which
her friend was exempt. The worst that could
happen to Miss Watson was death. She had
not, like Agnes, the fate of others in her hands.
No one could charge his suffering to her
obstinacy
.
But Agnes!dreadful consideration!
the life of even thy own father depends on thy
will! And wilt thou not save him?And thy
three other friendsare they to die too,
because
thou wilt not yield to the solicitations of
a man who would wed thee? Alas! it must be
so. Thou canst not break vows already made.
Thou art
the betrothed
of another, thy fidelity
to whom no accumulation of earthly calamities
can ever shake. To be unfaithful to him would
be to be unfaithful to Heaven and thy own
soulto be a traitor to thy own heart. It
cannot
be. Love, triumphant love assists thee
now in the terrible task that duty requires thee
to perform. The trial is severe, but thou art
firm. Thy sufferings are great, but thou wilt
endure without yielding to crimethy heart
may break, but it will not be false.
Towards the morning, as the sleepless sufferer
lay meditating on the horrors of her destiny, the
door, to which her eyes were directed, slowly
opened, and a soldier cautiously entered.
Perceiving
her awake, he approached, put a letter
into her hand, and whispered, when you read
this, destroy it, or it may destroy me. Your
father has paid me for delivering it. This will
be an awful day! I am sorry I can do no more
for either you or him.
He departed without giving her time to
reply
.
She opened the letter. There was
sufficient
day-light to enable her to read as follows.
My daughter, I tremble lest you should be
frightened into submission to the tyrant.
Remember
your vows of
betrothment
. They
are as sacred and binding as the vows of
marriage
T
itself. Let no peril nor calamity shake
your fidelity to them. Care nothing for me.
Let not my fate have the weight of a feather in
opposition to the obligation of your solemn
oath. I am resigned, my daughter, to the
death which awaits me. Why should I wish to
live, since I have witnessed the destruction of
my beloved friends and neighboursthe
zealous
hearers of the word of life which I
experienced
so much delight in delivering to them
the pious communicants of the cup of salvation
which I felt it so glorious a privilege to
distribute
among them. They are gone; I have
nothing
to do but to follow. To separate from thee,
my child, I confess, is a heavy affliction, but
it is not so heavy as would be the knowledge,
that thou wert degraded and criminal.
Perseverance
in virtue, on this awful occasion, is
the earnest and last injunctionand that the
Almighty may bless and protect thee for ever,
is the anxious prayerof thy father.
At ten o'clock, Butler, according to his
threat, visited her. A chance still remains
for thy friends, said he. Although I have
promised them to the Indians, and the
exulting
Brandt has all things prepared for their
execution, thou canst yet save them. Say only
that thou wilt be mine. I shall recall my
promise
to the Mohawks. I will relinquish their
confederacy, and fulfil every item of the
proposal
I have made to thee.
Thou dost tempt me in vain, she replied.
I will not be criminal; I will not break the
oath of my betrothment to Henry Austin,
though all the wicked and cruel powers of men
and fiends should conspire to accumulate
horrors
upon me for the refusal!
Thou hast named my rivalmy detested
rival! cried he. From thee his name comes
with a torturinga malignant influence. It
has sealed the doom of thy friends, and
converted
my wish to persuade, into a resolution
to compel thee.
At this moment, the music of the Dead
March, was heard. He knew its meaning.
He led her to the window. A melancholy
procession was approaching. She beheld it;
her heart sunkthe light left her eyesshe
became dizzy, and had she not hasted to a
seat, she would have fallen upon the floor.
She had seen the prisonersthose friends so
dear to her heart, bound and seated in a cart
her father and Miss Watson on the one side,
and Dr. Watson and Colonel Dennison on the
other, moving towards the place of execution.
Thou seest that I have made no empty
threats! said the tyrant, exultingly. I
perceive
thou dost pity the plight of those poor
victims of thy obstinacy. Wilt thou save them?
Shall I stop the death-going procession, and
restore those beloved ones, free and in safety,
to thy arms? Say only thou wilt be mine, and
this shall be done.
I cannotO! God forgive me! She
exclaimed
,
if I am wrongly obstinateobstinate
even to the destruction of my revered parent!
Save thy father! cried the tyrant. I
had resolved no more to entreat, but to
command
theeto force thee to yield. But
once more, for the sake of those victims, I
resort
to entreaty.
I am firm. Heaven has strengthened me,
she said with a tone and air of determination,
which aroused the wrath of the tyrant.
He exclaimed, be it so then, perverse girl!
They shall die, whilst thou shalt profit nothing.
Thou shalt even behold them sacrificed, that
thou mayst witness the firmness of my
resolves
.
Thy charms shall then be mine
without
more parley. Look upon that couch. Thou
shalt be brought back from the scene of death,
and therethere, while the cries of the sufferers
are still ringing in thy ears, shall thy charms
become mine. Thy consent I will ask not. I
have strength sufficient to seize upon
happiness
.I
shall riot on thy loveliness, until my
longing soul shall be satiated with beauty!
He ordered her sentinel to assist him in
conducting
her to a light wagon which was in
waiting. He placed her on a chair in this
vehicle
,
and seating himself beside her, they
followed
,
at a slow space, the melancholy
procession
already noticed, to the place appointed for
the dreadful sacrifice. They reached it in about
half an hour. It was a large field adjoining
a farm-house, the owners of which had been
slaughtered at the capture of the fort. The
house stood southward from the field, and
between
them was a small garden, overlooked by
a balcony. With a sternness of purpose and a
refinement of cruelty characteristic of his
infernal
mind, Butler conducted the trembling
Agnes to this balcony, that she might, in
pursuance
of his threats, witness the horrible
sacrifice
,
for the completion of which every thing
was now ready. He seated himself beside her,
and, with barbarous officiousness, pointed out
the arrangements of the scene.
The field rose in a gentle ascent towards the
north, on which side and on the east, it was
bounded by a wood of considerable thickness.
A small rivulet which flowed into the stream
of the Sharon, formed its border on the west.
Upon or near the bank of this rivulet, the
tories
had taken their station, as spectators,
leaving
to the Indians, the office of being the
performers
T 2
in the dreadful drama. The latter
were ranged near the centre of the field.
Immediately
in their front, between them and the
house, were placed, in a line, four large piles
of wood, about eight or ten yards asunder. To
a stake erected in the centre of each of these
piles, and projecting five or six feet above
them, was bound one of the victims. The piles
were intermixed with a quantity of dried leaves
and straw, plentifully besprinkled with tar,
in order to facilitate the kindling of the mass. A
burning pile which had been kindled somewhat
nearer the house, sent up to the air its mingling
volumes of flames and smoke, which
occasionally
bent their red and dusky streams towards the
prisoners, as if to familiarize them with their
fierceness ere they should envelope them in
their fatal folds. Round this burning pile stood
four Indians, of peculiarly fierce aspects, who
were appointed as executioners. They were
kindling the brands with which they were to
fire the combustible piles, upon which the
prisoners
were bound. This last act of
preparation
was, at length, completed, and these
ferocious
figures only awaited the signal which
Brandt, who stood near the balcony, was to
give, at the intimation of Butler, to perform
their horrid office.
A solemn silence pervaded the whole field
Every eye was fixed, with intense interest,
upon the innocent victims of barbarous
customs
and lawless and revengeful passions. A
heavy horror hung over the scene which
seemed
to paralyze motion and to diffuse melancholy
through all surrounding nature. At length the
demon of the mournful drama arose, and with a
smile of malignant triumph, looked first towards
the prisoners, then upon the horror-struck
fair-one
beside him. She was pale as sackcloth, her
lips quivered, her eyes were swollen, her
heart was faint; but her soul looked towards
Heaven, was fixed upon truth, and resolved on
an adherence to duty.
Fair-one, said the demon, look on thy
friends. The balance of their fate is suspended.
Life and death are in the scales. One word
from thee will make either preponderate. I
ask, for the
last
time, wilt thou be mine?
She raised her eyes towards Heaven, and
grasping with her whole soul at the unfailing
support of conscious rectitude, she committed
the issue of all to the protection of her Maker,
and firmly answeredNo!
The tyrant turned from her with fury
streaming from his eyes. He gave a signal to
Brandt, who instantly raised the death shout;
and the executioners, flourishing their flaming
brands in the air, were hastening to fire the
fatal piles, when a man, in the garb of a
prophet
,
bearing the consecrated wand of Manetto,
rushed impetuously from the woods, and
commanded
them to forbear.
Stand back! said he, Mohawks! In
the name of the Great Spirit, I charge you to
cast away your brands, and harm not the
innocent
at these stakes, on peril of the vengeance
of the Almighty!
The prophetic symbol which he displayed,
together with the boldness and energy of his
manner, and the awfulness of his words, were
successful. The executioners, and indeed all
the Indians who beheld him, except the
untameable
Brandt, respected the words of the
prophet, and feared the denunciation delivered
so impressively in the name of the Great
Spirit. Even Brandt felt tremulous at the
first appearance of the prophet. But he soon
recovered, for he recognised him to be the
object of his late resentment, the Hermit
of the Woods. His rage kindled, and when
he perceived the executioners to throw down
their brands and relinquish their office, he
rushed forward to the Hermit.
How darest thou, dotard, said he,
intrude
thyself and thy madness between us and
the sacrifice of our captives? The spirits of our
slain warriors call upon us for the vengeance
which we must inflict upon these victims. I
have my own wrongs to avenge upon thee,
Rodolph
.
Retire, and disturb us not in this feast
of vengeance, or I will cut thee down where
thou standest.
I defy thee, vain man! returned the
Hermit
,
camly. Thou darest notI am here in
defence of innocence, and in the service of the
Great Spirit. In his name, I command thee to
set these prisoners free. If thou refusest, his
hand is out-stretched, and immediate
destruction
shall fall upon thee!
Destruction shall fall upon thee first,
shouted the infuriate Mohawk, and he plunged
his tomahawk into the breast of the prophet.
All the spectators shuddered, but stood still as
if horror had rooted them to the ground.
Brandt! Brandt! said the Hermit, as he
fell to the earth, thou knowest not what thou
hast done. This deed has filled the measure
of thy wickedness. There is no more peace
for thy spirit.
Thou hast slain thy father!
Brandt uttered a yell of horror which made
the air quiver and astonished the Indians who
were now moving irregularly and timidly
towards
him. He caught his father's breast, and
held it with an endeavour to stem the issuing
of the blood that flowed from it.
It is in vain, said Rodolph. But thank
Heaven thou seemest penitent, and I forgive thee.
I deserved this. In my youth I was wicked
as thou. My father's liberal bounty I
exhausted
in dissipation. At length he refused to
supply me with more. I longed for his riches.
I slew him
. Oh God! then, then, frenzy
seized my brain! I fled from civilization.
Your mother nursed me in my delirium. I
recoveredI married her. You were born.
I fled from your presence. He who has
injured
a father ought never to have a son. A
presentiment I could not banish, told me that
you were to be the avenger of my father's blood
I slew my fathermy son has slain me!
Eternal
justice, thou art satisfied! he said and died.
Butler, on perceiving from his station on
the balcony, this interruption to the execution
of his victims, hastened forward to ascertain
distinctly the cause. By the time he
approached
,
the Hermit had ceased to speak. He saw
Brandt powerfully affected. He was surprised,
for he knew not the cause.
What! is this the hero of the Mohawks!
said he, upbraiding his confederate in iniquity.
I thought thou hadst the soul of a warrior;
but thy heart is grown feeble like a woman's.
The spirits of thy fathers will be ashamed of
thy weakness.
Brandt cast upon him a look of indignation.
The spirits of my fathers ashamed of me!
he exclaimed. Ay; they will curse me. But
thouthou hast nothing to do with my fathers.
Hie hence, lest, if thou frettest me, in my
madness I slay thee!
What! art thou, indeed, mad? cried
Butler
,
in astonishment. Does it grieve thee
that thou hast slain a peevish grey-beard who
was thy enemy?
Ha! cried Brandt, seizing his tomahawk,
which was still reeking with the blood of his
father, if thou wilt scoff again, I have a weapon
accustomed to pierce hearts. By the blood that is
now upon it,I swear I am thy friend no longer!
Nonsense! returned Butler, perceiving
the impolicy of irritating the savage farther.
I wish not to offend thee. I cannot
comprehend
the cause of thy agitation.But enough
of it. Let us now proceed with the sacrifice
of the prisoners.
Ah! exclaimed the savage, his habitual
taste for destruction returning. Our customs
require it.He was but a white man, he
said to the executioners, who now stood near
him, and could not be a prophet of Manetto.
Haste, fire the piles, and let the sacrifice be
offered
!
Being no longer in awe of Rodolph, whom
they now considered a deceiver, and who lay
dead before them, the executioners hastened to
re-kindle their brands, which they soon
accomplished
,
and waving them, as they blazed and
crackled in the air, they proceeded towards the
piles. But before they could apply the flaming
instruments to their destructive purpose, a
sudden
shout of warlike voices issued from the
woods, and a number of musket balls pierced
each of them, together with the ferocious
Brandt, and stretched them on the ground.
This was instantaneously followed by a more
abundant visitation of the same deadly missiles,
upon the thickest groups of the Indians, more
than a hundred of whom fell, and the rest fled
in terror from the scene. Butler, with the
whole force of the tories, was now advancing
to check the flight of the Indians and give
battle
to the assailants, when Henry Austin, at the
head of the Wyoming Volunteers, and about
five hundred Continental troops, rushed out of
the wood and charged the traitorous
destroyers
with the bayonet. They made but a short
resistance
.
They were unable to withstand even
the first shock of their disciplined adversaries.
They broke, and imitating their Indian allies,
fled into the depths of the forest, leaving two
hundred of their party dead on the field.
Butler, even in this extremity, resolved to
make an effort to retain possession of Agnes.
He hurried from the scene of battle, as soon as he
saw that the day was lost, to the balcony where
he had left her in charge of a sentinel. By this
time, however, the prisoners were unbound,
and Dr. Watson, whose anxious eye followed
the career of Butler over the field, perceived
this movement, the intention of which he at
once conjectured, just as Henry Austin
approached
towards him.
Fly, Henry! said he, fly to yonder
balcony
,
and save your Betrothed from the
destroyer
!
With the speed of an arrow Henry obeyed,
and just as Butler had seized Agnes to carry her
off, he with one spring mounted the balcony,
and one powerful thrust of his sword,
annihilated
the opposition which the sentinel
imprudently
offered to his advance upon Butler.
Ah! infamous miscreant! cried he to the
latter, thank Heaven, I have thee!
I know that this is my death-scene, said
the courageous ruffian, for thy soldiers
surround
me. But I shall die with the satisfaction
of knowing that thou, my detested rival, shalt
not survive to enjoy Agnes.
So saying he made a desperate pass at Henry,
aiming, not to save himself, but to destroy his
antagonist. That antagonist, however, was too
expert a swords-man to be endangered by such
U
maniac rashness. He struck the coming weapon
aside with such force that it almost flew from
its owner's grasp, while his own sword, in its
backward sweep, nearly dissevered Butler's
head from his body.
By that Heaven-directed blow, said
Colonel Dennison, who at that moment entered
the balcony, thou hast avenged the desolation
of a whole people.
Thou hast also, said Dr. Watson, who
entered immediately after the Colonel,
avenged
thy father and thy sister, and rescued thy
Betrothed from unspeakable miseryfrom the
hands of a villain!
Oh Agnes! exclaimed Henry, straining
her to his palpitating breastmy beloved, my
faithful one, thou art yet my own. I am happy
Heaven hath preserved thee for me!
I see thee again! said she. Oh Henry,
thanks to the Eternal! this is indeed
happiness
!
The tears rushed to her eyes; she hid
her burning blushes in his bosom, and sobbed
aloud the grateful agitations of her heart.
Bless thee, my son! said Mr. Norwood,
who now, with Miss Watson, advanced towards
the victor. The hand of Heaven is
manifest
in this day's deliverance. May the
Almighty
Power that sent thee at the critical
moment, when all seemed to be lost, still
befriend
thee and that maiden, thy own betrothed,
who has been true to thee and to her vows,
amidst the severest trials that could beset
human
nature.
But we haste to close our narrative; and
must, therefore, decline entering into a detail
of the congratulations and outpourings of
gratitude
of which Henry Austin was now the
object
.
The party retired from the eventful
balcony
to the residence of Mr. Norwood, which
was so lately the prison of its venerable master
and his friends.
Henry now informed them that it was owing
to information received from Rodolph the
Hermit
,
that he had been enabled to come to their
rescue at so critical a juncture. After the
capture
of Fort Wintermoot, Rodolph
anticipating
what would happen elsewhere, hasted on
horseback, towards the Lehigh, where he
understood
that a party of Continentals was advancing
to Wyoming. Here, fortunately meeting them,
he stimulated their speed by the intelligence he
imparted, and conducted them, by the shortest
route, to their destination.
Yesterday, said Henry, Joseph
Jennings
joined us with a small party of his
bush-rangers
.
He informed us where the Indians
were encamped, but he knew nothing about
the intended sacrifice. Rodolph, who had often,
in the character of a prophet, by working on
their superstition, restrained the ferocity of the
savages in their wars, conceiving that he might
possibly do some good by visiting them now in
that capacity, hastened on before us, to their
encampment. We followed as fast as our
numbers
and equipments would permit. With the
result of his arrival, as well as of ours, ye are
acquainted. Would to Heaven we had arrived
but one week sooner! What an amount of
unparalleled
misery and desolation would have
been prevented!
The ways of Providence are, indeed,
mysterious
,
observed Mr. Norwood. Often do
the wicked triumph, while the virtuous are
subjected to the most terrible calamities. But
God is just; hence there must be a time and a
place where the inequalities of this world shall
be corrected, and the value of virtue and the
principles of eternal justice vindicated to the
satisfaction of both angels and men.